I hate that paranoid stuff, but it sure does seem like Romney has been able to set the ground rules of how he is covered.

Y'all mf gon let Romney win then be crying and shit when ya financial aid and healthcare and shit gone!!

This Bitch Thats Talking Bout Romney

BREAKING:  - Predictor of 18/18 Elections: ROMNEY WINS!

Stand down America, we got this one  Canada votes on the US election #forumresearch #obama #rom

the president supports gays rights of all americans even you. So you can come out the closet now. OBAMA/BIDEN 2012

Romney event pulls 30,000+ while Obama draws 200 with the help of Stevie Wonder. Maybe he should have thrown in Jay

If Obama wins, I'm leaving the country. If Romney wins, I'm leaving the country. This isn't a political tweet, I just

If Romney is elected president, I'm packing my bags and looking for what island Tupac is stationed.

Romney is gonnna pay off America's debt with his oversea accounts just like he paid for the Olympics.. #lolwhatajoke #o

You have to like all the pro-Obama main stream media support!.

Hey Americans, do this country a favor  vote Romney! There are no 2nd chances/ no 2nd term to get it right. 1 shot only! Lngest 4 yrs ever!

sorry, I will never again vote for the establishment parties. Yer on yer own there. #Obama and #Romney are

The best part of the election?  Bedazzled #Obama hat!

Exactly! We seem to hate Obama more though but Romney is just an arrogant rich cock wrangler

I wonder what will happen behind closed doors : Chris Christie Says He'll Vote For Mitt Romney, Defends Obama Praise

Children no longer cold, agitated they chant oath of eternal allegiance to Ma'elKoth, Romney's n

Breaking:  Romney Paid Zero Taxes From 1996 To 2009  via

Obama campaign launches massive Get Out the Vote effort. Romney campaign responds with biggest ever Don't Count the Vo

I need to look up what Romney stands for, so that way I'll know. Because I already know what Obama stands for. Because all I see on TV are ~

They sound so silly : Paul Ryan To Social Conservatives: 'Religious Freedom' At Risk If Obama Is Reelected

If Barack Obama becomes President, I'm moving to Canada! #TeamRomney

Niggas unfollow me cuz of my anti-Obama campaigning

Robama the hybrid. It wouldn't work anyway. Romney doesn't seem that good at sports.

NY Daily News endorses . somewhere in Obama's camp I can hear the #Racial slurs all the way from my house! #Inde

I do not posit that Obama has made as much change as was hoped, but dammit, he's done the best he can given the circumstances.

Former Hillary aide backs Romney | Times247

Glenn we have controversial acts at a local football game at half time show in southeast Texas with big bird punching Romney

Pretty disturbing news about Romney Nailed! Bloomberg News: Mitt didn't pay taxes before 2009 because

The Redskins lost, which means that Mitt Romney will be our next President. (Here's why.)

joking about killing/hurting people is so stupid: 7 Ways We Could Kill Mitt Romney With Our Vaginas | Thought Catalog

8 years6 good ones A couple marred by Pelosi  Reid Blaming others is exclusively a presidential-patent owned by Obama

Most Viewed #twitpic 4 #unemployment 85 Views 3 Tweets #Employment #Unemployment #Obama #Congress #Sp h

he's not. If Romney does squeak it out, it's with less than 280.

Obama you guys suffer a political election, because what they do is very private,wants to give food, not skirt destribuindo

NDP supports Obama wont support government on legislation thats good for Canadians.Is this not the most stupid party ever.#cdnpoli

RT: it's SO INSANE people NOT RICH think mitt romney gives a shit about them. PERIOD.

Ppl I fought 4 this Country help me fight 2 save it from obama n romney. Vote 4 Gary Johnson Save America

President Obama  the First Lady have already voted. On Nov. 6th, it's your turn. Find your voting location now:

if Romney becomes president we are probably going to get another anti-establishment album from Green Day. YOU KNOW WE DON'T WANT THAT.

Obama leading in ELECTORAL votes .! FUCK those POPULAR votes Electoral is what's going to win you the election.. #TeamObama

Paul Ryan: Obama path for nation compromises Judeo-Christian values -

John Gizzi: Benghazi will dog Obama into second term or retirement [VIDEO]

I have to say, this is some crazy ish -- 'Runaway Slave' is an anti-Obama painting

Please help support I Voted for Obama, add a #Twibbon now!

people literally did that today. There was an Obama rally and people brought grills and cooked out.

If Obama is not re-elected by Brad Bathgate -

Warning: This May Scare You, Seriously. The 100th Day Of The Romney Administration:

I liked a video from  Romney: Federal Disaster Relief Spending Is 'Immoral'

The story about Romney staff refusing to let frostbitten children leave PA rally is truly bizarre.

A Hurricane Sandy victim w/ an undecided vote saidtht wen she saw Obama in the rain helping others he earned her vote! ht

Not with this Mitt Romney ad on Datpiff lol

Romney Avoids Taxes via Loophole Cutting Mormon Donations - Bloomberg  Harry Reid was right abou

, a vote for Romney/Ryan will guarentee 7 trillion added to the deficit. #Forward

Romney would be that same tyrant, do not vote because u don't believe in abortion or gay rights vote based on what America needs.

I'm getting nauseous thinking about Romney potentially becoming president of this country. Can you say #OhCanada?

Stephen k. Bannon u A BITCH FOR BASHING OBAMA

Obama Demonizes Tea Party in Final Days of Campaign   #TEAParty

#LieLikeMitt is trending because lots of Obama's supporters don't have to work in the morning. #welfareleeches

Jealous much of OBAMA/BIDEN 2012's success? Sorry about that. Not really.

Israel Matzav: #Obama wants your children for the Muslim Brotherhood  #tcot #p2

So after Tuesday can everyone agree that anyone who called this thing for Romney with 300+ EV, is a total hack. #P2 #election #obama2012

(773): Your dress got me laid by one of Obama's Secret Service members. Patriotic duty, check.

Wow, Romney staffers are caging attendants with frotbite so they can have show a bigger rally for press -

exactly, my mom stepdad and I are voting for Obama too

why both of our teams got a fucked up Head Coachs thoits time for a change ***Obama voice***

WHO THE EFF T DOG?? People going nuts like this dude Obama getting assassinated.

NJ governor pledges to vote Romney despite praising Obama (Christie is Fox News' Lap Dog)

Benghazi Should Cost Obama the Election:

Whatever happened to Oprah??  She helped put Obama in office in 2008 and is nowhere in sight in 2012.

Offering such a large portion of his base to the Minotaur could really cost Romney in several crucial swing states. #RomneyDeathRally

3 reasons why President Obama should be re-elected:  Joe isn't bad either!

#SuryaRay #Surya Bill Clinton to rally voters for President Obama at the Palestra - The Daily

The Mitt Romney boat is taking water. Out of 19 public polls released today. President Obama led in 17 and was tied in two.

Whats the difference between 4 more years of Obama and showering at Penn State? Nothing. Either way you're going to get fucked.

Yayee NY Daily News!!! Another Democrat newspaper, The NY Daily News, endorses Romney -

Y'all muhfuckaz talkin bout a damn football game when they tryna say Mitt Romney winning. FUCK SHIT #blasphemy

Romney Gains 3 to Tie Obama in CNN's D+11 Poll: The latest CNN national poll of likely voters, which shows a 49% h

this is why I can't bring myself to vote for Obama. Who wants to vote for someone who is okay with bombing innocent civilians?

Yes, we canso i think #obama

I don't think Romney has a vision for the country. He has a vision for those in his same economic class. Not good enough.

I promise Im moving to Mexico if Obama loses I. Promise.

And yet Obama refused to call it a terrorist attack.

Since Bama won, looks like Obama is gonna run this shit again..

Does have a Romney Ryan 2012 tattoo yet?

FACT: Under Obama, median household income down $4,520 from $55,198 in Jan 2009 to $50,678 In Aug 2012

#Romney Spends Final Campaign Hours in #Pennsylvania  via #tcot #mitt2012

yes Dangerous 2 go 2 eventHorrible stories reporters tweeting from Romney Events

Same here, and when I told them I already voted and not for Romney or Obama, they promptly hang up the phone. Calls now stopped.

Romney has not had an interview in 24 days. How can ppl vote 4 this car salesmen.  No1 brings up his refusal 2 show his taxes.

4 times! MT a baby survives abortion and is alive outside of the womb,Obama voted it should die without..medical help.

I'm Australian and even I'm nervous that Romney's going to win

This Obama app is completely the kind of useless thing our inner middle school girl wants to know:who w/ yr name voted?

I put it like this. Obama made a change in four years. Give him another four to finish what he started

imagine that!!! The Obama campaign didn't have to trap frost-bitten kids and their families in his ra

UNBELIEVABLE---THIS IS THE TRUTH---Benghazi Reveals Obama-Islamist Alliance

Considering Obamacare got through, there's no reason to believe Obama just got stonewalled. He made promises and didn't deliver.

And I'm 100% for Obama but Paul Ryan isn't a hick hahha

#Sexy #Top #News Did Cam Newton and the Panthers predict a Romney win?  #FollowNGain Goo

AGAIN--Happening Now:  Voters held hostage at #Romney rally in PA. No, really:  #tcot

Vote for Mitt Romney  get your own planet. Ok, that's just for guys. #LieLikeMitt

mine gave me a gun for koosh tag and wore an obama shirt.

They simply dislike Obama THAT MUCH. Hope this helped. 5/5

On show, Bill Richardson said that Obama had created 5.5 private sector jobs during his time in ofc. Prob true. #tcot

I wonder if ESPN is going to show a special featuring Obama filling out his electoral map.

I just unfollowed a girl on tumblr because she's too pro-Romney. #ihaveissues

I bet a Dub that if romney becomes president theres going to be a riot.

wat I mean.. If Obama wins I think these racist white ppl goin do some fuck shit , if Romney wins alot of blk ppl goin be HEATED !

Pick a Wall Street Candidate and Vote For Change! Yes, it's that Absurd. #ofa #obama #romney #democrat #ows

will Mitt Romney and his Big Money CORRUPT GOP buy there way in the WHITE HOUSE? The WORLD is WATCHING!

But go on  and look at the electoral college score board.  I added up the numbers of the ones Romney is

Tired Of seeing this tweet! Romney Gone take away weave if he become Pres. hoes gone be walkin around lookin like Lil Bill

Not a single R voted for Obamacare. Got through on supermajority Congress alone. Obama could have done more, didn't.

Will Colorado marijuana legalization measure work in Mitt Romney's favor? - Alaska Dispatch: Will Colorado marij

Tammy Moscoso I just love how the teens are with Obama, and elders with Romney lol so  -

Romney is spending BIG MONEY in Jersey and Pa. He should have called me, I could have used that WASTED CASH. GYAOHR #forward punk!

Well you know that evil bitch is just as bad as Obama remember how she and her aide took files from a dead mans office?she will not

They attack Gen Powell's endorsement of Obama NOW they defame Gov Christie b/c he worked with the President like a gov should!

Don't think 4 years matters? Remember all the damage of Bush-Cheney. We're finally getting out of it. Vote Obama let's finish our recovery

one thingjust one thing will make my week betterOBAMA BETTER FUCKIN BEAT ROMNEY ON TUESDAY.THAT IS ALL

#WhyImNotVotingForObama I don't like presidents transmitting messages to former KGB spies. I feel unsafe with Obama cozying up to Russia.

Then how come lower taxes under GW Bush doubled the debt and created a higher deficit than Obama now has?

When people say Vote for the Bible, when referring to Romney. Mormonism is not Christianity. #KnowYourReligions

And lead us not into temptation, but deliver us from obama's evil, for Thine is the kingdom,  the power,  the glory forever. Amen

Facebook has really tried to censor any anti Obama stuff. I got a warning last wk

Romney just needs to drink a coke. Oh nevermind he can't.

Obama needs to do a deeply emotional commercial with those broke ass foreign children or those busted looking animals to get my vote

President Obama and Bruce Springsteen rally in downtown Madison  #GreatTimes w/ The Boss in WI

#WhyImNotVotingForRomney Because President Obama has proven himself a true leader. Romney has only proven he can lie

Just returned from Romney rally in my neighborhood in Yardley Pa= 30,00 ecestatic fans

Mitt Romney tells homeless disaster victim to 'go home and call 211'  via #sandy

Romney already said we can't afford FEMA so New Jersey is SOL.

Mitt Romney don't pay no taxes

Romney's not a drinker, but most beers lean right, while liberals prefer Absolut.

I'm tired of these Mitt Romney commercials.

There would be a certain irony if Romney gets 47% of the vote.

Please tell me Romney's ideas to fix the mistakes that he sees.I'll wait..

If Obama don't get re-elected at least legalize dosha!

Bush added 5 trillion to the deficit in 8 years, Obama has added another 5 1/2 on top of that in just 4 years.

I don't know about the Latino vote but the Cuban American vote will go for Romney

IF THEY DO THAT WE WILL BE LIKE OH WELL ROMNEYS GOT A LANDSLIDE VICTORY. WE NEED EVERY VOTE 4 ROMN

An Obama rally in VA will have Stevie Wonder to perform on Monday. That's just too easy material!

MSM inflates attendance at Obama's puny rally in Milwaukee (sorry O, ain't happening this time)

okay tbh i'm scared if Romney wins.

RT: Juan Williams on polls: the Romney camp is expanding map  Obama is trying to hold.  sounds like a load of hooey.

Mitt Romney has become the first candidate for President of the United States to ever refuse to attend the

what about spiritual crisis in straight community since Romney rejected gay marriage mobs attack gay people

According to obama has gray hair because hes been going to bed late

Romney Can Eat The Meat Thinkin He Gone Take My Food Stamps

Obama now live in Ohio 'Cincinnati' !! #2DaysUntilElection

My main reason for voting was so my mom will be taking care of. She's too sick for Romney to get in office. Period.

I guess you know by now secret service was detaining them.  YES Obama is a very real threat to freedom. #asinine

It's funny how people believe the bullshit that comes outta Mitt Romney's mouth.

Honestly no one is really pro Obama or Romney. They're just anti Obama or anti Romney and voting to prevent the other one

Guliani calls out President Obama's response to Sandy

Explosive Video Indictment Of Obama Rocks YouTube: See The Most Devastating, Compelling Election Ad Of 2012  via

Well, then that means Sile supports Romney. Either way, scum.

#news With Obama, Romney in virtual tie, Congress likely to see status quo: On the eve of a deeply polarisi  #pak

New poll shows Obama in lead over Romney  via

You talkin bout Fort Valley havin low enrollment..Shit you vote for Mitt Romney then every college gon have low enrollment..#TeamObama

Conservative Kelly Ayotte, New Hampshire endorses Mitt Romney 20 Nov 2011  #tcot #gop #teaparty #endorseMITT #Mitt2012

If u want 2 hear from some sick ass sorry folks Ohio #Romney Rally -Interviews with Supporters - YouTube  #p2 #politics

you should write a letter to Obama

BOB KING - UAW Files Ethic Charge On Romney For Auto Loan Profits

Everybody saying thay gne drop out if Romney win.!

after President Barack Obama wins, yes I will quit posting about politics lol

#LieLikeMitt I can't he doesn't lie,but Obama is the biggest whining liar to be president

you think Obama controls those things? In the state of our economy, you can't vote on social stance! #Romney2012

New York Daily News joins growing number of newspapers switching endorsement to Romney | Fox

Please Lord let Obama win the election

Barack Obama needs to win again

Amazing, it's going to kill the Media's careers before it even touches #Obama's. #tcot #romney2012

Celebrities join final push for Barack Obama and Mitt Romney in Presidential  - The Australian

you realize that Obama is gonna take half of your money from your ridiculous contracts/endorsements you sell out for? #knowledge

If this nigga Romney win I promise I'm starting a riot !

I'm not one to argue about politics, but seriously. Tuition is already expensive enough,  Romney's budget cuts in education will be gruesome

Most dangerous job in the Obama administration?  Diplomat.  #Benghazi

'UAW Charges #Romney With Profiteering From Auto Bailout'  #LieLikeMitt #Election2012- Federal Ethics Violation #Lawsuit

Dinesh D'Souza: 2016: Obama's America Has 'Struck a Chord':  via

Something to think about. If Obama wins, Republicans go home  say a prayer for America. If Romney wins, democrats riot  file lawsuits.

Not to be racist to all my followers, but was The White House ever renamed after Obama's election in 2008?

While Romney sacrificed over $1B to devote himself to public service, Obama used it to get rich. Who is the greedy 1%er?

Fonzworth and Melyssa Ford hosting our Fashion show, Tuesday Watch Party and Party following after Obama wins, and Roy Woods, Marvin Dixon,

enjoy  Noonan: Obama fighting for his political life  great

I love all the Romney 2024 young voter shots. Good plan to start campaigning early

michelle obama, if you tell me to vote for your husband one more time, i'll destroy you. i'm trying to listen to disney pandora.

Mitt Romney Likely To Face Ethics Complaint From UAW For Allegedly Hiding Auto Bailout Profits  vi

Bill Clinton makes the closing case for Obama in St. Cloud

I liked a video  David Icke - The Reptilians - the Schism - Obama and the New world Order.

Redding News Romney adds Pennsylvania to late campaign blitz - Los Angeles Times: The GuardianRomney adds Pennsy

PLEASE CALL ME! That's like a dream! :) (wasted time, though, I'm an Obama girl already.)

Ed Gillespie, Romney Adviser, Admits Obama's FEMA Doing A Good Job Responding To Sandy (VIDEO)   #p2 #tcot

actually, it is good to consider that supposing he is right? That Obama has some policies that favour

Mitt Romney wants to ban tampons UHM ?

Mitt Romney debates himself  // This is absolutely amazing, the stupidity

The VICTIMS were more than NAMES in a NEWS STORY! OBAMA doesn't see it that way! He just wants 2 SPIN his way into 4 more years

Barack Obama (D-Lame Duck)

I'd rather bet with vegas and take the +140 that romney iseven odds is not the true line.now if u want to give the 140

OBAMA does NOT Play by the RULES of LAW! OBAMA Plays by his RULES ALONE! He learned from the BEST! RAHM EMANUEL! Get CHI-

I just got this girl dumb tight via text when she asked who I was voting for  I was going dumb hard Saying how Romney's the best candidate.

Tuesday will be a wonderful day I can only hopesince then the Obama campaign will stop sending me emails. #hope

if by judeo-christian values he means inequality for gays and denying women's right to choose, I hope Obama does

Obama, Romney Virtually Tied in Virginia - Wall Street Journal BBC News Obama, Romney Virtually Tied in Virginia Wall

Maher: 'Who Cares What Somebody In Obama Administration Wrote Down and

Ayyyy Obama will be The president of The United States Of America for his second Term Tomorrow, Jesus just Told me, and JESUS don't Lie

If you voting for Romney, go head and unfollow me --- aye that rhyme lol

So many Mitt Romney ads on ObviouslyBenHughes's YouTube page

Re-watching the video where Obama sonned Donald Trump lmao what a clown

Obama to Cut Health Benefits for Active, Retired Military  via

I voted for Mitt Romney because he'd never cut a side deal with a former KGB agent against the American people.

3 more endorsements for Obama are Chavez, Castro and Putin.

Don't talk to me if you support Mitt Romney. Don't come near me, don't look at me, don't  breathe same air as me

Top Republican Haley Barbour declared Sunday that Superstorm Sandy has blunted Mitt Romney's momentum **And here com

I'm not really all about the election but I haven't made a plan on what I'm going to do if Romney wins

If Obama does not win reelection America will be without a President for at least 4 years, instead a Vulture Capitalist will be in the WH.

Romney is also pro choice (except when visiting a pro life state so..) and Rs policies will kill far more than the unborn!

Actress shocked at anger after supporting Mitt Romney  go Girl!

If you thought Obama had some star power lined up, check out this scene from the Romney rally #election #stars

WHAT. ROMNEY AND OBAMA ARE TIED. MY VOTEE COUUUUNTS. #votingtomorrow

If I were Obama or Romney I would totally continue to run ads after the election to piss everyone. They have the money to blow on it anyways

So if you're voting for Obama and you hit the democrats button before you select him it makes your vote not count? Is that real?

Im randomly watchin Mitt Romney videos.

I saw this photo on the Obama website. So sweet. I canvassed with my mom too!!! #CA2NV

I love u OBAMA! I'm n Dallas Texas n u still for got my vote! Texas is a Republican State! Bush hometown! Ass hole! #teamBARACKOBAMA

for sure! But at least he has a job. Obama screwed most of WV. Blahh, eff politics. Lol

Women! The 50s may look cool to those who didn't live it, Mad Men chic etc, but it really was grim. Vote Obama to keep our hard won gains!!!

Share your thoughts on the election 914-338-0525! Also we will have a debate with President Obama and Mitt Romney

I pray that I have a great week  you as well! I pray for President Obama  that the Lord will guide this electio

if u feel like the us fans get everything just remember we might be getting mitt romney as a president and u'll feel

I think when you spread the wealth around it's good for everybody. Barack Obama

Romney what color is the sky?Romney: That's a very good question. We had a sky back when I was governor of Massachus

Why Do White People Think Mitt Romney Should Be President?

Hating Bush's foreign policy was easy, but when Obama commits worse atrocities, it's easily forgiven because cognitive dissonance is hard.

In fact the Scarecrow was an Obama supporter until he got in to see the Wizard  got his brain, which he'd had all along but didn't know it

Phool aur Kankar: Who Is Mitt Romney?--- Candidate For White House

truuu, but people still need to vote. Obama can't win without our votes

U.S. Africa Command lacked options in Benghazi: As Americans fought for their lives in Benghazi  #tcot #obama #P2

#UK #World US set for final campaigning day: US presidential rivals Barack Obama and Mitt Romn  #BBC #ENPC #PARIS

Why I am voting for Obama, and think all should join me. | Voice4America  #fb

Ok mitt Romney u tryna take away PORNnow u taking this shit too far #ShitBout2GetReal #obama

This president can ask us to be patient. This president can tell us it was someone else's fault. BUT. FROM ROMNEY'S SPEECH

Once againit's almost 2013. Why are we wearing colored contacts? We did not march on Washington or elect Barack Obama for

Thanks for being there for Prez. Obama! God Bless You and Beyonce and Blue Ivy!;)

Obama, Romney Virtually Tied in Virginia - Wall Street Journal: Moneycontrol.comObama, Romney Virtually Tied in

While Pk the only country where Romney scored more than Obama in a BBC poll, in the US most Pakistanis feel Obama is sup

Praying Romney wins the election but regardless we must pray for our leaders

Ready for Tuesday to come and be over with, so these racists can get TF out my ear about Obama

SEAL Team, Osama movies are based on Obama mendacity, say critics  via

thank you Mindy. Your support is tremendous. We're winning. Breaking, actually burning, Obama's firewall #RomneyRyan2012

MT Knew something like this would break: Romney paid $0 in taxes between 96-09. ZERO.

#romney A real #president should say - At every crisis in one's life, it is absolute salvation to have some symp..

I am fired up tonight. Obama HAS to be defeated.

Obama Demonizes Tea Party in Final Days of Campaign   via

Obama is one of them { Muslim Islamist }, not one of us

If the #obama regime's pathetic response to Sandy is his idea of leadership, the #USA is in deep trouble if he were to get reelected.

but yes, vote for obama!  voted a few weeks ago via absentee ballot.

I am voting for Obama! I will not stop now!

I bet Romney was the student to remind the teacher that they had to stay a few minutes after class.

I hear ya, maybe a trip of SoCal twitter conservatives to see Romney is in order :-)

Jim Cramer's Brilliant Explanation Of Why He's Predicting A Gigantic #Obama Victory

obama lover and smokin hot. I'm wifey material pretty much ;)

Israel Radio Correspondent: American Jews whisper voting for Romney

President Obama should never have proposed a rational basis for Islamist rioter's rage vis a vis the video.

Preparing for the inevitable disaster that will com if Romney is elected need more guns, antibiotics and bee

Greta, all your tweets are for Romney seems Fox free campaigning Romney! So unfair..CNN is fair!!

If you are voting for Obama, then you should go live in Old Bryce

If Britons could vote in the US election, 70% would vote for Obama, according to a YouGov poll.

plus FB censored the Navy SEALs' criticisms of Obama, so, yeah. I'm done there.

im unfollowing anybody who votes for Romney real talk

I'm Going in tomorrow to cast my vote for Romney I've never wanted Obama before his first term in office

Awww :(  We can bask in their glory when Romney wins then :)  PS, I live in a Red state.. he's got Az..

I'm excited to see the outcome of USA's elections. #Obama if I was an American, you'd have my vote for sure. #ObamaForPresident

This US political debate with a stranger at 2am is too much for me.. If I sign off, he'll think it's still okay to vote Romney. It's not ok.

I only believe a handful of people who say they're moving to Canada if Romney is elected, most of you aren't going anywhere. Quit lying.

It'll be so rejuvenating to clear #MN record after 40 years of electoral votes going to the Democrats. #ROMNEY will take MN.  #Mittmentum

Obama Accused Of Sexual Harassment While at Harvard Law Review

All you people that was talking shit about Obama this Romney that better vote, because if you dont you have ZERO room to complain.

Political expert Tuesday has all the makings of a landslide:   #Romney

are u gna be there to see it? Be nice present from Mitt! Ha! Go Romney/Ryan!!!! Ignore those clueless liberals!!

2 #MortZuckerman can't criticize Mitt's campaign.. u voted 4 #EmptyChair in 08 knowing Obama's past was kept secret from voters.

the only way 2 get rid of OBAMA is voting 4 Romney otherwise you're wasting UR Vote those 3rd party candidates know it

SANDY HELPED COVERUP OBAMA'S CRIMES IN BENGHAZI  via

I bet Obama Knows how to Pearl the fuck out of a blunt.

It looks like Obama is really excited for some candy that we can't see in the photo:

racist? Obama depends on racism. He surrounds himself with racists  hateful people (pastor, advisor, etc) its his essence.

Mitt Romney read that 48 Laws of Power bullshit and these fools eat it up.

Nascar is a waste of gas. You rednecks are fucking up the economy watching this trash but wanna talk shit about Obama

Today's big story. 'Sides, yknow, that storm.  Romney avoids taxes via loophole cutting Mormon donations ht

Sick of seeing MSM calling the Election for Obama even as the polls are becoming neck and neck?

How the Obama campaign guessed my income from my phone number  #creepy #privacy #tcot #p2 #IN #sgp #tlot

That's why I've already voted for Romney. Again you don't know what you're saying, stay off twitter nobody cares.

President Obama Has Turned Journalists into Criminals   viaOBAMA ATTACKS MEDIA WHISTLE BLOWERS.

I got mitt Romney (: and josh mandel ! I had my mind made up. But it still didn't hurt that my views match my candidate

If you have to, tell your friends  family that you voted for #Obama, but in the privacy of the voting booth, do the right thing. #Romney

If you only watched Fox News, you would think Romney is winning CO, MI, MN, WI and PA. So, er, go ahead?

they are collaborators who think they will be allowed into the ranks of the Ruling Elite with Obama.

Well Obama Suspended Me  Ugh Thank Godd I Needed That But Then This Bitch Knew I Had A Test On Monday Ugly Ass Hoe Lmao Night Twitter

Plus, it's fun to just sit back and watch the Romney/Obama arguments between people I know. Lol.

SUDDENLY I'M UNDECIDED.  Working the phones for Obama  If I call you, don't hang up. It's really me

and that leadership is BARACK OBAMA!!! Woot woot!!!

Minnesota - 2012 President - Obama 52%, Romney 41% (SurveyUSA 11/1-11/3)

President Obama Needs You: The Final Push Is on Us  via

Romney Highlights His Similarities With George W. Bush During Debate   #Colorado #Virginia #Florida #Iowa #Romney #p2

The really rich have hides like rhinos.  If America votes Romney they get a fascist ad-on in the VP, 47% HAH!  Vote BOlove that laugh.

Romney, btw, this evening called Virginia Gov Bob McDonnell the most popular governor in the country.

Maybe Romney knows he has the election in the bag so he's just trying to help Smith, Mack, and Allen to take the Sen? :)

If you voted for #Obama in 2008 to prove that you aren't racist, vote for #Romney in 2012 to prove you aren't stupid.

Washinton vote for Obama of blank,Judges9:22,1Samuel23:26,1Chronicles15:10(Blank Cancer)

i cant go on youtube without it screaming at me telling me to vote for Obama.

Romney wins endorsement from 150 former POWs - Conservative News

I wont have the homie obama hooking it up anymore /3

Encuesta Mitofsky: Romney 50%, Obama 50%, EPN 89%,  Total: who cares

OBAMA the Compulsive Liar! He came on TV and told All America that he has done all he could! Nothing else he can do for us! LIAR!

Praying, and it's what Obama wants the people to have, reminds him of Kenya!

What's funny is Romney expecting College students to vote for him ww

WATCH THIS!! A Very Quick Look at President Obama's First Term

Watching Obama live speech in Colorado

Obama gets thee most unnecessary hate publicly. Disrespectful ass fockers

Martin Luther King Had Haters, Obama got haters, I Guess Im Up Next .

take out Jimmy Carter and put in Obama in that statement and that would sound about right.

In 1st 45 Months In Office, Obama Created 750,000 Private Sector Jobs, Bush Lost More Than 1 Million  via

Obama is for gay rights, but that hasn't changed anything. Just some shit he believes. Makes no difference.

I fear that if Mitt Romney wins we will all be in a real #AmericanHorrorStory.

Holy cow, Obama just totally spammed my feed with tweets.  I'll follow him again if he wins.

Obama really wants you to know where to vote.

Obama came, saw time to go home x3

Anyone writing in Ron Paul is voting for Obama!  #RonPaul2012 #RomneyRyan #tcot #lcot #sot #p2

If yu haven't voted do it tomorrow come on its tied right now LETS GO TEAM OBAMA!!!!!!

Crying Toddler Is Sick of Barack Obama and Mitt Romney  via

I honestly think America will be a better place if Romney wins. #RomneyRyan2012

lol..They Need to play that song as Obama leaves the White House

The Lakers won and all of my fantasy football teams went OFF thanks to Doug Martin. Halo 4 tomorrow. Obama needs to

#Yahoo #Trend Did Cam Newton and the Panthers predict a Romney win?  #IFollowAll Qo

I want it to be Tuesday, but then again, I do not.  At least for now, I know Obama is president  Mittens is not.

Obama is all ears so we know he hears good,but he doesn't listen.Seals we're pleading 4 support Obama said they didn't know they were N need

PPP Virginia Poll: Obama 51, Romney 47  via

I think it's sad that every argument Republicans use is how Obama is bad in some way and not that Romney is so great and all.

What if Brother Bay join in between Obama and Romney #usa #ge2012

While Romney Campaigns in the Midwest, Obama Activists Dress Like Muppets - Cortney O'Brien  via

I will never ever listen to your music with the same respect for you! Coming to America will never be the same! Obama? Really?

Gas prices conveniently drop 3 days before the election? Obama has my vote!

Media will largely ignore this like everything else with Romney. 15yrs no taxes now verified but

**BENGHAZI BLOWOUT** OBAMA ARMS AL QAEDA by Conservative Report on #BlogTalkRadio   #Benghazi #7HoursOfHell #tcot #p2

Move Over, #Romney and #Obama: The 'Green Tea Diploradical Party' Speaks for the Real

interesting epub on president obama and his personal problems before you vote on nov election

Debatable.Obama was a professor at Chicago and editor of Harvard Law Review

Romney did not tie his dog to the roof of his car!! please, someone tell me that's not true! I cant.

norff side Obama shidd can Yu dig?

If all you druma ass fb mf's dedicate just one free day to vote, Obama can and will pull this shit off.Datta give ur druma ass a good status

I'm gonna tweet #BTHObama everyday this week. It applies to both Obama  Bama. Whoop! #gigem

I've been seeing this posted everywhere. I did my early voting last week n selected Straight democrat n it did pick Obama!

Obama has abandoned #Sandy victims almost as bad as he abandoned 4 Americans in #Benghazi. Shameful

Video: Axelrod: Obama Supports Military Because He Met Those Coffins When They Came Home  This is *not*

FUCK YOU PAUL RYAN YOU PIECE OF SHIT! Ryan says Obama compromises Judeo-Christian values - Yahoo! News  via

VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE OBAMA OBAMA OBAMA pls Repost

US President Barack Obama and Republican challenger Mitt Romney will deliver their final speeches of the US pres

Look at Benghazi and 4 dead Heroes .Obama is so revengeful himself. Why all this anger? He had such an easy life

President Obama is spending the night in his home. He has a rally in Madison, WI.

c'mon coulter Obama is not losing ill u sound like dick morris

I don't speak lightly: Romney is evil. The only thing missing is the mwahahahaing with   thunder on the background. WORD.

The sure fire way to get a date at Liberty on Tuesday is to tell girls you voted for Obama #thingsthatwontwork

If Romney becomes Americas president i feel sorry for you, i mean. Omg. He is Satan.

President Obama's Closing Remarks - 2012 Presidential Debate in Hempstea:  via

According to  Romney wins on Tuesday, based soley on a 72 yr winloss record of the Washington Redskins  incumbency.. SKINS LOST

Obama supporters step up threats to riot if Romney wins  #Breaking_News

If Obama wins this election, I am moving to England.

Please vote for #RomneyRyan2012 - I do not want to see what Obama will try if he never has to answer to the voters again.

Special message from President Obama and me which appears in today's STL American  STL Sentinel.  Gotta vote Nov 6

Read before you say things..  I am not 4 Obama, but I want people to know why Romney is a bad man

Take heed, is tweeting anti-Romney poetry from the grave.

yeah Obama and i were closed.. I call him Obams. haha Kiddinggg

Fox News: Obama's Florida campaign office robbed  #Gop2012 #Gop #Tcot #Tlot #Election2012 #TeaParty #DefeatObama

what can you tell me about Romney?

Ryan says Obama compromises Judeo-Christian values  A.) OH NO NOT THAT!! B.) As embodied by Ryan?

With Romney we have some time to resist  exposethe Agenda. If Obama wins it will be total tyranny !

you telling me Obama isn't a citizen? Lol

Lol they done found another video of mitt romney

not saying Pres. Obama never lied.  -- proof that we are already moving in the right direction

Americans take to the polls tomorrow. Has Obama done enough in the recent tragedy to secure his presidency?

TkU4rt-Romney's mind is thicker than a fog bank off Gloucester Mass  just a dense.He does know how 2 ruin ppl  kiss Koch's ass

Stand with President Obama if you support his plan to keep us moving forward. Confirm where you

I'm a #Clinton fan, but he's the past. How's that moving #forward? What does it say about #Obama that he can't stan

Elections in 2 days Obama over Romney but overall both of them suck #Joke #Obama

Romney and Republicans: Flag bearers of US conservatism: Founded in the Northern states in 1854 by anti-slavery

I don't even understand why someone would vote for romney

If mitt Romney is elected All life will end.

Watching #cspan2012 and enjoying FULL, unedited coverage of both the Obama and Romney rallies today. Thank you C-Span.

Sick of the country being controlled by liberals. Obama admin and liberal senate and MSM :( We gota change this on Tues!

Obama seems great, I want him to be my friend

S/o to the Mitt ROmney campaign

Can't sleep. Election on my mind. Romney has to win.

That's why I hope all Romney supporters are just really really vocal, and there are like, 10 of them.

idgi everyone hates romney so why is everyone stressing about elections if he's that hated

This is what wingnuts are counting on: Willard getting over 60% of the white vote, low Obama voter turnout and voter s

Meanwhile, Romney campaign runs 11th-hour ad targeted at Catholics with focus on HHS mandate:

Obama Vs Romney in the Octagon prelims will be Biden Vs Ryan  #JoeRogan'sheadexploded

Very comforting. Obama becoming a heavier favorite, in 538's view. Now 86% to win Electoral College.

Obama has a 7-pt advantage in strong enthusiasm among his backers, his widest since just after the conventions: http

If Newspaper Endorsements Matter, Romney Wins - Forbes

#theprojecttv Just like Obama Flannery and Philip Adams, KRudd is an adherent to a corrupt disgraced ideology #auspol

Then Fox News should not be ignoring news, such as Romney's relentless lying. Additionally, they are owned by a criminal

I'd like to beg all of the US citizens to vote for Obama please! If Romney gets in he will ruin the world!

I don't get Romney is responsible for something that happened 155 years ago?  He must be the devil

If you really think about it Obama is the man He hoopins Runs the streets #ComeOnGuys

My stats professor has friends with Rasmussen and Gallup. He says a popular Romney vote but electoral college for Obama.

Met another Republican American on the boat today. He claims the anti Obama sentiments are under reported by left

In my dream last night not only did clarkson get his column back, romney shat in a hay stack, mcr was in the news and frank tweeted gerard

World is already going through hard moments, we all would not endure Romney too.Pls, do the right choice.

Mitt Romney Full Speech in Morrisville, Pennsylvania - 11/4/12

Mitt Romney uses final days to push for a win in long-ignored Pennsylvania - Washington Post  #mittromney

Attention US followers who are Mitt Romney supporters: don't forget to go out and vote this Thursday. Every vote coun

Finally democrats are waking up to the sad reality Obama has left us 11 Media Outlets Switch Endorsement to Romney:

Let's do Mitt Romney a favor an let em retire like most elderly gentleman his age 65 then he can spend all them million

Strange election. Romney repeats the very #gop policies that led to US  global downturn. With zig-zag progress, USA now better off.

U.S. Presidential Candidates Campaign: A day ahead of the vote, U.S. President Barack Obama and his Republican P

If Romney win, I'm robbing every white drug dealer. To each it's own homie!

Voter Fraud: North Carolina Residents Select Romney, Vote Comes Up for Obama A landslide for Romney or stolen election

IF OBAMA loses its because of computer software installed 2 flip votes IN voting machines! Mickey Duniho NSA analyst can STEAL votes in 5min

Is it racist to think a black person supporting Mitt Romney for Usa president  rather than Obama?

If the Redskins Rule is correct Romney should win election since the Redskins lost to the Panthers today.

I say obama on the alan carr show.

Don't you worry about Mittens; he gets to run a whole planet after he dies. #romney

If Romney's Bain Capital bought the co you worked for, you would freak out.  Why aren't you just as afraid of a Romney presidency?

If Obama doesn't win can we get him over here?

Lots of Americans telling me we're afraid of Romney. We are - he's an ignorant, dangerous lunatic. Not sure why you think

Haha, just lost some to my anti-Romney RT.Listen, if you still believe you deserve the sun without wishing it 4 someone else, u're a cunt!

Activist Post: How Long After the Election Will Obama Sign Executive Order to Control the Internet?  via

Still don't get all these people who continue saying that Obama hasn't done anything

OBAMA SE AH DECLARADO CALDERIC!

But I digress. She is prob bulletproof anyway. Just as Obama will probably not be impeached.

One of Rupert Murdoch's newspapers in Britain endorsed Obama. Maybe I'm missing something, but I find that mystifying.

#FoxNews  #MSNBC: How each portrayed Romney and Obama

No one shares infallibility with God, but our mistakes are our teachers. America should conceive of possibilities with Obama.

OBAMA BOUT TO WIN TUESDAY, AND OUR HOMECOMING!! GREAT WEEK!

Silly Sh*t: Romney Supporters From Ohio Don't Even Know!  #WSHH

im clicking on all the romney and obama ads i see. if you gave your hard earned money to either, it is now helping keep my gmail free.

OBAMA FIREWALL in latest polls looking particularly good in OH PA WI VA  NV!

Why do I have this strage feeing that Romney is beating Obama tomorrow?

will the real mitt romney pls stand up

There are a quite a number people calling Obama a communist and a socialist. If it were just a few, we wouldn't hear of it.

Wow, Obama should hang his head in shame and resign and then be found guilty of treason.

Black Americans only vote for Obama because he's black. Is that not racist?

The people who vote for Obama don't need a reason.For people who vote for Romney there is no reason.

Military Times Poll: Romney bests Obama, 2-1  via

*SPOILER ALERT* Obama's Gonna Win the Election!:  via

Obama fucked up with the whole gun rights thing tho :/ I'm sure that didn't help

Wrong! Yours is merely a continuation of the Right-wing mantra resurfacing as a cover for Romney's political indiscretion.

#theverge Google giving customized results when people search for Obama, but not Romney: Google shows personaliz

Bill Clinton is campaigning for President Obama and George Bush is nowhere to be seen with Governor Romney? Funny eh?

As much as you may oppose Romney or his views - at least the US has a choice between 2 genuinely different candidates. #refreshing #Election

I honestly don't care who you vote for as long as it isn't Mitt Romney.

Lmao..u wanna make name like Obama.

Plz Flw As Romney Surges, Blue States Like Maine in Play -  Supporters of  #MaineRepublicans #RonPaul

Nov.6 go out and vote. Although president Obama would go for his second term presidency but damn it's going to be a very close election

Good luck Obama he's the only real choice

Under Obama, the US stands on the edge of a high cliff. Under Romney they will take a giant step forward..Anon #Election2012

Watching V in celebration of the 5th of Nov. And the eve of President Obama's re-election.  :-)

in addition, while Obama's past is shrouded in mystery, Romneys history and achievements show him to be someone worthy of admiration

A little surprised to see an Obama endorsement on

Socialism is doing well and Obama will win by 280 and Romney 191 Obama is re elected VOTE OBAMA

She has one in Cali lol that's Obama's House

2 days before election, Romney surges into second in ABC and NBC polls

Doesn't matter what kind of #dog has, he should always be #president #Romney is #dodgy

I remember when Obama ran 4 d presidential seat 4 d 1st time and peeps here in Naija were Famzing wit ! Common mention 4 twtter dem no get

BREAKING: Mitt Romney Charged With Violating Federal Ethics Law!  support UAW and CREW Sign here:

Mitt Romney delivers the weekly republican address (Video)  #tcot #tlot #sgp #ocra

SIGN AND RT! President Obama: Pres Candidates req  disclose 10 yrs tax returns, All Banking outside US  via

Obama vs Romney = The Good, the Bad vs the Ugly and Joker

Romney is going to win this election no matter what y'all do.. Like the bush and al gore election.. #watch

who on the romney campaign thought it was a good idea to put political ads on slingo? they couldn't come up w/ another tv ad where they lie?

The Crime Rate Gone Go Up If Mitt Romney Wins, People Gone Be Stealing, Robbing, Shooting, Dying.  Everything Else ;/

is IMBECILIC possibly brain dead.Obama's intent is #DESTROY AMERICA

RT I herd it's looking kinda good for Obama right now**I REEEEEALLY HOPE SO!!!!

You are comparing net jobs (B) with gross jobs (O) Workforce participation rate under Obama

Joe Hallett: If Romney loses Ohio, he will certainly know why  via

Barack Obama-Ring--There-is-No-God-Except-Allah:  via

I'm right behind Obama today. Romney gives me the fear.

Why would you vote for someone who puts the rights of individuals in jeopardy? Go vote for Obama, America

But, aren't all the FATCATS  Big Companies on Wall St. + Etc. putting their money on Romney?! Co.'s that put $ on Obama in 2008!

My hopes are very high because I do have faith! A feeling of peace but we need to pray for Romney!#RomneyRyan2012#VictoryisComing!

PROOF: GOP Party Bosses Rigging Elections For Romney  via

he didn't memorize his speech- teleprompters, u didn't notice he never looked straight ahead?Same as Uhuru, Obama etc

I liked a video  Barack Obama - First President of The World

addresses 600+ #Romney volunteers before being deployed to go door to door in #Nevada

Video: Chris Rock urges America to vote white, vote Obama - Barry Obama! So funny.

How the world would vote - MSN polled 500k people in 35 countries.  Only one nation backed Romney - China #uselection

Mott the Romney allll the yung dooooods

[Video] US: Depressed pro-Obama voter turnout could help Romney win

Mitt Romney's biggest donors are Sheldon Adelson who wants war with Iran  the Koch brothers who want to destroy the environment. Vote right

I liked a video  Facebook Town Hall with President Obama

Katy Perry, Dave Matthews and John Mellencamp Rally for Obama  #celebs #gossip

If tomorrow you could vote in the US elections would you vote for Romney or Obama?

Obama 7 Embassies attacked, 1 Ambassador, two Seals, 1 Assistant all dead. 7 hour planned attack.

America: Obama has Bruce Springsteen and Stevie Wonder as supporters. That is all you need to know re your vote! :) Romney? Meh Zzzz

FORWARD    President Obama has a long-term economic plan to invest in education, small businesses, clean energy,

According to 7-11 Coffee Cup count Obama will have an easy victory

But anyways if your 18 or older make sure you vote for obama.

Obama Campaigns with Celebrities as Sandy Devastation Continues

Paddy Power pay out on Obama. Hope they are correct.

Watch: Indians cheer for Obama, Romney with a flash mob in Mumbai: Alert icon. Loading Published on Nov 4, 20

Presidential Election is approaching. God is Good so you know what that means .. 2nd term for Obama

So just read Femi Fani-Kayode's write up on Obama's anti-christ tendencies errr wot is he on about? Goodluck is the anti-christ!!!

GoldenCalfOfCapitalism vs God. LosingSoul, GainingCarElevator. #romney #ryan #Luntz #tcot #p2 #hannity #Catholic {0v0}

Why is Obama advertising on my youtube?! And why is he a word on my autotext?!?! Fuck the world

My prediction is Obama or riots randomly around the country.

Obama v Romney: Who will be better for investor returns?

Has Britain's press demonized Mitt Romney? At least one UK Cabinet minister thinks so

Bill Maher warns #Romney supporters: Black ppl know who you are  they'll come after you.  #Obama

We met barrack Obama he is our Number 1 fan!

The Brief: Nov. 5, 2012: By David MutoThe Big Conversation:Mitt Romney got an assist from Gov. Rick Perry over

obama need to take Rohingya Issue

#WhyImNotVotingForRomney He kept agreeing w.everything Obama said. If you agreeing he doing his

Obama pays 1million $ on 1 dinner-He's campaigning and Hi5ing and NY  NJ are going to hel

#MittRomney by the numbers.   2 more days to re-elect the great #President #Obama in #2012 -GOTV!!

Free magic underpants if Romney wins! Unless you're in the 47% obviously.

Sister Deborah - Uncle Obama ft FOKN Bois (Official Video HD):  via

WHY VOTE ROMNEY by Mark Hastings1. Businesses create jobs, not govt, Romney understands business. If you had (cont)

This second video about the 2012 USA elections examines Mitt Romney in the Bible at the smallest matrix of 70

Mitt Romney, Bill Clinton and U2's Bono Made a Fortune with this Investment - StreetAuthority

Mitt Romney, #Barack #Obama sprint to unpredictable campaign finish

Tuale Mene: Femi Fani-Kayode Labels Obama as Anti-Christ

Guy I work with owns a scrap metal business, never washes his hands in the bathroom, and thinks Michelle Obama has too many security guards.

who is ur bet romney or obama?

Romney would get the vote in china!!!!

WSJ: Obama, Romney Virtually Tied in Virginia - A new poll finds that Obama and Romney remain deadlocked in Virginia

One day out: Obama and Romney race to the finish - CBS News

-3 SCIENTISTS  ENGINEERS are DEMOCRATS(55%) or INDEPENDENT(32) almost NO GOP (6%) *   ** #Romney #gop #assange #us #uk

Gutted that with all the faff of registering as overseas voter, it's now too late for my ballot to count. Romney better not win.. #Obama2012

I don't think you could get a better president than obama?

Fuck! This is too bleddy true! Obama: More debt. Romney: More war. Choose wisely.

OBAMA IS A FAILURE AND HE SHOWS IT IN HIS OWN WORDS !!!

Me: Kardashians are so aqswbdjaiqkqhs. Parents: What? Friends: What? Teachers: What? Obama: What? Aliens: What? Dash

Mitt Romney, President Obama, and the Presidential Debate Wrap up  via

Oh Romney you trying relate to average people is like watching Edward Scissorhands try to shake hands. #JustLetObamaWinAlready

ROMNEY $15.3 Million PROFIT from AUTO BAILOUT! But ROMNEY Wall Street BACKERS made $4 BILLION from AUTO BAILOUT!

To whom it may concern, for what its worth the Rest of The World really wants Obama to win. K? Thx.

God please be with Romney right now!God please open the ears and hearts of those blind and deaf.Amen#LNYHBT

Just saw MC Hammer is supporting Obama. Makes sense. You knew Hammer would support the more fiscally responsible candidate.

exactly! So it shouldn't be NEWS that 'those' Pakistanis are favouring Obama. We don't need to know.

Dear friends in America. Vote President Obama back in or we're going to fall out big time. Thank you x

Those are ridiculous and unnecessary accusations lol. And also wrong BTW. I cannot stand Mitt Romney. But thanks for judging!!

If mitt romney wins I'm never voting again! And The electoral college could kiss my ass..

On Obama/Romney. I feel like it's a case of going for the less destructive. I'm attaching well-informed comments

Romney's speech was great, Obama's speech goes to MUTE #RomneyRyan2012 #tcot

OBAMA is in Trouble 4 being Pro Homosexuality  Gay marriages and Pro Abortion but he is gonna win elections cz

Cousin Barack H. Obama; the 44th President of the United States and possibly could be the 45th President of the United State

maybe Obama could be the new Nader

Ch-Ch-Ch-Changes: In the final hours of the endless campaign, Myth Romney has pulled yet another chameleon move

#Autofollow Channel 4 NewsObama, Romney take long campaign journey into final dayFox NewsPresiden

I just saw you on Hannity. You don't smile as much as you used to. Wish you were running instead of less conservative Romney.

For anyone who's curious, I will be voting for Romney. Obama clearly has nothing to offer our country or he would have do

Please keep this in mind while voting for president Romney is a douchebag. Thank you.

I am hearing Romney landslide more and more. !!!

Don't even try and vote for Romney, America. #Obamaalltheway

#WhyImNotVotingForObama I am not voting for Obama because I am not a real person behind twitter acct

One day until we get to vote the Obama's off the island

I can not wait to get out of work TOMorrow and drive straight to the polling station and cast my ROMNEY/RYAN

If you're not, then you are considered a fool because wise men make wise decisions and we all know Romney for himself and millionaires alike

#Obama #Romney back on the campaign trail. Energy a big issue. Read our report on #US #energy independence at

Think Romney's election feed will be on the Comedy channel ;-)

A single term as the President looks like it aged B.Obama over 10 years; have we finally discovered time travel?! What has he seen?

MUST WATCH ===== Explosive video indictment of Obama rocks YouTube

RICHARD KOO: Barack Obama's Policies Were The Correct Response To The Recession: Richard Koo, Chief Economist of

Vote for Obama, fight climate change: N.Y. Mayor Bloomberg

Obama vs Romney: Poll predicts virtual tie in battleground states - Indian Express Mobile  via

Rember among millions of votes cast in MN, Senator Al Franken won by 316 votes. EVERY VOTE MATTERS! Vote for President Obama

so amigo, which side are you on for th US election? Stil in th Obama's corner?

Mitt Romney facing ethic charges. Profiteering 15.3 million and did not disclose

Romney Praises ChristieFor Response to Storm TO THE FACE!

Barbra Streisand Touts Obama's Record On Gay Rights - On Top Magazine | Gay news  entertainment:  via

#Obama, #Romney in key states on last day of campaign

U seen the report on Romney she did about him lying about the 5x he was drafted.

Obama, Romney blitz Ohio, Iowa on final day - President Barack Obama and Republican challenger Mitt Romney will spen

Did #Romney accomplished his goal by repeatedly misleading viewers?

Mitt Romney - the hope and change candidate  - The Commentator

Y is it dat d RFID chip would b implanted on d forehead or on d arm?D exact place Rev13vs15-18 said it would,cmon africans think.#Obama

Katy Perry Continues To Sing In Support Of Obama Across The

Don't vote for revenge, but vote for the love of your country. :By Mitt Romney

Come on Obama am rooting for you

Yeah ya. Whether Obama wins or otherwise it will be a close call. Romney has given him tight competition, much better than McCain.

President //t.co/W9Ae05TG FIREWORKS: Mitt Romney waves at the end of PA  campaig

Obama Wins Big in Harvard Student Election Poll  #obama

Voting for Obama with No Illusions: Four reasons to keep Obama in the White House and Romney out.

No poll, anywhere, has given the overall lead to Romney. Obama has won.

This is the BEST ANTI-OBAMA VIDEO ever! A definite 'Must Watch!'  CONSERVATISM IS CALLING:  via #tcot

Romney Ryan 2012 !!! We have never needed change as bad as we do now !!!

Romney evades taxes through Dutch tax evasion routeThe Volkskrant (a Dutch quality though centre left leaning newspaper) reported

On final lap, Romney, Obama focus on key states: MADISON, Wis. - President Barack Obama and Mitt Romney storm in

Saying Something Good About Obama

He's 2/9 for a reason I'll give you 10 to 1 on Romney! Haha!!

If Romney gets elected, I am seriously afraid of losing my rights as a woman. #election2012 #obamaforpresident

Most offensive thing ever: mitt romney wearing crocs

I have yet to read one pro-Romney tweet This can only be a good thing surely?

you do know that Romney has lost probably ever woman's vote in the U.S. Because of his idiotic comments?

Linda McMahon says she still backs Romney--she's just tying herself to Obama in minority neighborhoods. #sleazy

US ELECTIONS.. Hurry up and end!! I pay loads per month to SKY, all they give me is Mit fuckin' Romney and Obama..All day #notarsed

You must be joking. Can't trust you  have no idea where Mitt will land on any issue. I voted for Obama!!!

;) just up early with my Obama Warriors before Twitter goes crazy today !! One more day friend . OBAMA 2012 WOOT WOOT WOOT

All my respect for the US populace will be lost if Mitt Romney is elected. Why take such a backward step.. *facepalm*

Obama Is Crushing Mitt Romney In A Key Polling Indicator   via Desperate measures from the libs

America needs a man who is not an obvious liar. Romney seems to be a blatant, bold-faced liar. Not good for America.

#DearMrFaniKayode You're a Dad, your Kids must be really unlucky. You're attacking Obama? Have you seen his Wife  Kids? You wish right?

Romney begins final campaign blitz with reminder: 'Vote for love of country'  #2012Election #Obama #Romney

Mitt Romney is losing in Ohio. 49% Obama 44% Romney

Despite the polls, this is going to be a near historic crushing defeat for Dear Leader. #ForwardIsTheNewBackward #tcot #p2 #romney

FT backs Obama as 'better choice' president: Business title joins the Economist in supporting in  #TeamFollowBack

Obama, Romney make a mad dash in a final bid for votes: President Obama and GOP challenger Mitt Romney will spen ht

please thank joe/Alabama football for sliding one more plus into the Obama column.

all of the bail-outs begin under bush, did it not. Obama didn't take office mid-Jan of 09. Ur timeline isn't adding up.

Thousands line up to see Obama in Hollywood - Sun-Sentinel: Tampabay.comThousands line up to see Obama in Hollyw

Romney hasn't got enough of an advantage to over power the 2 term trend despite him being a great candidate #bigfan #controversial #right

Clever - dedicated to mitt romney, the GOP , faux fox news and Florida Gov. Rick Scott

I know I'm not an American but I'm a historian and I'm ready for the presidential election in USA so who is on Obama and who is on Romney?

Romney is not qualified to be President because his teleprompting skills are not up to snuff.

Batshit crazy Valerie Jarrett vows to fight election results no matter how big Romney/Ryan wins. She needs to be chained and sedated.

Political Cartoons - Obama Presidency - It's not a tax. - Washington Times:  via  #p2 #tcot

Between Oblahblah's: Voting is the BEST REVENGE. and Romney's: Vote for LOVE OF COUNTRY! . WHICH represents HOW YOU SEE #America  US?

Obama hasn't lost sleep over Sandy just like he didn't lose sleep after watching the murder of 4 Americans in the Benghazi feed.

Signed the HIRE Act (2010) The bill includes: tax cuts for small businesses who hire someone unemployed for at least two months. Obama

Romn 50.1%-49.5% Romney w minimum 271 EVs (FL, VA, CO, WI, NH) 309 EVs if he takes OHPA. Pres-elect #Romney

Since the #media has already decided #obama has won all #dems should stay home 2moro.

Hey Obama- I don't want a president who doesn't move heaven and earth to save the lives of a US Ambassador  Navy SEALS!

falsely accused #Jeep of #outsourcing #jobs, but #Romney did zero to keep #Bain f

Tim Skubick: Hurricane Sandy scenes of frustration surely won't help Obama: A hurricane on the East Coast where

obama fucks when he want to.he fucks the isrealis #amHappyWithThat

Did God Side with Obama by Bringing Hurricane Sandy? | Des Moines Register Staff Blogs  or was it Gaia, Mother Earth?

Breaking:GEN Tommy Franks, GEN Hugh Shelton Among 500 American Warriors to Run Full-Page Ad Endorsing Mitt Romney for President

tomorrow is Election Day! I can't wait to see Obama win, again :)

New York's Republican Mayor Bloomberg endorses President #Obama for re-election. Details soon

GEN Tommy Franks GEN Hugh Shelton Among 500 American Warriors to Run FullPage Ad Endorsing Mitt Romney

Ooow ya I think Obama hey who do u think

#Iraq ended by #GWB timeline but #Obama #Fails to get Status of Forces Agreement #BigFail

The only way Romney can win is via voter suppression and intimidation. It already started in Florida. #RepublicansCheat

Apparently, it's both the drone attacks *and* the Osama business. They associate them both with Obama.

Op-Eds: One from Romney, One from Obama

American's; get off your collective arses and vote. The world wants you to ensure Obama gets a 2nd term.

a pen is a better POTUS than Romney, because it supports the free word.

Oh the election is tomorrow? The only fuck I give is if Romney wins, we all need to practice abstinence for 4 years.

Damn smh but u got a point Obama is only winning by 1% last time I checked the poles

It's one thing to be hopeful and say you think Romney will win 2-3 weeks out. But one day out when it's clear that he's going to lose..

Did any one notice the Flag was Flown at Half Staff last night at #Romney Rally? Shows He Cares About #Bengahzi He h

I just hope Romney doesn't win this election

I'm #white. I'm voting for MY #President, Barack #Obama. I refuse to carry on the hate-tradition of pasty-white America  vote for whitey.

Summerfest Obama, Romney blitz swing states as Election Day nears

if Romney loses i want paul ryan, marco rubio, chris christie to run as Republican nominee

A good friend of mine is voting for Romney for the third time - once for every version of him.

Obama, Romney seek to sway Ohio voters  #News #Headlines via #newzsocial

Its a big ass romney sign on stadium  drake

this might be really stupid but do americans vote like we vote - ie voting for our local mp/party or do they actually vote for obama/romney?

So hubs think Romney will win coz he's better looking. Scary thought.

TODAY IS ELECTION DAY !!!    OBAMA  ROMNEY

Obama doesn't put out false commercials to by votes? Are you delusional that's all he does, one lie after another

If I could Vote in the US Elections I would vote for Obama #Teamobama2012

CNN poll is Romney's best of the day. A 22 point lead with indies and holding base much better than Obama. 41D/30R/2

Canne believe its been 4 years since Barack Obama was elected president. Im sure I'll be saying this in another 4 years.

On this last day of campaigning before the election-- Who is ahead in the polls--  Mitt Romney or President

Pauley your video Love you was dishonest. Obama had 2 yrs both houses to fix economy and he didn't. We are Eagle need both wings

#Toronto, if you're looking for a place to watch the U.S. election - I have one! #obama

Madison is Obama's first campaign stop Monday: President Barack Obama would start his final campaign day in Madi

Communists at Financial Times Endorse Obama  |

Question: Is the world going to end on Wednesday? Yes- If Romney wins No- If Obama stays President

You've complained for 4 years about how shitty Obama is and now is the time to change that but you'd rather stick with Obama.

If I Had The Choice I Would Pick Obama But Shoot I Aint 18 Yet

I know your down with Obama, but Mitt wants to banish the poor. You must be sat on the fence abit ? X

Us Liberals are often less motivated to get out, vote, or think our vote matters. It does! Go Vote!! It all adds up! #obama #vote #election

I'm sold--two victims of plastic surgery endorse Obama.

WOW. was carrying the Obama rally, something happened, Hecklers, and they cut the live feed. No network car

I'm beginning to get the distinct impression that some of my Obama supporting followers are getting a bit twitchy.

I was going to clean cabinets and put out mulch today but thinking I better savor this feeling I have for 2 days! Romney/Ryan, THEY ROCK !

hi!quite a masterpiece:Romney ain't any better than Obama:just bird of thesame feather

If Mitt Romney becomes president best believe me amd my mom are moving to switzerland.

Convenient Timing is revealed SUSAN RICE SUNDAY MORNING IN RE BENGHAZI  PRES. OBAMA 60 minutes PM. FINALLY, 60 minutes interview will show.

Ermagerd guise. The election is tomorrow. People who can shouls use their vote, if I could id vote #OBAMA

Billy Graham called Mormonism a cult up until last month when he endorsed Mitt Romney

I'm voting for Obama because he cares more than most and actually wants to help the country not hinder it with this caste system and racism

Romney's Lies Deconstructed and Fact-checked on YouTube

Why Obama would handle Pakistan's floods better

This should tell us something - Retired top military brass push for Romney - Washington Times:  via

Re-elect #Obama : The made-over #Romney is no alternative - #Pittsburgh  #election2012 #VA #OH #FL #CO #IA #WI #NV #PA

Please vote Obama for another 4 years.

Tomorrow yawl niggas that can vote better vote for OBAMA.Fuck A Damn Mitt Romney

toni-tan: Obama means family and no one gets left behind

Former Va Gov Wilder abandoning Obama became clear on Nov 4  . See also  .

#Celebrity #Gossip Grassroots with President Barack Obama, Eva Longoria and Sheila E.  #AutoFollowBack GGo

Fred Willard uploaded The Romney Boys Erection Eve Special! #Obama2012

I support OBAMA -- //t.co/QTZcTqNK

Voting Romney is beneath you. Period. And you know it. He has no honor. No principles. You do.

a wasted vote is a vote for someone you don't believe in. Romney is not going to save America. #GJTA

Obama holds battleground state edge

What are these CNN folks smoking?-----. Romney Gains 3 to Tie Obama in CNN's D+11 Poll  via

If Polls aer right Romney is a huge price. Melbourne Cup is on in morning. Would Americain by an apt winner?

There's no great difference between Romney and Obama. It's all 'Robama'  #Election2012

Win or lose Obama will escape what should be an impeachment trial. Everyone will be focused on taxes and economy.

Watch Romney win and fuck us all

Obama's vision of America is a Socialist one. Billionaraire Thomas Peterffy sees this happening, and knows America must be a Capitalist USA.

Terrible sports weekend. Depressed.  But a win for Obama will cure all.

My first job is to say thank you to those who voted me. Those who didn't, I'm going to get your vote next time.Barack Obama not likely

28,000 SUPPORTERS Turn Out in the Cold to See Mitt Romney in Pennsylvania! | Conservative News, Views  Books

Obama's long time Marxist pal, Bill Ayers, 'I wake up thing today destroy Capitalism'. This is what Obama thinks, too. He hates Capitalism.

#obama The way the heck will i get free from this particular?

With local electoral reform, Obama is unlikely to make it in Wexford!

Aside from #Romney losing 11/6, I want exposed as  #douchebags for their

#Axelrod Has No Response To #Ohio Early Voting Numbers  #vote #election #Obama #Obama2012 #forward2012 #wedecide #vote

Why are Mika and Joe thinking this is still a close race? #election #morningjoe #obama

Obama finally got a 3point lead right now

Cults always try to make people join them. Mormons are a cult. Mitt Romney is a Mormon. I'm not really going anywhere with this #lmao #night

No school tomorrow my pples votin for #Obama

Mr Obama. Im a US Marine. Im trained w/a bayonet. It is a vital tool in close quarter combat. You sir, have no idea what we do.#POTUS #Obama

honestly if Romney wins I'm running away

Obama will end campaign on Mon. with rallies in WI, OH, and IA, accompanied by Springsteen and JAY Z #ProtectTheFirewall

People actually think Romney will change America for the better? #Election2012

Ladies: watch Ann Romney's interview on if you're not sure..she  her son inadvertently let on what an imbalanced psycho he is

The World loves Obama. The World hated Bush! The World strongly dislikes Romney. Pakistan can kiss my ass too.

Obama needs to get more help to people on East Coast!!  They need it NOW!!!

He's more of a business man than Obama and a lot of his stuff will work but he'll leave a lot more behind than Ob will.

GREAT Romney AD!  - Secretary of jobs and stuff  via #tcot #lnyhbt

If I wasn't running late I would buy the lady holding up pro Obama signs by the entrance to 66 a coffee, guess I can thank her with my vote

Everyone get out and vote Obama tomorrow! We need all the help we can get!

Does anyone really listen to what Obama says out there??  Are taxpayers getting a fair deal?By Richard

West: Obama's Hidden Advantages Ahead of Vote via

#Forward make your transportation arrangements now to get to the polls to vote for Pres Obama Nov 7th #HopeAndChange #Revenge

Hey guys remember 6 months ago when was arguing that you had to appeal to independents to win? Romney leads with independents

Monday Morning Marriage Ref: With the election tomorrow a lot of couples are split with Romney vs Obama, how do

Will there be a difference between Obama and Romney? Probably not says Conyne: he is more of a pragmatic technocrat than it seems #OpenForum

REUTERS POLL: The Race Is Dead Even, But Obama Is Crushing Mitt Romney In The Electoral College  Infowars #News

Another five states on tap today for Romney. Let's see, FL, VA, OH, NH and MA.

Mitt Romney's Dirty Dozen  via Big Business Big enrgy Tycoons who will run USA energy If Mitt wins

I betcha Obama TODAY will speak from his dark heart with hate, anger, vile..to rally his Base.he has nothing to lose

Its over wit if dick romney win wearin my,obama shirt today

Lol just saw that my hotel is connected to the Romney/Ryan election night HQ.

Obama and Romney Blitz Battleground States -  via

Delphi Retirees Say Obama Administration Betrayed Them -BreitBart

All I know isI better not wake up Wednesday with Romney set to be the next president. GO VOTE!

busy day, for Obama and Mitt and for me, get the garden ready for winter, look after the horses, work more on my book

What is the feeling you get in your community? Obama or Romney?

Iain Duncan smith has condemned Barack Obama for USA's poor recovery from the financial crisis. People in glass houses Iain

The only way to fight voter fraud is2get out the vote We need as close to 100% of Romney voters out there Otherwise don't complain if O wins

Joe talks only about numbers where Romney does well

NetNewsLedger: Relief in sight - US Election in home stretch  #elections #tbay #usa #obama #romney

Point somewhere else is ok, except it doesn't forgive the mistakes made by Obama.  This is not about 2004, it is 2012,WAKE UP!

I can hardly wait till tomorrow,so we can all vote against socialism and for Mitt Romney !!#lnyhbt

Please Baby Jesus I hope someone got video of people begging to leave Romney rally in PA

Indeed but Romney doesn't have that woman as his running mate and Rottweiler.

Voters need to know: Romney would cut FEMA Emergency $. Think About it Every voter suffered in Tornado Ringold Georgia

Ann Romney's biggest concern if her husband is elected is his mental well-being. Let's show some compassion and make sure he isn't elected.

Tory minister Iain Duncan Smith hits out at 'appalling demonisation' of Mitt #Romney in UK  IDS: what a prick.

Going to see our future President Mitt Romney Sanford Airport! #Nobama

If I was American I'd vote #Obama because he's been the smartest US Pres. of recent times.

Good luck Pres. Obama! We are rooting for you.

Obama? It's evident you don't know what to do about #Sandy.We will help you when we vote for #Romney tomorrow. Party on, Obama! #PA #CT #NH

Win or lose, Obama's EPA plans to kill coal by the end of the month: Regardless of the election results, the Oba

Obama better when tomorrow , if not then they need to start hiring at an earlier age . Cause everybody finn to need a job !

How is it possible that this pathological liar Romney is this close to being elected?

is the kind of person who would have watched, laughed  thought it funny as Romney bullied the boy in school  cut his hair.

John McCain and Military, 500 Generals Lost Trust in Obama. This One Man has Destroyed Presidency. I Thought only Clinton would be Disgrace

as much I wish this was true Obama is going to win

I ain't gotta come tomorrow, but I hope Obama win!

She's got an Obama skull cap she wears around the house.

This morning on here is nothing but  campaign ad for Barack Obama! WJ SHAME ON YOU!

Analyst from local mandarin news: If Obama wins - Bonds, if Romney wins - Equities #US $INDU $SPX #Fed

Ok less than 24 hours til ELECTION DAY. The MSM is gonna ramp up Obama. Stay strong keep fighting good fight. The nightmare is almost over!

US voters, according to BBC global and Yahoo polls, PK and PRC are the only countries on earth that want a Romney win. #wantthatcompany?

Getting into this American election campaign even though i can't vote #election #obama

OMG tomorrow is the first time I vote! I'm excited! #OBAMA #MM

Obama bout to come on the Ricky Smiley morning show

18 ways Romney is just like George W Bush

Redskins rule means Romney wins.  World Series rule means Obama wins.  Voting this Tuesday will make the real difference. #NC5ThisMorning

All with you ian for the victory of Obama

Looking at the latest RCP numbers for VA where Obama is up. Are you worried about VA?

I will follow you and we will talk again. Obama may win the election but I don't think he will win Florida. Take care

Republicans hate America,democracy,and people of color in particular,that's why they are suppressing the vote. But Obama gonna win anyway.

Looking for Obama friendly folks at #EDU12 interested in getting together Tue night to go someplace and watch the returns. reply or dm me

I refuse to vote for Obama unless he turns me into a fully-fledged US citizen before election day.

They Want Obama To Lose So Bad Smh

reports -- Barack Obama the not-so-happy warrior:

I swear I better not wake up Wednesday and Romney is the president GO VOTE!!!!!!! #4moreyears #Obama

The save Obama at any cost media

Fatalities in Afghanistan have more than doubled under Obama's leadership than in the preceding eight years combined.

if obama knew that he didn't keep the promises he made, why would he try to become the president again!! alot of people will now hate you!!

The Dutch route: Romney dodging taxes through Netherlands? - Radio Netherlands

99-year-old woman casts first ballot - For Obama

Call me and I'll vote Obama. I was voting anyways, but it'd be cool to tell my mom.

Hope Obama storms it today/tomorrow is the other dude for real?

If I hear one more pro romney statement ill literally puke.

PLEASE CONTACT and Obama support that has not voted. We need them to vote #Mitt2012 make one final plea. RT many time

FB friend said he was 2 vote 4 candidate that wouldn't bow 2 General Zod. Guess he's not voting 4 Obama b/c he's bowed 2 pretty much every1

Um. Obama won't actually stop being President until January when, and if, Romney wins the election tomorrow.

Joanne #lielikemitt mostly taken directly from #mitt unlike #tcot #obama lies claims that r taken from the azz of tcot's

Why is stank ass Romney in the lead ?

McCain says he knows most vets are furious about Benghazi BC those at Romney events are mad. This read of public is why he's a Senator still

At work super crunk and ready to cast my vote for President Obama!!! you guys are the (cont)

Greetings from the #campaign trail, part II #obama#election2012#politics

Click Obama name FIRST for all those voting for him

Believe? 'Skins loss predicts Romney win: Just two days before Election Day, four major sports supersti  #phoenix

got everybody tuned it and turnt tf up for Obama 2012!!!! #salute

. Larry sabato just projected Obama win.

I will state unequivocally that Mitt Romney is a many of honor who has been honest in his dealings with his

Y'all remember how much Hope Obama gave us in 2008?! Let's move FORWARD! 4 more years! #VOTE #Obama2k12

Yeah. Us light skinned folks gotta represent for Obama  ish ya know?

NPR found a Romney voter who calls Obama a weak leader. I partly agree. He also backs Romney due togas prices. Really?

KIds are allowed at Obama rallies - and then THEY'RE ALLOWED TO LEAVE!!  #RomneyRallyHostages

Mitt Romney is painting his vision of the future with disappearing ink. It suits his revisionist history, hidden agenda  lack of character

The choice is not between Obama  Romney. It's between a new  sound business model or continuing hoping that things will improve.

#Forward2012 Determination - Obama for America TV Ad:  via

AMERICA !! Very Important days ahead ! VOTE Obama ! THE POTUS ! #elections  #EqualityMatters #Ohio #Florida come on !!

#Forward Vote for Obama and go backward, not forward.  He wants to diminish the USA.  He does not love this country--he wants to destroy it!

Hope and pray everyday that we elect Mitt Romney on Election Day. #lnyhbt

this election ish is getting out of hand to much racist shit, i wouldn't be surprise if Obama like phuck this igno

Funny how people still think it matters whether you vote #Obama or #Romney. Large corporations run the world, period.

I voted for Romney, but my gut says Obama is going to win.  I hope I am wrong.

I asked Shae what she was doing tomorrow.. she said Im resting just in case Romney win i might have to fight his ass..

during mail bag people accused you guys of being biased for OBAMA! I will never call you guys biased again! Fun show 2day

how you think we feelevery other commercial is how Romney can do Ohio better!! FOH!!

The liberals are asking us ti give Obama time and we feel 25 to life would be appropriate- Jay Leno

#Jeep, an Obama fav, looks to shift production to #CHINA!! Washington Exr:  BAD news for #uaw and

Kim from Wisconsin shares why she's changing her vote from Pres. Obama to Mitt Romney. Watch at  via

hehehe I wanna change my name cause the Obama thing is gettin annoying

My phone has been ringing off the hook from Obama supporters! Oh yea, and Ron Paul!

BringItHome! President Obama: What We're Fighting For

Tomorrow there is no TV. Basically every channel will be about Obama vs. Romney. It's going to be boring.

Daily Kos: President Obama, Please Call Out Republican Obstruction

I get to do my English coursework on how Romney is a twat.

Obama wants your children for the Muslim Brotherhood

Just can't believe America could vote against Obama!

I will not be able to sleep tonight, voting tomorrow for Romney.  Praying for patients today

We need Obama back . Act like you remember . We need Obama back, please vote this November . #radiocommercial

500 Former Military Leaders Take Out Ad to Endorse Mitt Romney  THEY KNOW THAT BHO IS NO COMMANDER IN CHIEF #war #tcot

Go to Youtube and type: Obama mockz bible

#Obama free the Five. This Nov 5th, as each 5th, for the #CubanFive. Free the truth #Washington #Toronto #Cuba #Miami

Republicans Blame Sandy for Killing Romney's Momentum: The election is still a day away, but the politic  taw #US

actually your ignorant because he isn't perfect but a whole lot better than Myth Romney is.

Like all top Democrats, has tied herself so closely to Obama that when he loses, she will have nothing left. #FL23

Anybody else nervous about the fact tomorrow Romney might be your president

After everyone votes wonder what these people are going to do when they find out who wins. If Obama wins I'm still going to struggle if

who are you cheering for tomorrow, Obama or the other guy?

But glad to see helli voting now lets c these numbers changin. Obama better be ahead. I don't understand how they been

What has Obama has promised Bill Clinton in exchange for dragging O across the finish line, after decimating his Hil's political career?

I don't have the greatest memory in the world but I DO remember Romney's momentum was fading BEFORE Sandy hit.

Presidential Election: Where Do Obama, Romney Stand On Issues Important To Young Voters?: Source: www.mt

Obama, Romney or MAGNITUDE. I know who i'd vote 4, POP POP!

Barack Hussein Obama implemented Socialist policies, gave US a deficit of over $5 trillion, didn't pass a budget, w/o 1 Repub. on Healthcare

OK, Joe Scarborough calls Fl, NC and VA for Romney.

Much like Romney, I'm also popular with married white men who didn't get a college education.

me too. I like Obama, not thrilled with his performance, but considering the congress - meh. Romney - well *shudder*

Joseline and Stevie J endorsing President Obama

I'm not American, but feel scared that Mitt Romney could be elected as president. Please vote if you are able

Campaign 2012: Obama would be the choice for non-Americans if they could vote.

- Romney whole 4 years gone be like walkin circles around a lemon lot if he win.

The wallstreet bailout was Bushes baby,Obama was not president yet.

Retired top military brass push for Romney - Washington Times:  via

Romney is a dick and has no respect for anyone

Bill I voted for Obama because I've seen the pattern used by the Republicans in Africa.this is why Africa is in such disarray

Happy #ElectionEve! Hoping and praying Gov. Romney will bring home the W tomorrow but will admit it is not looking good. Go vote, friends!

Today, Obama ground events in Madison WI w Columbus #Ohio w  Des Moines IA w Michelle #ElectionEve

First Tweet of the week: GO OBAMA!!!

Gov. Romney has cjanged his card in front of the podium frequently.

C-SPAN No Bishop Romney has achieved his mission: Billy graham got mormism of his cultsite.Mormon is now a religion, not a cult.!!!

The boss and the pres expected downtown in about 3 hours.  Are you ready? #Obama #Madison #election2012 #crunchtime

Does this fag Obama really have jay z on his commercial

toss up states represent 146 electoral votes - if the polls were dead accurate, Obama would win electoral vote 303-235

The link works.. OBAMA and SOROS want to cut military benefits.

Y'all get out head n #Vote man the thirst is so real to beat Obama they canceling school for two days Since

President Obama  Thank YOU!    You are USA President Excellent!

The American economy is fueled by freedom -  Mitt Romney

Early Voting May Doom Romney in Nevada

I swear to God if Romney wins tomorrow

Love how the media thinks everything that comes out of #Obama's mouth is pure truth even though he's broken every promise he made! #Nobama

The chance Romney will make the right decision in any situation with 2 options is never greater than 50%  likely less if he applies himself

Majority of people who are voting for Mitt Romney are racist. Their only purpose for voting for Romney is because he i

We saw this in the clouds yesterday while waiting for Obama to come out. It looked so dope. At the end of th

All u need to know about tomorrow in 2 words: Superstorm Sandy. Obama passed the Commander-in-Chief test. Romney failed.

Attacks like this will happen. Let's review-I never blamed this on Obama. I said our agencies failed to see it.

Riffed w Andrew Keegan tonight about the absurdity of this election. Consensus: Romney's definitely a hologram

come to america and vote for obama u have to help ur fans

Wish i coulda called in today and checked Obama out on State st

Go #Romney! It's Time America.It Is About Choice  Time to move #Forward without #Obama

If Romney wins we're going to war.#lmao #seeya.

Obama wayforward, change must be accomplished!!!!

[ANC] Rood: Superstorm Sandy helped the Obama campaign, but many also question why recovery is slow #primetime

I can't wait for tomorrow to be over so Obama can be around for another four years and idiotic Romney supporters can STFU.

my credit score hasnt dropped a number at all. obama passed health care reform, passed the stimulus package. ended war in iraq

I wish I could see Obama today.

Hey Obama, Going on 8th day no power in Pt Pl NJ. Have not seen any FEMA  just fat ass Nepolitano on tv for photo op just like you!

Call me Michelle Obama baby.

[News] Paul Ryan: Obama policies threaten 'Judeo-Christian values' - Washington Post (blog): New York Times (blo

can some 1 PLEASE EXPLAIN to me why media isn't killing Obama for his handling of Sandy the way they did Bush

Romney is going to make it so hard for us trying to get threw college.

Romney Ryan Kick Ass:  via

Why Barack Obama? Heckle Romney instead. #uselection

I'm a big conservative. Just looked at the updated electoral map. Really no way Romney can win. Hope I'm wrong. But probably not.

don't forget Michael Barone as well predicting a Romney big win.  And as well.

Obama and the Middle East: hard times to be a realist by Mattia Toaldo  via

I would like to be an American only to give my vote to #Obama. #ObamaForPresident

Why I'm voting for President Obama Why I'm voting for President Obama in today's podcast

Next time I go to war I want it to be #romney as my CINC. Don't think he'll screen my distress calls #BENGHAZI #tcot

Video: Romney holds rally in Colorado

#REMEMBER when Obama took Chrysler Dealership from Republicans and gave them to Democrat Cronies? #TCOT #P2

Original Obamaphone Lady: Obama Voter Says Vote for Obama because he gives a free Phone

If you aren't voting for Obama idc if you vote. Real talk. So don't even tell me unless you voted him

Ladies, if you're pro choice, before you jump on Romney's bandwagon you betta read Roe v. Wade because that will pr

Because you can't poll cell phone only users, cell phones will always slew republican. Young, Obama leaning voters don't have land lines.

Office people talking about campaign annoyance: 40 problem -- Romney landline calls  40 problem -- Obama emails  #demographics

Wait, what? Mitt Romney's son is called Matt. One vowel change. That's how much imagination he has.

#Forward MT Obama's America: we're adding people to the food stamp rolls at a rate 75x faster than we are cr

If Romney wins, I have a feeling we'll see his faceplate open and reveal a tiny alien inside.

haha mine too. Obama's bio is like a page long Romney's is half a page

I don't think I no how to vote?!! I Judy no its today! #goodluck #obama

Daily Kos: If you care about the economy, pay attention to Europe, and reelect President Obama  via

I dnt fuck with Mitt Romney type people!

Local station played clip of Romney rally followed by Obama. Romney got raucous response. Obama got crickets chirping.

LYONS: Obama needs to come clean on what happened in Benghazi - Washington Times

Final battle for the White House begins: Polls show Obama with a modest lead over Romney or put the rivals neck- ht

I predict, the looser will send us into a seemingly endless recount.  That will probably be President Obama.

If Obama wins, will Republicans move farther to the right and run David Duke in 2016?

Paul Ryan is a fundamentalist and so are the Romney Ryan background players. They want all out war in Iran How is this close

It's a 5-rally day for Mitt Romney. He campaigns in Florida, Virginia (2 events), Ohio and New Hampshire.

So it's official: Romney paid zero taxes from 1996 to 2009.

vote for Obama or we could be homeless

VIDEO - How to know Who to vote for- a Changing America - Is there any Hope ?  #vote #obama #romney #america

Nevada Union Registers Non-citizens to Vote, Threatens Them   via Obama's UNIONS = thugs and mobsters.

Romney Rallies Voters in Bucks County

my bestfriend is voting for mitt Romney i think this is a dilemma

My teacher think Obama gone lose -_-!

Remember what happened last time? They came in with ONE GOALmake Obama unsuccessfullol but what about the interest of the people?!

Bigger, Better America  Mitt Romney loves America, and with a true leader WE can build America exceptionalism! GO Mitt

THIS IS WHAT CORP AMERICA LOOKS LIKE - President Of Florida-Based Company Threatens To Fire Employees If Romney Loses

Next president is likely to appoint 2 Supreme Court justices. Do you want Romney's pro-1% picks or PBO's pro-99% choic

I love America: super power, minimal government and freedom.  If you stand for that, stand for Romney.  #romneyryan2012

#Obama putting on a free concert ft Jay-Z  Springsteen, a 'fleet' of coaches waiting to take the crowed straight to early voting offices!

You think Mitt Romney will release his tax returns today? [Or details on his mathematically-impossible economic plan?]

Great crowd in Sanford for Governor Romney!

I dont see the importance, Obama is going to win RI, and it only gets two electoral vote, which doesn't even make a difference

OBAMA BOWING SAUDI KING, NEVER FORGET THIS PIC

in 2012 it was #Obama aided by #PlannedParenthood that drove the wedge of abortion into the election #AbortionPresident #VoteProlife #110612

Obama is not an African-American. There is no place called Africa-America O the U.S Map he black Period.

If Obama is the answer then how stupid was the question?

It will be a giant step #Forward for freedom and the rule of law to see Obama step to the mike to concede defeat tomorrow night.

Watch:  Election 2012: Will Mitt Romney Upset President Obama?: A new poll shows a slight edge for president Oba

How can Obama work with a teaparty house when they all work for Grover Norquist? #tcot #p2

TheBest Revenge: Pointing Out that Romney Keeps Pretending to Be Stupid. Or That He Really IS Stupid.

Bailedout Division of #GM sells in Bankruptcy to Billionaire #Obama Supporter   #oh #obama2012 #tcot

Citing more than 20,000 standing in the cold for Romney in PA

WeAre One- Obama/MLK mix #salute

Amen-Hope Obama wins  we dont have to look at that sneering face!! Cant be soon nuf

I've decided if Romney win's im packing  moving to England.

Its the voters in the small towns of Ohio and in the suburbs of Cleveland, ColumbusCincinnatiDayton who will  vote for Romney.

Europeans are overwhelmingly for Obama. They will not miss Mitt.

I believe as you do Obama has the votes to carry Florida - but will they count them?

Come on Florida!! If Obama wins Florida he wins the white house!!!!

I'm not going to hold my breath. Candidate Romney hasn't even taken a single reporter's question in almost an entire month.

I don't think a person in America chooses to be poor. Think about the people that's poor and trying go out and vote! Obama 2012

#EBooks Obama implicates Romney as 'bestseller of untruthful facts' in last Ohio rally: US

BREAKING: Mitt Romney charged with breaking federal ethics law!

Madisonians pack Martin Luther King Jr. Blvd. for Springsteen and Obama rally.

xD Mitt Romney's probably gonna win. Don't kill yourselves or move, he's not hitler.

Interesting that Mayor Bloomberg endorsed Obama because of his stand on climate change.  Grassroots has grabbed onto the initiative long ago

Every family has at least 1 person in their family on assistance or don't have healthcare and could be dying. Go out and vote Obama 2012

On my way! To class then to see Barack Obama, Jay Z,

MT Bill Clinton's four events today for Pres Obama will bring his total to 37. That's 36 more than he did for Al Gore in 2000.

And that will disallow them for trying again in the near future. So they will play it off as if we didn't like Obama.

Racial divide worst under Obama

try living in Utah. They LOVE Romney here and get openly racist and evil about It's disgusting.

I heard that Obama's approval rate was so low, Kenyans are accusing their President of being born in the United States

Let's make sure Romney gets a chance to test that.

to save this country from ruin, which is where Obama is taking us.

Small minded attacks = Romney and Ryan lies = Obama victory = America wins. #ObamaBiden2012

Obama ain't goin nowhere so bow muthafuckas

Local #FL Dem election supervisor decided to have Sun Only Democrat voting day (forgot 2tell Rep of decision)VoteVOTvoteVOTE  #MITT #Romney

ROMNEY RYAN 2012 face it we can't afford four more years of this quack #Merica

IDC if Obama or Romney win, I still gotta go out and Get Paid, Never needed government assistance, why u shook tho?

Ari Berman on Democracy Now!: Florida early voting hours cut, Ohio Romney people affect turnout through voter ID #GOPfraud #votersuppression

Romney Owned Voting Machines Get Software Patches Days Before Election  via

Drudge is showing Rasmussen # in red with Romney up 1 today!!!

The Washington Redskins lost to the Carolina Panthers which according to the rule spells defeat for Obama.

No #Democrat Senator/Representative running for re-election has spoken out against Obama's lies on #Benghazi. Dont forget on

#tonytrupiano we want Barack Husain Obama out of office because he is a failure, it has nothing to do with him being 1/2 white  1/2 black!

Romney become president da world gonna end

After canvassing in Wake County yesterday for Obama for America, and in Durham yesterday, I am hopeful.  #VoteforObama

So first thing this morning I get a polling email stating that Obama is poised to win a second term. Being a

Do u have inside info about the Romney Family Owned Voting Machines plan to FLIP Votes from Pres Obama to Romney in ur gut

Fuck Romney, Obama will win anyways

might be crazy to think (more like hope  pray) that Romney wins, makes no wars, revives economy. Worthy causes if I'm wrong  hopes crushed

Romney slams stronger-than-expected jobs report

Obama shuts down dispensaries. Patients find health benefits in weed. A Yale study says alcohol, tobacco bigger gateway drugs

watching closely.praying for Romney/Ryan win, we need a leader in the White House!

Rasmussen poll.. Romney's lead expands w/ Indys to 15%

ohna, he won't win. Romney is

You're hoping Obama is Carter. He's not. Educate yourself. Foreign affairs #thisishard

RT If Romney Is President , One Job Ain't Gone Be Enough !. #TeamOBAMA .

Case Closed: If Moderate Voters See This Video, It;s Over for Obama

Barack Obama vs Mitt Romney. Epic Rap Battles Of History Season 2. Abe won  via

Romney evades tax by short cut through Netherlands - Economics - UK  TAX CHEAT #p1 #tcot #dems #gop

I uploaded a video  Where was Obama born?

Romney is a liar, got all these other color people believing he worth it.

I feel like either way Romney and Obama are both going to screw up anyways idk.

Barack Obama didn't care about your jobs for 4 years, why should you care about his for the next four - Vote in less than 24 hrs

As a medical worker, I am offended by Mitt Romney's go to the Emergency Room for health care!  #OuttaBeAshamed

Public Records Reveal Romney Profited From Corruption, Fraud, and Racketeering at Bain

Romney and Obama are depending on Ohio tomorrow Dear Ohio, DON'T LET ANYONE IN THE STATE VOTE TOMORROW! Lol

Now he here trying to tell this special needs man he needs to vote for Romney !

The price is wrong, Mit! Vote 1, Obama.

Race42012 Electoral Map: Crowded House Edition  #tcot #romney #obama

Michele Obama is the first lady, Romny's wife is not.  It is sad that you disrespect Michele in that way.  Shame!!!

Report: The Mitt Romney supported 'Ryan plan' cuts $810 billion from Medicaid

Youtube is advertising Obama. I will punch someone on the face.

I am actually AFRAID of Romney winning tomorrow. If he does, I can kiss my rights and my hopes for the future goodbye.

aint no one finna spread in the hood, if romney win lol

He would, but Obama's 'reputation' is more important than people.

Oh that's too bad!! We had a great time with Gov Walker, Ron Johnson, Reid Ribble, John Macco, Matt and Josh Romney, etc.

Romney draws a crowd of nearly 30,000 near Bucks county. Really impressive rally.

I'm thinking Romney has another problem. It's his hair. I can't even take Obama seriously in that

Romney can actually win this election. The only way to prevent him is by using your social media platforms t

Check out  The Destructive President about president obama read it before nov election

Obama left this school dirty af .. That's not how you get votes.

Everything on the CNN app is Romney and Obama -.-

Thousands line up to see Obama in Madison: Thousands of people have lined up this morning waiting to  #Chicago #News

Final Rasmussen National R 49 - O 48. Final VA R 50 - O 48. In VA Romney leads w/ Indies 21 pts. Let's take it home! More

These were not minorities being fired these were white people being fired.  Romney sits there and talks about love of country.

The shocking comment Barack Obama does not want you to hear!:  via

If you have NOT went out  vote please go do so ASAP ! Obama needs us more than ever ! #goVote #obama2012

Daily Kos: ***Breaking*** Dutch tax dodge for Mitt Romney: 1994 - 2009?  via

we have some racist mofos in 1st block . don' be mad 'cause Obama winnin` #obama2012

THIS shows that you don't understand what the 'free enterprise system' is. You've painted Romney a simple 'cartoon' Grow up

I can't believe tomorrow is Election Day; I'm excited, worried (Romney is lurking)  hopeful #4moreyears #womenforObama

Everybody please vote for tomorrow .. If #Romney wins the world gon end -__- #seriousTweet #Obama2012 #ObamaBiden2012

yeah Romney is down here at the moment

If Romney wins tomorrow, I will lose complete faith in humanity.

Attention: Voting for Mitt Romney will be held on Tuesday November 6. Those voting for President Obama are to vote Wednesday November 7.

Atlas Exclusive: Robert Spencer: Can We Survive Four More Years of Obama? via Atlas Shrugs - Can

People waiting 6-7 hrs to vote in FL. Of course they are making it as difficult as possible for people.  Why make it easy if Obama may win?

On the road to Casas Grandes, Chihuahua, to find out how Mitt Romney's Mexican cousins feel about tomorrow's election.

Follow Vote for Obama! Party with us!

lol won't need to he's hell bent on destroying Obama care he won't cut Federal law enforcement payroll that's Presidential Suicide

Let Obama become President again..Someone need to ruin USA and it is he who can do it the best.. #BestWishes

What President Obama really said in that '60 Minutes' interview about #Benghazi - Fox News  -more unraveling by #CBS

Obama is going hard with advertisements on youtube

Funny all these woman stars not affected by Obama's policies, are all for him. Maybe she thinks it will get her more work.

Michelle Obama is who young girls NEED to be looking up to. Not Rihanna,Nicki

Romney's spending his last day campaigning in three states he was supposed to have locked down months ago: FL, VA and NH. #Defense

Obama has sucked up more tv air time in the past four years than anything else, I'm a little tired of seeing him  the wife.

Mitt Romney holding strong 5-point lead in FLORIDA day before the election! Make it happen there. Vote Debbie Wasserman Shultz Out!

Morris and Barone, two good pollsters are predicting a Romney landslide. #ThatsWhatWeNeed #MakeYourVoteCount #MakeYourVoiceHeard

NY's always been strong blue.  NJ may've been won due to Obama's helping out Sandy victims. All will get a vote, somehow.

I'm locking my mom in my house tomorrow so she can't go vote for Romney

Any Americans that don't go out and vote for #obama Tomorrow and make sure romney doesn't win, will be found by me and kicked in the balls

A character from Mad Men, whose mannerisms I think resemble Romney's.

Thank you so much for giving us real numbers to understand these polls so many polls are skewed to reelect Obama

obama hangs from noose at shell gas station

Hell yeah Obama is going to win.look at the following he has!

completely agree, my guy wants Jill Stein but a Romney presidency horrifies me on so many levels

MT Of the millions of $ of political ads I have seen today only I remember is Cher :'Don't let Romney tur

Hah! Obama Cuts Ad Promoting His Faith (Video)  via

I just read 85% pro-Romney coming from the American in Isreal vote.

If Romney is elected do you think there will be a run on abortions like there was on ammo when Obama was elected?

Fuck it I'm gonna vote Romney

One look at this #TeamObama Twitter timeline  reveals why 42% of #Obama supporters have a criminal record. #Vote

NewsBusters- Homer Simpson Votes For Romney, Gets Outsourced To China:

This Is Your Wife, Mom, Sisters, Aunts And Kids Mitt Romney Talking About.                                 #

President Obama will never forget those who have served this country and their families:

i can't see myself voting for obama or romney this year so i'm going to pass. they're lying. i'll be at work really improving my economy

Republicans want to put all the financial debt on Obama, I think they forgot Bush had an 8yr term that contributed to that debt.

How do I vote in this US talent thingy? I like the Obama fella. Is there a text line or something?

If Romney win I aint gonna trip, Clinton gonna kill his chance at a second term

* U got the idea:  Correction: Under Obama, 30 million people without health insurance will NOW  h

It's not fair to say Mitt Romney has hired ALL of George W. Bush's advisors-- he dumped the two black ones (Condi, Powell). True story.

I guess if your american and you don't vote Obama I just can't cope with you

If Romney gets elected, I'm moving to Canada.

#Savannah #Teaparty Meet at Abercorn/DeRenne today at 4:00 - march with more Tea Party people to remind the commuters to vote for Romney

Sandy becoming Obama's Katrina, media silent   via

why didn't you just put Obama? Lol

One of Obama's biggest supporters is the Moslem Brothas

Barack Obama doesn't like ice cream. As a teenager, he worked in a Baskin-Robbins which is probably what has put him of

Thanks Obama for the affordable Healthcare Bill!

Romney will carry PA tomorro just as likely as me voting for you in 2014 Not gonna happen bud

Final battle for the White House begins: Polls show Obama with a modest lead over Romney or put the rivals neck-and-neck in what is o

Romney and America's biggest tax break: Will he change it to help pay for his tax plan?

TUCKER CARLSON AND NEIL PATEL: Wave goodbye to the Obama #media

Dear America,If you elect Romney, we're no longer talking. Sincerely,The world.

This 9:10 class is like Romney winning the election #EpicFail

What Would A Romney Win Mean For Africa? - Ventures Africa  via

Mitt Romney holds slim lead in new QStarNews presidential poll  via

predicts Obama will win 290-248 thanks to Hurricane Sandy and Chris Christie. That means it'll probably happen.

rt [new article] Nov. 4: Did Hurricane Sandy Blow Romney Off Course?

Paul Ryan Says Obama Would Compromise 'Judeo-Christian Western Civilization Values'; last minute Religious Fear Mongering by BIG MONEY

Romney gone pull a Bush move y'all see that cracker ain paying taxes already his punk ass

#Obama is in a great position! When he loses his job, under #Romney he'll at least be able to find a new one. #jobs #RomneyRyan2012

If you want to see Obama stay in the office then tomorrow get out there and vote. It all comes down to this!! #ForwardNotback2012

Sarah Palin: Romney 'Deserves A Chance To Lead'

If Bill Clinton had the flexibility Obama spoke of to Medvedev, he'd never leave his bedroom.

Haaretz Endorses Obama, Calling Him 'good for Israel'  *Maybe the neocons can now take down the #Israel hash tags

Obama is the political equivalent of the Chicago Cubs. Always promising that next year will be better.

If Obama loseNiggas gon be at Romney head..

Tomorrow the poor and the workers has got A big responsibility to vote for Obama. Your pay check depends on it. Don't be misled, its up to U

Experts studied Romney's healthcare plans, and came up with a lot of questions |

VIDEO: Heckler handcuffed, dragged out of Obama rally - VIDEO: Heckler handcuffed, dragged out of Obama rally(

absentee ballot voting tomoro for none other than cap'n crunch. I betcha obama and romney can't crunchatize anybody.

Obama presses to drive core supporters and wayward backers to the polls, while Romney reaches for an upset victory |

Like he ordered fuckin scum. If you vote for him you support innocent people dying. Fuckin Arab scrub bitch. #VOTE # ROMNEY #ROMNEY #ROMNEY

already thought about the next 4 years that's why I'm voting for Romney

Why Romney may face UAW ethics complaint for allegedly hiding auto bailout profits

TkU4rt-I've spoken w/100's of ppl  determined that 2 many ppl demand 2 much of Obama in such a short period of time.

Frostbitten rally-goers barred from leaving Romney rally, begged reporters and news outlets for help.

I got a ticket to see Obama and jay z in Columbus if someone want it

All things considered, yeah, I want my President to slow the rise of the oceans and heal the planet. #Romney #FAIL #Sandy

I, for one, will welcome our new Romney overlord! #auspol

One of my co workers damaged his truck by running over Obama yard signs this weekend. How yolo is that

Interesting; the wiki link for obama care suggests otherwise:

Police expect 20,000-25,000 people to watch #Obama, #Springsteen in Madison. #ObamaMadison #WIVote

Members are you tired of Union bosses putting your money where their mouth is - vote Romney Ryan!

I'm sure Houston will go for Obama. That might explain why some right wing PAC is spending air time showing anti-Obama ads.

im voting for Romney whole t lmfao

If Obama wins I'm leaving the country. If Romney wins I'm leaving the country. This isn't a political post I just like traveling.

Vote Obama: die a slow painful death. Vote Romney: die a violent fast death. Then if you don't vote they choose How you die. #USelection

Rove Predicts Romney Wins 280 EVs  #tcot #tlot #bcot #ccot #gop #nra #ocra #sgp #teaparty #twis

So I'm watching #foxbusiness and I swear they just just showed a Romney campaign in Florida with 3000 ppl I heard 4 more yrs.

Newsday Backs Romney; Says Obama Failed to Deliver on Promises  via

#Yahoo #News Mavs' Carter says hosting Obama for fundraiser was 'honor'  #TFW Soo

Change will not come if we wait for some other person. We are the ones we've been waiting for. We are the change that we seek.- Barak Obama

More lies. With Obama, its his way or the highway. He DICTATES, not cooperates. Dump this pig.

#Obama He's not set foot in Kenya, right?

#LieLikeObama Obama:  I didn't remove the work requirement for welfare  #LieLikeMSM

but what if obama has a megaprayer as well??? merge conflict?

Mitt Romney was a severely conservative Governor. #douchiestMittRomneyLies

Romney is just robot. He will only help his RICH friends who invest in multi-million dollar deals to make them more $! Wake up!

Obama-Funded (with our tax money) Syrian Rebels Broadcast Torture Videos

Ben a fair weather voter??  U have a candidate on the ballot, but voting for Romney? Way to not make a stand.

hmmmm i forgot about the patriot act that obama signed.that's why voting isn't on my priority list.

Obama better win this election! A little nervous but hopeful!

be still my heart! Dad actually voted Obama this time! WEW

You could call me a model now. Got my picture taken for the Obama campaign. #modelstatus

in all seriousness I liked our LiL back  forth. I hope the best man for the job wins!  If Obama winsill be waiting for tou

I vote for the first time tomorrow #2012  #Obama

Not in this lifetime, you are pathetic, begging for votes.I am voting for Obama, because he is the better man for the job! Romney lies!

So, I am to vote for Mitt Romney tomorrow, correct?

I want to go see Obama!!!

no more Obama vs Romney and ppl can get back to regular life

I can't wait to rock my #Obama shirt tomorrow! I love my President!

My lil sis bre: who you voting for jasz.     Jasz: mitt Romney                                     me:get the fuck out ctfu my best silly

I voted for President Barack Obama because he is the best candidate in my eyes not because he looks like me

Romney stop your lying, pack up your bags and go home to Mexico cause we do not want you here

RT Obama added more debt in 4 years than Bush did in eight. What's it going to look like in 4 more yrs? #RomneyRyan2012 #1MoreDay

Pete please share this Mitt Romney diss i did Hope u da family are well Edo

I don't fully understand why some people are voting for Romney..

Chuck like you the white vote is not for Romney but against Obama because of race. That much hate is still in America. Shameful.

There's never been a more radical militant abortionist president than Barack Hussein Obama. he's president who loves death, even born alive

10-1 is a prop bet that Romney will get between 289-309 electoral votes; 6-1 between 270-299. 2-1 on Obama between 289-309.

Romney going to win I believe.

If Romney wins I'm not moving anywhere .

Re: whoever wins Ohio win the whole bag of worms: If you're so convinced that Obama is the One to lead us for an

My brother made a good point we can vote obama til we blue n the face but if congress is mostly republican they wont pass his laws

Republicans now campaign to and will govern to please the extremist elements of their party. #Romney #election2012 #Obama

Haha! Romney is quite funny!! Romney to Women at Wendy's: 'Can I Have a French Fry?  I Won't Double Dip'

Obama is angry - he knows he failed  - vote for jobs, leadership, our children, life, freedom, American security. #tcot

I am not a Jew but see Obama's treatment of Israel as the same betrayal as those of my countrymen who installed a socialist

I can never get a good picture of me in my Texans for Obama shirt.

Obama/Romney campaigns bring MN into the race at last minute.

The Obama paint job is already coveted with Romney on Beta bridge #playon

DONT FORGET VOTE TOMORROW FOR OBAMA #TEAMOBAMA

RT if you're voting for Obama tomorrow! We need him for another 4yrs!!

Interesting. At age six, Obama told his new class he wanted to be president. Now that is follow through.

I'm still waiting for some evidence of the positive action Obama's tenure has had, nothing but more media hype and empty promises

Dont get mad if Romney wins  take away them food stamps, voteee.

I can't get over Romney and Ryan. Get back to 1794! Neanderthals! Backward redneck people shouldn't be given this power! #monobama!

Obama and Romney can look an awful lot similar . is there another option?  via

After seeing what SNL did w/ the Christie/Obama stuff Saturday, I am disappointed they handled it sarcastically. Devoid of any real humor.

Obama/Biden: We are better than the other guys  we're working on it. #Vote

I predict an Obama win in New Jersey by 3 billion.

Delphi (Romney company) buys China factories after firing 25K US workers. WHO'S THE PROBLEM?  VOTE #OBAMA #tcot #INGov

Wave good bye to the Obama media after this election :

Slate writers reveal their votes. 29 Barack Obama, 2 Mitt Romney, 2 Gary Johnson, 1 Jill Stein, 1 nobody.  #tcot

Major reason for Obama to win is because it will annoy a lot of people who deserve to be annoyed.

Make sure that everyone goes and votes tomorrow for Barack Obama no drama every vote counts!!! RT

Romney could win. The moon could also suddenly veer off course and crash into the Pacific Ocean.

trust me I'm up to date lmao, the governments fucked and romney is gonna win and it's gonna be another hitler era

Do Romney and his party believe in the Constitution ? Why are they suppressing votes across the country? Trying to cheat?

#desperate YOU forget #obama #Benghazi an #WeLEAVEnoONEbehind an you left4men anYOUwatched them DIE #7hoursofhell

The Road to November 6th: President Obama in Bristow, Virginia  #txdems #P2

I cannot wait to vote Obama out of office tomorrow #RomneyRyan2012

Gary Johnson beating Romney and Obama in Arkansas early voting

Hurricane Sandy -  Mayor Bloomberg  Says Obama:  via

Need to Know News: Obama, Romney in final bid for votes; FBI to question  - CNN (blog)

I am too. I think it's Obama's ceiling though.

30 liberal  newspapers who endorced BO 4 years ago switched to endorse Mitt Romney including the 3 largest in NYC

Maybe Romney will finally lay out his plan today? #NovemberSurprise?

Pretty sure Ann Romney is the Boogeyman.

I bet if they announce Romney as the winner tomorrow it'll feel like back in the day when someone would beat The Rock for the championship.

#Obama created more private sector jobs in 8mths than Bush did in 8yrs..yeah clearly that black guy in da WH is outta control #Romney2012!.

The Most Devastating Anti-Obama Election Video of 2012 Make Video Viral:  OBAMA HAS PLAYED SO MUCH GOLF!

#Obama urges voters to take 'revenge' on Election Day, Romney team rips 'terrible' message  He is so unpresidential!

1 more day  we can say bye to campaign ads  let Obama get back to running the country for the next 4 years. yet, i might miss it a bit.

LET ME FUCK YOU AT THE VOTING POLLS WHILE YO ASS PRESSING ALL THE BUTTONS. SCREAM OBAMA IN DA MISSIONARY POSITION TOGETHER.

please help this video of #Romney insane religious thinking go viral  #tcot #p2

Its Gone Be Back To Slavery With Romney In Office Boa

Yeah, Mississippi is a red state but I'm still casting my vote for President Obama

In Chicago! Just picked up my Media Credentials from The Obama Campaign!

Africa has more than 50 countries. Isn't it a lot to expect Romney to know more beyond say Libya and Egypt?

Must watch ----  ----- Obama is a joke, it doesn't matter if you are Democrat or Republican. #mntc #stribpol #narn

How can anyone with half a brain think #Obama deserves a 2nd term?!  I just don't get it!!??

back to 2000 ? Bush v Gore. If close in ecv. It could happen the in one or two states the legislator may not vote for Obama

I got a feeling my government teacher voted for Romney

Attention Black Girls: Voting for Obama gets you free Remy Weave for a year! Go Vote!!

Well I'am not from U.S but I totally love and respect obama..I think he is the besti know he will winwish him all the best #Obama2012

White chick at my job gne say she voting for Romney cause obama sent all the troops to Iraq dumb broad

Wouldn't it be funny if all Mitt Romney got was 47% of the vote?

Though not American,me  many here in kenya wish him another 4 yrs in white hse!Go Obama!

I hate cam Newton but ill love him if he cost obama his job. when skins loose before election so does pres

Looks like voter suppression will lock up Florida for Romney

Mitt Romney laid out a clear-cut and easily understood vision for America. What did BHO put forward? Gun running, cover-up, cowardice.

Get your butt off the Campaign trail and help these people in New Jersey and New York! I expect this behavior from Obama,not you

#actually It's seriously not even about having a black prez anymore. Every debate, Romney soundey like an idiot. I could have done better.

YES  DEAR WILLIAM, BE OBAMA THE BEST , I AM WITH HIM

If Romney win, im moving to Brazil #NoBullshit

Romney didn't have to be the GOP nominee this year. Rick Perry had a very strong chance, but imploded. Chris Christie was *heavily* courted.

I don't know how people can vote for Romney -- dude is a shady businessman who abused tax shelter laws.

BLACK PEOPLE THE ONLY ONES WHO CANT TAKE JOKES stop stressin yall know Obama monkey ass getting back in office

going to be interesting to see who liberals blame when Deb Fischer and Mitt Romney win

Obama to Visit New Jersey on Wednesday -   via

you forget Romney and his binders of women already?  He's got it on lockdown.

Barack Obama wishes Michelle 'happy 20th anniversary' during presidential debate - video  via

so because security keeps me from leaving a parking garage while Obama is leaving, I vote? Seems logical. (Sarcasm in use)

Romnesia hahaha nice one Obama

I wish I could vote more than once like the democrat in N Carolina who voted 5 times for Obama,BUT LETS WIN HONESTLY!!!

DJ  democrat Disastronaut urges all Americans to vote #Obama esp in #Ohio #getoutthevote

My boss's daily racist rant towards Obama is my daily entertainment at work. Unbelievable. Makes me wanna move far far away from Bama.

It's radical aids activists who follow him around-he told em-I'll do more 4 u than Romney-even his own are turning on him;)

My history teacher voted for #OBAMA tho

If Romney win i am going back to Africa

We all do! MT Just heard someone say they hoped Romney ended up with a total vote count of 47% tomorrow so he remembers.

At this point in 2008, we were accepting McCain's inevitable defeat and making excuses about how an Obama Admin. would be a blessing.

Tweeting the US presidential election. #McGill prof Derek Ruths created map to follow the chatter:  #Obama #election

If Obama Dont Win All Us Bitches Goin To ICDC College With Romeo =(

The Dr. Vibe Show: Parallels To Country's Racist Past Haunt Age Of Obama

On a plus note seeing Obama Biden signs on down the road makes my day better. #Obama2012

My Twitter followers' level of confidence in Romney victories tomorrow: FL  CO  NH  VA  OH  IA &

House GOP threatens Obama on tax hikes:  Echoing Grover Norquist a few days ago:  h/t

are only showing Mitt Romney Ads against President Obama, guess we know who they're for! Media bias my foot. VOTE BO/JB

A co-worker told me he was living better off when Bush was in office than 4 years of Obama. Interesting

I'm not rich, I'm not anti-feminist, I support gay rights, and Oh yeah, I support Romney. #dontstereotype #RomneyRyan2012

polls?? Wife is a registered Democrat and voted for Romney, how do you score that??

So based on statistics the Redskins loss last night would mean Obama loses this election

All of a sudden, everyone is sure of a Romney victory

I think Obama has something on Colon Powel. Why would he turn so fast?

#Obama Reminds a Huge Crowd in Hollywood Florida What Real #Change Looks Like

So, if Obama wins Tomorrow, Mitch McConnell is going to resign, citing his failure to achieve his top priority, right?

I would like to know your electoral college prediction. I am predicting Obama 303 Romney 235

I care bout all the shit Obama be talkin bout but my main reason for voting for him is because my nigga is a BLACK man !!

saw a clip on TV right now of mitt romney wearing a north face jacket. all I can think is, he must have so many adventures.

If Obama get re-elected during #GSUHC2012 , folks ain't goin to know how to act!

It's getting interesting! Obama is now ahead  via #uselections

BREAKING NEWS: Former Romney Campaign Coordinator Announces The Second coming of Christ in Missouri!!!

VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE VOTE ROMNEY it's our future pls rt

I like the end of the article where they address the issue of suicide being a problem if Obama wins. This state is ridiculous.

I honestly think Romney is the anti-christ..

you're a complete retard if you vote for obama, he fucked up our country!

If Mitt Romney will turn over his tax returns, I'll donate $25 to the charity of his choice.

ANOTHER Romney Tax Secret: 1500% Profit Using TARP Funds to Ship Delphi Jobs Overseas. Illegal.

I swear I'ma kill Romney if he win Watch I'm taking his whole team out #Bible

SBIZFEED: Nearly 80 percent of French back Obama re-election

they said you was voting for Romney ?? Is it tru

u are not the right man to get America working again so please stop fooling urself. Obama will finish it.#4moreyears

Obama postpones election won week????Get the facts: #AttackWatch #MOTUS

Regardless of who's side you're on it's important to exercise your right to vote! Unless you are voting for Romney, then

If you're a girl and you're voting for Romney. enough said

Obama should remember Aesop's Fables-1) Revenge is a two-edged sword.2) Revenge is dearly bought at the price of liberty.

#LieLikeMitt: Doesn't have a real plan 4 the next 4yrs, except 2 quadruple the debt  ruin the value of the dollar. Oh wait, that's Obama!!

The bigger question is what are we going to do after Obama? He needs to start a war so he can get three terms.

The 100th Day of a Romney Presidency  viaAn ugly hypothetical!

Interviews with Typical Romney supporters and whats interesting these are examples of the same things i have them

My final projection, unchanged from early Oct: Obama 332, Romney 206:  #election2012

am i like one of the only people thats not worried because its like i KNOW Obama gone win..

Obama or Romney- who would be better for #Alberta ?

romney flip flops based on what his party says! wth!? lol he has no constituents right now,

Everybody go out nd vote Obama is our voice nd our help he's in the seat for a reason.

where is your journalistic integrity on Benghazi and Obama's comments on the matter? Where are the facts?

What Obama really said in that '60 Minutes' interview about Benghazi  #Islam #Terrorism

It'd be nice if Romney actually gave a shit about women and their healthcare.

Mitt Romney is doing a rally with Kid Rock tonight. Kid Rock rhymes 'things' with 'things'. I have nothing else to say.

My forever curious mind really wants Romney to win tomorrow just to see everyone freak the hell out.

Dennis, From #Obama 's  point of view WE Are his enemies. Those he considers his friends are OUR enemies. Not his

If Romney becomes President tomorrow , this will be my last semester in college !

This Pole says it's Obama by three lengths.

Depending on tomorrow's election, I will either be enjoying another four years of Obama or beginning the German immigration process. #vote

vote Romney Kirsten and advise all to vote Romney. You know in your soul obxma is not a good man.

About to apply for this FEMA shit, hope Romney doesn't find out.

From EV point of view, Obama likely to win, and could win handily, but 440 means he flips Texas and Georgia.

When in the booth tomorrow .. PLEASE CHOOSE OBAMA. DO NOT I REPEAT DO NOT CHOOSE ALL DEMOCRATS. CHOOSING ALL

How can Obama ask voters to trust him when he refused help in Benghazi and left good Americans to die? Who would tr

President Obama 'Forcefully Removes' Heckler at Cincinnati Rally:  via

Another good read. The subtitle says it all: Why should I believe anything I hear about the New Romney? via

BREAKING: Obama announces the death and destruction in NJ and NY was caused by a youtube video.

Mitt Romney has the correct plan. If you have a deficit of income you must generate more wealth .Confsication is theft.

Polls show obama leads 19 of 20 swing states. Thank god we aren't embarrassing ourselves and electing romney

To the people in NY: if Obama doesn't care abt our Embassy's and ambassador's 4 DEAD Americans, what make u think he is concerned about u

Why would they do that?  All of their viewers are already rabidly anti-Obama due to the previous 4 years of crap they have broadcast.

If you voted for Romney youu going to HELL.

Back to what I was say yesterday I voted Obama president already

Well thats something new. Looks like the Romney dirigible campaign kicked off today in downtown Columbus. Dirigibles are

i honestly dont understand how people can choose Romney over Obama .. that man is clearly a sociopathic pedophile ..

Slightly terrifying:  Is this why Romney is so confident?

GOP + INDIES. 57%  FOR DECISIVE ROMNEY WIN

The 1% coming back to haunt the Romney camp.

I just don't understand why these newspapers waited so long to endorse Romney.  Are they garnering cover for themselves if O wins?

Can't even image how the world go be if Obama don't win the election!!

Mitt Romney is influencing more voters via social media than Obama   Study claims v/

Obama is more of a celebrity than a president. I can't wait to vote tomorrow :))

the problem that the #GOP has with PBO is plain  simple.. #OBAMA wants the #GOP to play fair..by the rules!

Listen Obama has the Electoral College For Obama to loose they'd have to steal it, Romney only wins if Dems don't show let's vote tomorrow

Strongly encouraging all those registered to vote to go vote, unless u voting for Romney#TeamObama

Barack Obama's Ever-changing Libya Story - Candy Crowley Pushes the LIE:  #tcot #obama #obama2012 #benghazi #libya #dem

I hate liers! Specially when they are caught.#lier #obama #USAelctions

Love this! - Ian Somerhalder on meeting Barack Obama and inciting change: 'Our need for energy destroys everything'

Black people won't be satisfied until Barack Obama is crowned Czar

Steel Pulse - Barack Obama song

If Mitt Romney wins I really think something is wrong with that I did some calculations  #Obama is suppos

TAUGHT FROM CHILDHOOD TO BE A GOOD AND CAREFUL STEWARD OF THE WORLDLY GOODS OUR DIVINE PROVIDENCE HAS PROVIDED, MITT ROMNEY BALANCES BUDGETS

(via The key to Romney win are the working class! Employers MUST give employees 6 hours needed to vote! A day off!

Romney is simply constantly dishonest, or gravely misinformed, both horrible qualities in a presidential candidate.

As opposed to Mitt Obama and Barack Romney, only Gary Johnson is worth voting for. #mittromney #obama2012 #GovGaryJohnson

The undecided fringe and the man who could cost Romney  # All Info Here

Full CBS interview reveals Obama didn't call Libya an act of terrorism  #FoxNews

If romney win Imma join the marines

I legitimately feel sorry for the US if romney wins.. thank god I'm Canadian.

If I can go vote so can yo lazy ass and voting Romney would probably save me some tax money but I still Voted for Obama

David Plouffe: 'Politicization' Of Benghazi Attacks 'Has Been Unprecedented'  Obama Administration REFUSES to Answer Q's

The Redskins Rule: Why Romney is a lock to win the election

Vote for the black man tomarrow Obama for your mama

if Barack Obama wins will you stop tweetingplease?

Just saw the funniest video about Romney

GOP Congress including Romney signed Norquist NOTAX PledgeAmericans don't get compromise. Regan Raised taxes/revenue.OATH?

Im just not feelin what obama did. Might as well try something new.

Mitt Romney's desperate Jeep ad unites labor and corporate :  via

Tomorrow is D-day. President Obama all THE way!!

Romney Mega Prayer - calling in some divine election fraud.

I'm pro-equality. Therefore pro-Obama.

Train service as we know it today would end in a Romney admin  #RomneyOffTheRails via

Did Hurricane Sandy sink Romney campaign? essayist thinks so #ROC

hey colin what do you think about the election tomorrow?romney or obama?

lol so people think he caused to hurricane? Lmfaoo if anything it was mitt, but obama is gonna win tomorrow

Team Obama promotes hashtag, early voting

If mitt romney wins should be a #tt the way yall goin in.

ICYMI: Republicans are laying the groundwork to blame Sandy if Romney loses

I tried to think of a joke about Romney but there is no bigger joke than his presidential campaign anyways

Congrats on top news Move Over #Romney #Obama; BarbiTwins #Green Tea Party for Real 99%#animals

If Romney wins the election, he will toast with Non-vintage Non-alcoholic Champagne.

if your in college yo ass better be voting for OBAMA .

If you are voting for romney please get off my new feed, timeline, and etc.. with your bullshit

Bruce Springsteen will accompany President Obama on Air Force One 2day from Madison, WI to Columbus, OH peer poller  friend

Just to clarify for you kids You can't like #GuyFawkes and #Obama  / #AntiEstablishment #BigGovernment You can't be for both. #Election

Whenever Mitt Romney commercials come on I want to throw my remote at my tv.

Hey Amanda, if Romney wins the election, can we sell all/most of our stuff and move to Cardiff or Wellington? #outofthecountryplease

Katy Perry wears dress with Obama slogan at rally: Pop star Katy Perry is sporting a skin-tight minidre  #chicago

Thats Crazy Brah Fuck It Obama 2 Termmmmmmz

if Mitt romney win ima be a civil rights leader ..

Paddy Power are paying out on a Obama win today. Accoring to #PatKenny this am. One day befor the election! That's confidence. Opinion poll?

Are you willing to give up your Social Security and Medicare so Mitt Romney can give himself another big tax cut?

What is smoking giving texas to Obama???

Haven't tweeted in a while But the time is coming near; make yourself heard and VOTE! #OBAMA

Obama cannot fix how Bush left the USA in just 4 years. jesus.

A republican tried to vote twice get y'all facts straight , that's Romney ppl #voterfraud

Tonight is the night that I sit down and write out all the people  things I am voting for. Spoiler Alert: It includes Barack Obama.

By this time tomorrow i will have Voted for Barack Obama! Did four years ago. Will again. #FourMoreYears #YesWeCan

If Romney would become a president, all Americans love BIG BIRD no matter what

People like Obama bc he will give you shit, by taking from other people.

lol it's a joke so ppl don't vote Romney lollll

He was Mad about Obama not Saying he is Half White and Obama Sends Marines on Patrol with no Ammo

Obama ahead according to all pollspositive.

Not sure if Obama's attendance in Phnom Penh will be an encore performance or a bitter-sweet-foreign-policy-uncertainty goodbye

I voted for Obama, Obama, Obama, Obama, Obama!

Make sure you vote! I'm voting for obama

Obama ain't never bout to lose

Romney wheels up, VA bound

I hope everyone listened to how to vote THE CORRECT way for obama , they trynna trick us and shit.

Obama didnt do shit but give more people good stamps. Romney thinks everyone should be rich. i vote neither.

do some research and tell me why Romney is so great

I'll ass gone be slavin round dis hoe if Romney get in office

Obama's president so whats it represent just because the niggas half black dont mean his heaven sent

not really. Obama has spent more money in 4 years then Bush did in 8. PROOF IN NUMBERS TERRA..!

Nobody Can't Explain Why They Voting For #Obama

Pocan challenges crowd to reach out to 5 more people to go vote for Obama. Will you? #obamamadison

#4moreyears of #obama and mexico will close the damn border Putin will nickname the US #pussyriot and 7.62 rounds will repl

Slide show of Pres Obama from last week of the campaign:

If your machine changes Romney vote to Obama: Take a pic w phone.Call FBI Voter Fraud Hotline: 1-800-253-3931  TWEET! #OH #MO #IL #CO #WI

They would only believe them if they showed Romney winning.

Outta class early, test on Friday.Eagles play tonight, President Obama gets his second term!!!! Yea im liking this week lol

Kara here. Calling all #crossbordershoppers #USvacationers  Who would you elect as the next US President? #Obama #Romney  Do you care?

via Chris Rock: 'Romney Is Blacker Than Obama'  #tcot

We're kicking a busy week off today with setup for Romney Election Night festivities  for  the #IFAIExpo

I was shocked when Obama was first elected. Not because of his colour but because he appeared to be intelligent.

Our home town. Spencer probably got you on Team Romney but im always #TeamObama

I saw a fantastic tweet from last night, a popularity chart between Obama and Romney. Can't find it now.

More flip flops than Miami beach. #Romney. #women.

OBAMA will use the same SHENANIGANS that got him into office to keep him in office! We must be VIGILANT! Beware of VOTER FRAUD!

Election Day is 2morow so everyone vote. I don't care who you are voting 4, just vote.that's not true. If you support Obama please stay home

that's why it's soooo important that we re-elect President Obama..Veterans will do better  have more opportunities#vets4Obama

I wish I registered to vote really can't stand the narrow minded people here #obama

You could be right. Notice how still support and carry water for Obama.

Earl Ray Tomblin asks for four more years for the Obama-Tomblin Team.

3 HOUR SPECIAL: Truth Meets at the Top- The case against Obama getting another 4 years in America.  Please join us!

Lets move #Forward by electing President Obama for another 4 years!!!

(kind of secretly hoping Romney wins now) #IJOKE! I need to follow this!

I Just Love FREE Stuff - Like Voting for Obama/Biden #p2 #tcot #TEAPARTY #Topprog #GOP #DNC #LGBT #UAW

I love Missouri.  They too busy shooting their guns to realize Claire McCaskill votes with Obama 98% of the time!  An

The same niggas sayin they will not vote will be the same niggas complaining they can't get an abortion when they slip up if Romney wins

Springsteen will be on AF1 on flight from Madison to Columbus, says Obama campaign spokeswoman Psaki. In-flight ente

ACTION: Time is running out - can you make some calls online for #Obama?

Hell that's gas money! But I'm doin it for the sake of Obama ass tho lol

My dog now growls at Obama campaign ads, even she is a #RomneyRyan2012 supporter

said it best: When you have to say all the polls are wrong or the usual rules don't apply (Team Romney) you think your losing.

I refuse to believe that Mitt Romney isn't a Bond villain. The last 8 months have just been principal photography for the next movie.

PRESSING THT BUTTON FOR OBAMA TOMORROW ! Y'ALL BETTER DO THE SAME !

The End of Our National Tragedy? Romney Takes Lead in Final Rasmussen Poll  via

#romney is definitely going to win this #lection because only rich people have power  #gas to go #vote in #NYC #NJ

Obama will not change the world idiots without representatives and senates to help pass his laws!!

Mitt Romney is robbing the poor and giving to the rich. Good job sir.

Spoke with undecided Ohio voter yesterday. We agreed Obama deserves another 4 years.Why? To protect women's

Obama gonna win just chill .

Prediction: Mitt Romney wins tomorrow with 342 EVs.  I ask all my Pennsylvanian friends to stand for freedom and vote for Romney tomorrow!

She blacc callin Obama a nicca tho?? Lol

Woman on sky news just called #obama a communist. I find this a trifle unfair to be honest

Good Morning! I'm just headed to work, but had to ck the web 4 the mood. I feel gr8 4 Pres Obama. Energy is back! He can do it!

If Obama wins I'm leaving the country. If Romney wins I'm staying in the US. This is a political tweet. Shut up

Yall playn Romney gone win fr

Romney probably drinking whiskey smh

Romney: the only presidential candidate to refuse to answer questions from young Americans. Pathetic.

If you vote for #Obama you are a fucking idiot. It's as simple as that.

my manager hate Obama im wearing all his buttons and shit to work tomorrow just for her

Obama Ahead or Even In Battleground States

A New Pulse Opinion Research on Ohio gives Obama 48%, Romney 46%.  #Election2012

lol niggas really gonna cry if Obama lose tommorow haha

Mitt Romney: I promise to be tough on China. [Just ignore the fact I have a major financial stake in their economy.] #LieLikeMitt

#Romney charged with Violating Federal Ethics Law!  Sign Here and Re-Tweet!

Look! Canadians are smart!  #NotSurprised - Graphic: Who would Canadians vote for? Obama or Romney?  via

#Financials down, #healthcare up before US #elections. Market predicting an #OBAMA win with a deadlocked senate

America is so damn stupid ! How tf yall let bush ass get in office for 8 fuckin years , bt giving Obama a hard asa time !

t's been reported that many white voters aren't going to vote for President Barack Obama because he's black.

If Mitt Romney wins Obama will get is attorneys to recount the votes lolololol

#LIELIKEMITT how about #LIELIKEOBAMA because he's the one who's full of empty promises! MITT ROMNEY HAS A PLAN! #besmart

#Obama TW Team: Rallies in Ohio, Wisconsin #vote #voteVA

No bitch no one has a better sense of both candidates. They think Obama is a god if they're just listening to you

AP News - AP source: Romney considers Ohio visit on Tuesday

Mitt Romney never once mentioned troops in his acceptance speech, says McGovern

Unexpectedly massive Romney rally in Pennsylvania  via

SO TIRED OF ALL THE OBAMA ADS. #teamMITT

if Obama wins the America we used to know will be gone and we will all be fucked #cantafford4moreyears

Obama will take the lead tomorrow at the polls until us republicans get off work. #responsible #taxpayers

we're talking about Obama  Romney. -__-

pray he is right and Nate silver is drinking Obama koolaid

Out of 12 Battleground States, Romney is only UP in 2 of them.  Does that sounds like he is winning? BTW - neither of them is Ohio!

APPLE STORE!!!  might do some looting, got my tools ready  Y'all finna riot if Obama

Bwoi I hope Obama get in there. with Romney tho

Who all know that Obama winning this election?

Racial Divide Worse Under Obama - Star Parker - [page]  via Well said!

LA GENTE ESTA VOTANDO POR OBAMA

as soon as we find out Obama won again come Tuesday night I'm yelling #BALLGAME throughout campus!! Imma forget my age lol

Remember people there is a margin of error in polls, so 53% for Obama and 47% for Romney could also mean 51% for R and 49% for O.

Wow!  Name Some!  I'm voting for Obama because he is the better candidate, not because he's black! Mitt is a liar!

ATTENTION MICHIGAN!!! YOU ARE THE HAND OF AMERICA!!! SPRINKLE YOURSELF W/ POWDER SLAP THE TASTE OUT OF ROMNEY/RYAN TOMORROW!VOTE!!!!

Open your eyes #p2 and #ows, a vote for Obama is a vote for Bush!!  You must read this:  VOTE J

Hate Mondays But Tuesday get out and Vote #Barack Obama Nov. 6 , 2012

ALL YOU NEED TO KNOW: Glenn Beck and Donald Trump are campaigning for Romney.

Bill that #PaulRyan backed would outlaw In-Vitro Fertilization!! Speak out if u have or r going through infertility procedures. Vote #Obama!

If Romney wins, some NWO shit is about to take effect. That's all I'm saying.

If you don't vote tomorrow, it will be the same as voting for Romney #VoteObama

It u votin for Romney. Fuck ya!!!

Can't argue with science? | The Redskins Lost, Which Means That Mitt Romney Will Be President |

The tears will be flowing  I want Obama to lose now. I'll take four years of suffering for the one nigh

I know me too, btw Liberal paper NY Newsday just endorsed Romney :)

Why are so many people supporting Obama with a lousy record, birth location in question, sleazy associates and sealed background records ?

Romney doesn't know what hes doing.

You had 4 years and did shit, time someone else got a chance. #Romney

do you think that Obama, who is crazy rich, can relate to poor people? they're all out of touch, doesnt mean they dont care!

but thats neither here nor there. What we DO know is that decreasing taxes DOES NOT create jobs, and thats Romney's whole plan all of it

Romney payed $400 million to Have his position In the white house wow fake ass can't do it without money MR has community

Tomorrow D-Day for USA, Election Day and I am pretty sure that #Obama won't be reelected

MITT ROMNEY AIN'T GNE WIN SHIT! SMH he ain't about to take my healthcare away!! Bs

Live feed for the #Obama Rally today here. probably get to see some live Bruce Springsteen

#OBAMA2012 make your voice heard !!!!! Closed mouths don't get fed  Don't vote and yo fool ass gon starve foreal fooling with Romney lmao

#foxnewsradio You guys are so bais. what you fail to realize is all that negativity towards obama is what is going to help him get a 2nd trm

Whitney Tilson now alphacloning 'black boxes': Whitney Tilson Willing to Bet YOU $25,000 that Barack Obama Wins

#Obama's Creed?: When All Else Fails, Lie #Benghazi #Scandals #CoverUp #Filmmaker #debt #deficit #economy #jobs #sgp

Every Registered Voter Needs To Make It Their Duty To Get Out  Vote Tomorrow. We're Reaching For Another 4 Years Of Change. #TEAM.OBAMA

That feeling when you see Mitt Romney being sworn in? It's called #TheMayansWereRight

Just to get this on the record--my projection. Obama: 303, Romney: 235.

If you have a bad investment,it is not Obama's fault.Its yours.People thought Facebook was a goldmine its stock tanked.shrugs

Mitt Romney by the numbers  | Construct your own information from the data. #romney #obama

Y'all saying Obama can clean up with bush did in 8years in four. That means y'all voters made a db ass mistake 12 years

The thought of mitt romney being one of the most powerful people in the world terrifies me

Joe Greshecky warming up the crowdbefore President Clinton speaks at Obama rally

If Obama doesn't win the election, can he come over to England and be our prime minister please?

Obama  Romney have strong views on energy  the economy. Find out which of our stock picks will boost your $$$:

Of mitt Romney wins, who's moving to Canada with me?

tax returns for 10 years hidden?  Why? Romney, you devil, off shore accounts? UAW,GM  Chrysler has idea about unreported funds.

I might as well go ahead  say goodbye to food stamps, have this overwhelming feeling Romney is gonna win

Even if you don't like Obama, it doesn't mean you should be voting in Romney. That'd be a false vote if it's for th

And fuck having to run against Michelle Obama, she's probably more qualified that Barack to be president.

Are Unions Obama's Secret Weapon in Ohio?  #Elections via #newzsocial

Y'all all talmbout If Romney win this nd tht goin happen, we'll if yu get yo lazy ass up nd vote he won't have a chance to win.

Grover Nordquist Tells what he thinks of Romney:

Niggas in paris . Remember that Romney ! Niggas in paris

Romney is the reason why Nicki Minaj is around so vote for Obama ok

If You Votin For Romney Tomorrow , You RACIST #Flat

If you are an adult  are counting on having Social Security  Medicare around for your retirement years, DO NOT vote for Romney #VoteObama

If Obama wins we should have no class weds #NCAT lmfaoo

No electricity, no food, no water, Oh yeah, If I lived in the Sandy Flood areas I 'd be the first in line to vote for Obama..NOT!

Romney talking about real change with Bush's cabinet sans the two black members, seams silly

On fox news they talmbout race riots if Obama loses.yep! Lol I'm ignorant.

Mitt Romney wants to ban birth control and abortions If he wins the election then niggas gon have to master the pull-out method

#ReasonsObamaShouldWin because Romney's foreign policy would f*ck us all up!!!

Oh lord after tomorrow can I never hear the name AGAIN Obama really has to win, Romney annoys the heck out of me

Pray for ISRAEL my friends! That AhMADinejad is a MAD man! Israel was there 4 us in 1991 now it's time 4 us to step up! VOTE ROMNEY!

Your vote tomorrow will determine the following:YOUR CHOICE:Freedom (Romney) or Slavery (Obama)Choose carefully

Everybody  that is saying what they would do if Obama isn't re-elected doesn't realized your jokes might actually come to life doe.

People, please don't go out wearing obama pins or shirts or none o that shit or you will get booted out of line. We need every vote!

2012 in a nutshell: In 2008, Wall Street bubbles collapse, destroy jobs, lives, hope. Repub's pick Romney, the symbol of Wall Street greed!

Random #s texting me about the pole. is it send random ppl messages about the pole day. who the fuck is y'all and are u voting for OBAMA O_o

Swing state newspaper endorsement tally: Romney 24, Obama 15

Did you see the Navy Seals anti-Obama ad that ran during the Natl Geographic Bin Laden movie last night?

2012 in a nutshell: In 2008, Wall Street bubbles collapse, destroy jobs, lives, hope. Repub's pick Romney, the symbo

Obama wants four more years, and so do I! If he's elected I'm not sure if Israel will have four more years. #protect

Romney thinks revenge is the best revenge?

I'm predicting Obama's gonna win. Lucky man. Last min boost with the job increase.

Yes I know Obama overpromised and under delivered but for any college student or basic wage worker Romney is not for u

Separation of Church  State: Romney and Ryan threaten my freedom of religion by imposing their Judeo-Christian values in politics.

I would NOT vote for Romney if Obama Lil Reesed me #electiontweet

Leftist in US think Obama is the lesser of two evils. They still think the priority is to stop Romney from getting into office

Voting Polls will be open TOMORROW in the Armory from 7 am- 7pm #presidentialelections2012 #Drexel #obama #vote

If Obama wins and my Halo 4 gets here on time, I will be at an all time high on Wednesday lol #bxtxhdontkillmyvibestatus cc:

Find a way to reach out to VOTERS who are UNDECIDED! Share the FACTS w/them! You will be SURPRISED just how UNIFORMED they are! VOTE ROMNEY

#Obama has no vision for America. His #Hope  #Change failed, so he has nothing. #WMnews #TNfile #news #tcot #romney #

Like shouldn't she be voting for Obama or something lmaooo

If Romney wins I'm fuckin his wife in the ass

I liked a video from  Key  Peele: Obama on Halo 4

Bill Clinton even supporting Obama !

Hearing a recording of Obama talking on my house phone

I swear to everyone my boyfriend has a thing for Michelle Obama.

drinking game: take a shot everytime romney tries talking louder than obama so he seems more important like he knows what

Naw for America! RT What if Obama lost? Sad day for blacks

I seriously can't even fathom Romney not winning this election #theworldwillend

Why are there ads on pandora saying end obamacare.wow.mitt romney is really trying it!!!! #helltotheNO

Obama doesn't care about black people,wait what

#FoxNews takes #CBSNews + #60Minutes 2 task 4 covering up #Obama vid on  #Benghazi  #MediaBias is biggest prob in USA

Finally, Romney has swung the Etch-A-Sketch for him! #hesgotthis

Of course victory for Mitt Romney will at last answer the question: what would happen if Mr Burns out of the Simpsons

I'm ready to know who won election..OBAMA NATION!

Obama better get a fresh cut for tomorrow

Mitt Romney is one of the first presidential candidates ever to be charged with violating the federal ethics law. BRUH

I ask myself,,how can obama be even close??how can he get even 1/3 of the country to support him???

Hey #NY  #NJWasn't that a great photo op by #Obama - you were simply useful idiots for your compassionate #Democrats -

Where Obama and Romney stand on the issues, from abortion and economy to taxes and war - The Washington Post

: I'm voting for president Obama because my family can't afford to send me to school and get the decent education that I want

The commercial on the radio with Obama and Jay-Z lolololll #IsThisRealLife

Read this Why Libertarians must vote Romney   #sgp #teaparty #glennbeck #hannity

Everyone needs to make sure they vote tomorrow..our future depends on it! #Obama

I think it'll be a tie and the Congress will decide. Get ready for Romney/Biden

but am I wrong? Those three demographics are like all pro Obama lol #obama2012

that's not how budgets work. Doesn't req Cong approval. Obama submitted active budget every year.

Really wish I was 18 so I can vote. Our generation's future depends on this. If Romney is elected, how tf are we suppose to pay for college?

Obama's sheeple will be so disappointed tomorrow.. Dear Leader will be handed a pink slip.

Mitt Romney has no plan to reduce tuition costs. does. Enough said.

Bill Clinton Cites Economist Kenneth Rogoff To Argue Obama Needs Four More Years

do your civic duty, do your American duty, and vote for Romney. #RomneyRyan2012

I don't vote and I'm not American but if I was and did I'd vote Obama. Mitt is the American Cameron.

Where is Obama for Brooklyn.  He is busy campaigning just like benghazi.  His priorities are all screwed up.. Hope n change my arse

Obama Romney fight seems to be the ultimate with each having equal percentage points as far as ore election polls go.

Everyone has made up their minds thanks to Obama's mask coming off~ THEY ARE NOW VOTING FOR MITT ROMNEY

#Forward still waiting for those Romney specifics. Oh wait,  they don't exist.

Most Impotent Election Day is here; better America for all or few we support our double Grammy Winner President Obama!

#Forward I'm a woman, a teacher, a Republican. I'm voting for Mr. Obama because he's steering America forward. We must keep moving forward.

Hey Buzz Feed Ben! Any last minute thougts about tthat lie that elected Barack Obama? #DerangedMedia #KhalidAlMansour

Oh the irony Pakistan.. Mitt Romney says 'the world' wants to see a new leader in the White House.

In the Electoral College, it's advantage: Obama

Much like the dreaded Cheetos Saturation Point, I am done with Obama callers. I told my wife the next time they ask, I'm voting Romney.

I hope that if Mitt Romney doesn't win the election, he just instantly dies.

US heads for cliffhanger election: Barack Obama and Mitt Romney make their closing arguments to voters, one day

VIVA ROMNEY!. VIVA RYAN! VIVA back to the good times for America!!!

Red Dawn (2012) - IMDb   #usmc THIS COULD BE US with all of our CHINA debt. #OH #PA #NV #FL VOTE ROMNEY #tcot #rush

Obama deserves the next four years. Idc what you have think. Bc that is MY OPINION.

The Obama Administration's Rules for Raising Your Teenage Daughter - Health Car #newslocker

I hope everybody registered to vote #Team Obama

Both Rom and Obama have uneducated voters. Voters should be required to take a test. When voting becomes a privilege is when

soo if obama gets excluded when we press all democrats first why wasnt it on the news. do ppl expect EVERYONE to kno tht ? i dnt believe it.

They say since Washington lost yesterday Romney gon win I beg the differ

Don't worry I'm mortified for all of us America.Get it together people! Maybe S.Africa will hold another parade when Obama's reelected

romney aint denounce a damn thing about it. Double standard?

Obama's Bad Economic Policies vs. Romney's Disastrous Ones: Since I started this blog in April 2011, I have criticized President Obam

538 Blog: Did Hurricane Sandy Blow Romney Off Into The Very Depths Of Hell, Writhing And Screaming, Til The End Of Time

I'm not telling you guys who to vote, but you would be a fool if you vote for Romney. Look at this

who can expect obama to fix things in 4 years when Bush took 8 years to fuck it up. #voteobama

Obama will lead the polls early tomorrow, until Romney voters get off work

All you jiggaboos better vote for Obama cause I'm not tryna work in the cotton fields.

I'm not talking about budgets - I blame Bush for his huge spending including the automatic stuff Obama has to pay for.

Obama may win election, but the damage from Citizen's United will be seen in congressional  state races, that's where we need to focus #p2

Some of y'all would probably still be pissed if Romney won and did a great job lol

Obama the worse president ever and of you disagree let me know and i'll tell you why you're wrong

Debate club got off to a good start today too. Missed a trick by not debating Obama v Romney though.

my history class is full of Obama supporters. #yikes #letmeleave

If you aren't voting for Romney then you are in effect voting to keep Obama in office genius. #WASTE #p2  #tcot #tlot #1MoreDay

#Obama wins Virginia, he wins the election, and stats show he will.  via  Ipsos Reid #Host2012

Ha! Fair  Balanced!!  Fox News Redefines Unbalanced By Giving Romney 80 Percent More Airtime

And Romney gonna send kanyes black ass to the cotton field along with lammy :(

I did what I need to DO , DID YOU ??? GO #VOTE #4MOREYEAR #OBAMA !!!!!!

Mitt Romney plans Ohio rally at company that benefited from stimulus  #p2

Replay all 2012 Presidential debates |  via #seniors #debates #election #romney #obama #rya

I *hope* they don't elect Romney, but you've got to be prepared for a staggering outbreak of dimwittery tomorrow.

Fuck Romney n everybody on his side!!!

who are you voting for. *Say Obama*

Obama avoids question on whether Americans in Libya were denied requests for help | Conservative Byte  via

If i see one more commercial talking bout how bad Obama is #I'mmasnap!!!!!

There's an abundance of Obama signs. I have a stack. Who wants one ;) #obamamadison

If you believe that President Obama is truly working to help average Americans  not the uber-rich, DO NOT vote for Mitt Romney #VoteObama

pure ignorance!  Y'all are PISSED at the blacks who are voting for Romney. Lol.

In the 90s, there was a cartoon about an environmentalist superhero. In 2012, Obama  Romney have barely mentioned the environment. Weird.

So who would it be Obama or Mitt?

I don't believe the polls! They look like the polls from 2008! Which I believe Obama followers would present. Even Fox is falling for it!

Romney's company dodging more taxes  #shitromneydoes

clearly won, there all just polls and if u got based off polls right now Obama has the race won, which I highly doubt will

#Forward With more fucking lies and unfulfilled promises! #Obama is a cunt!

I really think there is no way Romney is ahead of Obama right now

President Barack Obama and Republican challenger Mitt Romney have been courting the Latino vote across the count

Romney all the way! Right? Lol

I have President Obama's back because he has my family's back #equality #forward

Navy SEAL: We Know More About SEAL Team Six Than We Do About Obama  #tcot

Dat was a blessing 2 see Obama yesterday #Vote

FOX News claims that the Vonage commercial which features a woman singing in Hindi is actually a deceptive political endorsement for Obama.

will you pour champagne on yourself if Obama wins? It is an act of celebration though.

Just don't cry when Obama wins tomorrow

#ThatAwkwardMoment when GOP Governor of #Ohio says the CEOs of GM and Chrysler are right: #Romney lies

my French teacher is voting for Romney BITCH DIE!

mitt romney more like mayor of whoville

If Romney wins tomorrow I am moving to Mars.

KEEP VOTING EVERYONE #OBAMA2012 Polls 2012: Barack Obama Leads Mitt Romney With One Day Remaining  via

Can't wait to vote obama out of office tomorrow. Even with his ethnically sounds campaign, there is no way he's getting the dubya.

FactBarak Obama's father was an atheist  his mother skeptical of organized religions.

Heard one of my rich cousins voting for Romney . Just cause you got money now , dont forget where you came from .

So Romney may have saved himself a $100 million in US taxes by some form of Double Dutch scheme   - tr

Mitt Romney? He keeps banging on about how good he is at sorting stuff out, and will hopefully be looking for work soon!

Obama's Housing plan has been nothing but a Failure!

President Obama will take this country to another level. Pls go and vote #Forward

Tomorrow is Election Day, I endorse Mitt Romney because I like a guy who takes everything from little ppl just to make a buck.

Y'all see the polls , this man Romney is really about to be our president though, this Is crazy

Stressed out trying to get on a bus to see Romney!! I will be so sad if I don't get a spot :/

Honestly, i dont see why anyone wouldnt vote for Obama. #OBAMA

I unfriend/unfollow #everyone who tweets/posts about Romney and about supporting him. #sorrynotsorry I don't want to know you anymore

And finally, we start to get a clearer picture of just who Mitt Romney really is. The faucet has started to

ROMNEY HAS LIED TO YOU EVERY DAY:IS A SOCIOPATHIC LIAR, AND A DANGER TO OUR DEMOCRACY; SUPPORTED BY:

See how tight some people who claim to care can be? Yet Romney was scoffed at for turning a rally into a donation drive. Remember #Sandy

My son gets to vote in school tomorrow and he said he's not voting for Barack Obama that he's voting for the other guy.

Michelle Obama is wearing Maggie Norris Couture.It is an Honor!

If Obama was such a bad president. Why didn't anybody band together use our bill of rights and impeach him wait but ppl wanna talk shit

election tomorrow! can't wait to vote to RE-ELECT President BARACK OBAMA!! #Obama2012 #Forward #4MoreYears

If this was a boxing match, Romney would be way down on the cards entering the 12th and swinging wildly, hoping for a miracle KO.

If Obama wins, dont use him as an excuse not to go to class this weekhe can't help the FAs on ya final grades

Obama failed to save our men #tcot #p2 #cnn #nbc : Obama Admits He Knew of Benghazi Attack in Time to Send Rescue Team

Will there be riots if Obama doesn't get re-elected?

Here I am on top of the risers in the Ballroom as people set up for Romney-Ryan and #election2012.

OH U of Cincinnati Nov Oct 31 - Nov 4 Obama +1 - Party NA; Exit Polls 2008 +8D, 2004 +5R, 2000 +1D, 1996 +5D

I am nervous about this election but I pray God,Allah,Jesus, every other religious higher calling bless Obama in favor 2 win! #Forward

Mitt Romney's Personality Problem: Mitt Romney will lose the election on Tuesday because of his inability to con

Anti-voters, I'm sorry Mitt Romney doesn't love at least half of you and Obama didn't shit gold bricks. Yeah, don't vote.

Mitt Romney sucks pass it on - oxblood: omgthatdress: veryangrymouse: kuraipurrs: shelbyisms: brandittttt:

Same Black Mf' On That Romney Shit  I Had To Ask !

CBS Releases Unaired Footage Of Obama Refusing To Call Benghazi A Terror Attack  RealClearPoliticsVid

FL voters waited in line for hours to vote for OBAMA! OH voters fought the Sec.of State to vote for OBAMA! Enthusiasm is h

I hope that America votes for stagnation rather than backwardness #Election2012 #Obama

RT if you think Romney/Ryan will win in a landslide victory tomorrow!

The ppl that are middle class or poor that support Romney confuse the fuck outta me.. that's jus some shit I can't comp

Our hero's the military hate Obama and that must tell you something about their commander and chief.Retired admirals and generals,no Obama.

I'm kinda hoping that Romney will win..

I respects people decisions but im voting for Obama.i don't necessarily agree wit all his tactics and beliefs but he'

Shout out to my Greene County followers voting for #Obama.. I know its hard out there

Voting For Obama Because He Believes In Equality. #Forward

OBVIOUSLY Obama losing WI - Illinois Obama Supporters Flood Wisconsin, Massive GOTV Effort Underway  via

Update: Obama/Biden 2012: The Ultimate Election Day App Guide For Democrats [Feature]

The fact that Obama thinks he needs all these celebrities to help him win obviously means he's running scared #RomneyRyan2012

Well, he will be needing a job soon.  Obama favored in his ancestral Kenyan village

Obama's claim that Romney tax plan doesn't add up got a Mostly True.  #debate

but if he's underperforming in OH it shows from d polls that Romney needs to win OH by at least 10pts on nov 6 to win OH

Listening to #Romney speak in Fl WOW! A leader! Means what he says  says what he means! Not your typical BSing politi

Election 2012: #Romney Supporters in #Ohio Explain Why Their Candidate Deserves to Win

Remember! If you are voting for Obama, you vote Wednesday.

Breitbart News: Breitbart TV  via  Obama recommends revenge.  Against who or what?

if romney wins, say bye to food stamps :( lol

RT Bruce Springsteen joins Obama on Air Force One. Great way to spend taxpayer $$$. Disgusting!

The 1st 20 twitpic their votes for Obama to her gets 50% off a purchase of head :(( TOO BAD I'M NOT FROM THEM STATES ://

Bruce Springsteen jokes about Obama calling him and singing to him and does his best impression of the President.

Yess ! Tomorrow is the big day! Please go out and vote yal. Its so important. Unfortunatley im not old enough but im still supporting #OBAMA

Redskins losing doesn't bode well for Obama!

OBAMA would NEVER approve of these jeans!! #VOTEOBAMA

OBAMA SHOUTED OUT ,,LIL WAYNE ,,,AND THIS CLOWN AINT EVEN ,,VOTING 4 HIM,,,,,TURD STAIN ASS NIGGA ,,,,SOMEBODY U SMACK YO SILLY ASS BOYYYY

just a reminder: Obama's not running against George Bush and he never has

Amazing how all the conservatives are predicting a Romney win, while all the liberals an Obama win. Hmm, ever get outside your own circles?

I wish I could've gone to see Obama today

Final predictions: Obama 312 electoral votes, 54 D in Senate, 199 D in House.

Even bill Handel on kfi says Romney switched up his views  his plan doesn't add up

A vote for Gary Johnson is the same as a vote for Obama.  This year we must vote against Obama.

People Obama = romney Democrat= republican Don't be fooled by the media

Obama says #forward. How can you spend your way out a debt or have the rich pay a little more in taxes that will not balance a budget.

Thank you. I have been trying to tweet another anti-Obama picture but it keeps getting rejected :)

both US parties have slight differences. Neither Obama or Romney will defy the status quo. That story of the good and bad got old.

I've seen alot of Mitt Romney nicknames, but Mittens is the best so far

Mitt Romney 'rented' church's tax exemption to dodge paying taxes for 15 years

The socialist countries tell. Stats say 90% of Europe would vote for Obama  10% would vote for Romney. That alone i

Edulection 2012: The Difference Between #Obama And #Romney On #Education Issues  via #highered, #edu

HappyELECTIONday to all Americans! According to Pak think tank, uncle Obama obviously grab tomorrow contast

Madison? LOL. If Obama cannot get a crowd in Madison, then he is done.

I'm deadly sorry but Obama is not the president of black people. His selected to lead the US destiny. Trust in U first !!

#Obama = Slutty ass daughter and Gay son Do you really want that??? #RomTime 2012, go Vote!! Lol

Obama is gonna be with Jay-Z . And Romney is gonna be with kid rock? Yup that somes my vote up .

Matthews: Quoting Obama is Racist | MRCTV

Video: Obama's Lies: Straight from his lips.

Obama Means What He Says?: Barack Obama's latest tactic on the campaign trail, since hecan't talk about his rec

you racist am i OBAMA because im black ?????

#oomf said he was gone vote for Romney as a joke not funny dude

I Dare A Mf To Unfolow Me Cause Im Voting For Romney ' All Yall Getting Suspended . Lmao Fuck With It !

Some of my Co workers are saying how they're voting for Dick Romney I now hate them smh -- lmao

besides that weirdass isn't even against Romney. he ain't black with his black ass.

wen Obama win the election, we gon turn up 100x harder..hope yall ready

Wisconsin Journal Switches From Endorsing Obama to Endorsing Romney; 30 Newspapers Have Made the Flip

Vote for Obama! Obama all the way!

Wish I could give him the entire stack. Obama!!!

Romney is more worried bout rich people who have made a living for themselves! Instead of the people striving for success in

US election: Polls show wafer-thin lead for Obama. Listen:

Watch Live: President Obama campaigns in Madison, Wisconsin

Obama is leading in OHIO  FLORIDA .LETS GETS THIS WIN GUYS

funnyordie: The Romney Boys: Election Eve Special with Fred Willard. Scrappy Doo-best way to describe Paul Ryan

My friend's kid in OC came home from #trickortreating with campaign crap instead of candy! #Mormons #Romney #Obama

President Obama to speak momentarily. Bruce Springsteen on stage now in Madison. Watch it here LIVE.

I'm predicting a Romney victory because politically correct America under-reports aversion 2 policies of our first black pres.

A lot of anti-Obama ads this morning. Romney seems to be going all out the day before the election. (or I just haven't been watching in AM)

This is so disturbing! Barack Obama dummy hanging at a Louisiana SHELL Gas Station. WTF what year are we liv

Tomorrow is the #5thofNovember and November is a month of giving. Lets make tomorrow a #DayofGiving  give President Obama on a vacation #R2

Bret Baier blasts '60 Minutes' for handling of Obama's Benghazi interview  via

I really hope Obama wins this thing

Bush fucked up everything and yall still want to blame Obama?

Election Day is tomorrow. You know what to do Yankees! Vote for Barrack Obama! #ObamaFTW

People in this country are fed up with big govt if Romney fails as O has this country will fall apart  descend into chaos

If Romney wins tomorrow, only 2 groups win: Rich white, racist, homophobic, sexist dudes  comedians.

says another thing about ROMNEY he might not live to see the election !!!!!

What does Romney know about the struggle most people face every single day?

If the US election was held here, Obama would win by a landslide

then you aren't allowed to have a say in anything. Or complain when Obama ruins America.

So when you vote for Romney, remember that your take home pay is more important than my fundamental civil rights. ;)

Talk about sick #whyichangedmyvote wtf u crazy women u worried bout ya kids yet u voting for romney

Tomorrow we will be victoriousand repudiate the corrupt liberal media and their straw-man Barack Obama.

I really hope Obama winsI despise Mitt with a passion

The Pres. Obama stands for young people including #jobs, #healthcare, #nationalsecurity  important social issues.

although in not american I'm English I really want Obama to win. #ObamaMustWin #ObamaForPresident

Obama Campaign Launches Poll-Watching App: Barack Obama and Democratic campaigns announced on Mo  via

Obama has advocated for comparative effectiveness research in the US. He's a good guy.

obama hasn't made it worse the numbers clearly show that and you know you're lying when you say it

Just few hours to go for US elections.Trend favors to Obama.Figures are 52% Obama 48% Romney.Good news for India.#USElection #ObamaVSRomney

If Romney Become President  Shit Start Lookin Sour You Know Wat Time It Is!

--------------  If Romney wins nobody gone do a damn thing but sit and tweet angrily about i

Well, I can rule out Pomona Capital as a firm I wouldn't invest in. Ha.  The CEO thinks Obama is the Messiah.

Springsteen tells voters rally that he supports Obama b/c he cares about women's rights and healthcare

Bruce Springsteen Rockin for Obama LIVE STREAM#Election.

What im trying say us if Bush was president for TWO terms there should be no problem at all getting Obama A second t

Just because obama is a black man doesn't mean that thats the only reason why i would vote for him

Romney's Cedar Rapids office is busy.  Bruce Springsteen's warming up for Obama.  Just sayin.

Obama comes on stage to U2's City of Blinding Lights!! #madison

2/2 a democrat. I like substantive conversations on how we can make a better America for our children. #Vote 4 #Obama #FactsMatter #Forward

Complete Third Presidential Debate on Foreign Policy 2012: Barack Obama :  via

Supporters, Sorry Stress over the Romney Agents use of Patriot Act to HighJack American Voters

Watch live: President Obama kicks off the last day of the campaign in Madison, Wisconsin.

Obama must be defeated or tomorrow may be the beginning of the end of the United States of America.

Me , myself  I . But is Obama winning ?

When Obama wins we blowing that loud for the W

If Mitt Romney wins tomorrow night, I'm going to party. And when I say party, I mean cry, sing sad songs to my pillow  binge eat Nutella.

If Obama Don't Win We Moving to Canada

A vote for #Romney = a rally in the markets on November 7, which will instill confidence  not fear  businesses will be willing to hire.

Random thought: Since money means little to Mitt Romney you think he'd spend a few Million Dollars to buy votes in the undecided states? -M

Hey #Romney in a few days you will have more time with your grandkids.Like you should of been doing eight years ago.

So Mitt Romney's son Tag Romney owns part of a company that is supplying voting machines in 2 major counties in Ohio.. #Election2012

Think about it this way to me the vote is bigger than Obama Romney think about I think the 2supreme court justices that are soon to

President Obama is on FOX, Thank God for the invention of the MUTE button

If Obama dont win.. I will be withdrawing from AM

Man I'm nervous that tomorrow Romney might actually become president.

No one says it like Ronald Reagan.  RR is not with us, but in spirit.  It's up to us.  With R/R, Romney/Ryan, we

Election Day: Will Big Stars Bring Big Votes For Obama?:

Romney's shift to the center in the first debate was a transparent pander for the lycanthrope vote.

So far Romney has Fl and Ohiowe shall see

frl, if Obama doesn't win the election you ppl are going to die from hunger and being homeless, so you're welcome I'm voting for yall sake!

People are voting for Obama on social issues? Obama's only concerned with his own SOCIAL life..not yours!  #Forewarned

SHOUT-OUT 2 the following BATTLE-GROUND-STATES; Ohio, Iowa, N.H.  Nevada! Your VOTE is KEY folks! PLEASE put ROMNEY signs in your yard!

Have you noticed how -- OBAMA HAS NOT MENTIONED THE NAVY SEALS MURDERED IN BENGHAZI OR FAST AND FURIOUS -- WHILE CAMPA

Your killing me Je'Rod don't let Aaron and your love 4 this city sway u let's keep Pat like Obama 4 more years hahaha

People voting for Romney are just DUMB !! Like, you hear all the stupid stuff he saying..people need to look past the color of skin

its just a hunch based on 50 / 50 guess and the fact that all i keep hearing about Romney is that he's a cunt

My fearless prediction, made last January, is that Mitt Romney will be the next American president. For Canada's sake, let's hope I'm right.

People saying vote Obama, but don't even know why they voting for him. I voted for him, but I know why though.

Romney wants to take away abortion so all these females out here gettin raped are forced to keep the baby? Man What?!

High school halftime show has Big Bird Knocking out Mitt Romney  #barackobama #elections2012

on the cool President Obama did more in 4 yrs than bush did in 8?

Obama's ancestral village in Kenya brimming with confidence

I'm voting for Obama because he understands that an emergency room is not a viable alternative for a check-up. #Forward

Obama rally on Fox now - my disgust for him gets deeper by the hour.

Berman could ask anything sports related and get no real answers. Romney once referred to sports in the singular form! O will bring up Bears

See which celebrities are Democrats and which ones are Republicans  Who surprised you? #elections #obama #romney

A reminder that we're still waiting for Romney to release several years of tax returns.  Election day is tomorrow. That is all.

Lets get it straight I'm not a Romney supporter, but it blows my mind at the lack of respect our generation has for this man.

Best believe i will be voting for #obama tommorow!

I really wish a vote for Ron Paul wasn't a vote for Obama. its his last possible election and he's the best choice but Americas retarded

I wish I shared your opinion. Overall, Romney has a slim margin, but Obama is holding key states with EC votes, so

Are coal stocks predicting a Romney win? - MarketWatch: Are coal stocks predicting a Romney win?MarketWatc  #coal

You at Obama's campaign rally? Springsteen in a gilet.

Dont let this bag full of crazy cats win Obama we are counting on you!

Chris Matthews Claims 'Revenge' Line Stoking Racial Fears (blames Romney)   via These people a

I hate Romney so bad! Which is why I'm moving if he is elected. (:

Pray to God Obama get reelected..bc i jus know Romney gon be worse than Bush

I know the polls are tied, but I honestly believe Obama is going to win #election2012

R My PSA: Make sure you vote for Obama tomorrow. Please. Seriously. This is a critical moment in history. I trust you t

MT Defeating 0bama is only PART of the solution. Vote GOP Senate  House #tcot #p2 Vote Romney, end i

Wow. My mom is really confident Romney will win.

Wave goodbye to the Obama media  #BuhBye marxists :-) #Tcot

This election is about the economy more than anything else, and Mitt Romney can bring the respect back to the United States that it once had

Obama is going to be at McCormick place tomorrow morning..

they're not even perceived, they're made up! I'd share a water with Romney b4 a beer with King O any day I love my beer

Obama has The Boss  Jay Z in his back pocket. Clint Eastwood  Chuck Norris have Romney's back.

Obama campaign getting crowds totally excited about voting for Bill Clinton  #tcot #TeaParty #p2

Obama told the people of the US what he was going to do to us the day he was sworn in and nobody listened . . .

off obama is gonna win period

Bill Clinton says vote for Obama!

Obama and Romney ads on the radio during everysinglecommmercialbreak. I can't wait til Wednesday!

No, Navy Seals killed Bin Laden.  Hussein Obama killed Americans at Behghazi.

Romney to be in Ohio on election day  I guess he needs to check his son's voting machines one last time..

ol uklahhh rappin bout obama nd shit lol #fuckromney

N*ggaz please don't use the Election as a promotional tool for a party. I don't wanna see Obama face on anybody's flyer

So it looks like Harry Reid and others might have been right all along.   Mitt Romney don't pay no tax *Kanye Voice*

Romney vs. Obama: Who's Better for Wall Street? |

Obama finally crushing Romney on Romney's lies and contradictory positions in Wisconsin now.

LONDON (Reuters) - U.S. President Barack Obama will win the popular vote by two per cent in Tuesday's election w

Obama only needs Ohio, Wisconsin, and Nevada to win, all of which pollsters project him winning by at least 70%

if Romney wins.you hoes will be twerking in the cotton fields

I have so much respect for Barrack Obama.

The Bottom Line we will be a Poorer Nation under Romney then with Obama Rich will remain Rich Poor will be Poorer

If his style of jeans were the only consideration, President Obama would totally own vote.

No hay descanso: Green groups launch final push for Obama

I think the fact that Romney is neck and neck for Presidency, is a damning indictment on

All Americans who'R voting 2morw check out Obama's accomplishments albeit w/o #Rep help!

If you live in Detroit and you vote in Romney you need yo Ass kicked!

If all yall really vote like yall say yall gonna do then obama should be good

#AsianAmerican Asian Americans Advocate For Obama And Romney: While large numbers of Asian American  via

If a mf tweet they voting for Mitt Romney im unfollowing thy ass no exceptions

I am not looking forward to another four years of Obama's failed policies, so I am voting for Mitt Romney. #election2012

If mitt Romney wins the election I'm totally falling out with America

Enthusiasm gap: Romney rallies draw 4000, 6000, Obama rallies are over 20,000. Some gap!

Major conference for nonprofiteers is right next to venue for Romney election-night headquarters. Heh.

Biden's Prediction: Ohio Will Win if for Obama - Yahoo! News  via

Bloomberg doesn't know what he is talking about, Obama for 4 more years would destroy the United States

I'm Not An American Citizen..I can't vote but to all my Americano's #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE #VOTE Obama!

so what are y'all gonna do if Romney wins tomorrow? lol

This nigga said if Romney wins he movin to Hawaii.

Kebab time: President Obama talks about the big issues   streetfighter 2 fans

omg elections soon.. EVERYONE VOTE OBAMA

Howdy do, Sen Webb - yes I will vote for Barack Obama, thanks for asking

Austin Naija: Fani Kayode writes about Obama's anti-Christ trait

USA, OBAMA E ROMNEY ALLO SPRINT FINALE

tbh you're just fucked up if you vote for romney, especially if you're a woman, like why would you chose a man who's going to stop abortions

Explosive video indictment of Obama rocks YouTube (your typical CFR puppet doing what he's told)

I DO NOT UNDERSTAND HOW ROMNEY CAN POSSIBLY BE A GOOD IDEA. PLEASE, EXPLAAAIIINNNN!!!!

Mitt Romney  Stephen Harper ~ Father please come for your children if this happens

Romney Invested Millions in Firms That Pioneered High-Tech Outsourcing  #RomneyRyan2012 now we know

I had the opportunity to see President Obama for a 3rd time last night. Raspy voice and all, he was at his best. Proud to support him!

If Obama win ima Harlem shake then face a blunt, so either way I'm facing a blunt.

they aint gon let obama win again

I don't know what's worse, Obama election commercials or Christmas commercials the first week of November

Dear Romney/Ryan: Obama has not declared a War On Religion. But when you find a mainstream pol who has let me know. I'll be voting for her.

Paradox of the day: I go to law school w/ someone who REALLY loves 'murica, but clearly hates Americans voting for Obama. #lawschoolproblems

Proof: Obama Refused to Call Benghazi 'Terror,' CBS Covered Up  ONE BIG FUCK YOU to #CBS - I see an ad on CBS - I BOYCOT

Obama campaign gave Latinos the most horrific font.

if obama win i will lick the bottom of my retro 4's on god

Totally agree. Something isn't right here. Reps are more excited, Romney's up with Indys  he's polling to a decisive loss.

I don't care how long I have to stand in that line tomorrow. President Obama is definitely getting my vote:)!!! #TeamObama

I'm voting for Barack Obama because we need a president for the 21st century, f*ck trickle down,rise up!

Gaza Strip was getting bombed, Obama didn't say shit, that's why I ain't vote for him, next one either

Less than 24 hours before the BIG day! Romney ain't lettin Obama breathe. Like get off my heels already buddy!

If the whole world had a vote in the American election Romney wouldn't even get a look in

Just because your republican doesn't mean you have to vote for Romney #justsaying #lookatthefacts

My friend's 1st grader came home from school saying Obama thinks if we win a prize, we have to share it w/everyone else. Hahaha #onlyinTexas

I don't see how. Bush wanted wars, Romney just wants us to bend over to big corporations. I see mass death in big company.

People are you really going to vote for romney.. He wears special underpants to feel 'closer to god' #TeamObama

lmao i knowwww but these people didnt know shit like talked dwn on obama but didnt know shit about mit or his views or plan

Mayb its just mebut seems like every time Pres. Obama commercials come on, they cut the end of his election commercials off!#TeamObama

Come on, usa. This romney nonsense is coming between me and my rest.

Please, everyone tweet the same joke about unemployed people voting for Obama.

People just want to fight w/each other. It's awesome what Christie  Obama have done together. Keep your chin up!

im finna gonna vote foe obama cuhz he got swagga plus his bitch is ride or die

What if Romney rigs this election? He's a little too confident.

I don't really care about why people are voting Obama. I just care that they are voting.

Really want Obama to make a #ThatsThatShitIDontLike tweet

most important figure there: Obama's Chance of Winning is 86.5%

Going to see tomorrow night! Hopefully we'll also celebrate an Obama win there!!

doesn't surprise me, he's not stupid enough to be a Romney supporter.

My money on : Romney will steal the show ..

What President Obama Really Said in that '60 Minutes' Interview about Benghazi:  has a lot to answer for #MediaGate

Good Morning.I will VOTE OBAMA BIDEN- :=DandNO on Measure B

GO VOTE 2MORO PLEASE!!!!! WE HAV TO VOTE 2 KEEP OBAMA N DA WHITE HOUSE!!!! SO TAKE ALIL TIME 2MORO AND DO DAT!!!!!

cuz Romney's one brain short?

Bush raised America's debt 90 percent and people wanna blame Obama.

Romney bitch ass can stop poppin up on MY TL voluntarily tho.

from news busters NYTimes: Economic 'Recovery' Helping 'Energized, Fortified' Obama, As Romney 'Misleads' in Ad:

do you remember when Madeleine Albright did  North Korea song  dance? History repeats as #Obama send Jarrett to romance #Iran.

This clown Romney really think we about to let him get into the office tho shiddddd

really if romney wins i'll just die i mean i wanna come to the us even just to study for a year but if romney's president NO

obama care page 1000 computer chip to be placed between thumb and forefinger to get health care in the year 2017 check it out

Mitt Romney used the Netherlands to dodge taxes  #WhatIsMittRomneyHiding

Ugh Romney is going to be on campus today :( #gmuproblems

tell obama to match one bro lol

Already got my cloths in a table cloth on a stick just waiting on election day..soon they say romney I'm walking ou

So why does Romney not release his taxes, same reason. There might be something damaging

Via Romney's Upbeat and Optimistic Closing Ad  #twisters #teaparty

CBS News Covered For Obama on Libya #TeaParty #tcot #resist44

Obama's student-loan relief program becomes official.

its kinda sad when u can look at a complete stranger and can tell that theyre voting for obama

Dear Obama voters: If he did such a great job in his 1st term, why are we not talking about McCain states flipping instead of the reverse?

On the eve of the election, I found these 2 kicking it #Obama #Romney #Obama2012 Obeezy all the way !! Haha

Holy hell do I regret not being by the Capitol listening to #TheBoss and #Obama. Two legends less than a mile away and I'm in lecture #shame

Get Ready for Election Day 2012: Learn How The Obamas and The Romneysnbsp;Wed!  via

Obama win Another day Romney wins Jus another day Real talk I really don't kare It's jus funny listening too

I've tried not to be political on here or FB, but I get a little sick to my stomach thinking of Romney winning this election. #eek

OBAMA PEOPLE CAMPAIGNING FOR THE VOTE OF PEOPLE HE HURT THE WORSE!!!I JUST HOPE IF THE ONES THAT HAVEN'T VOTED YET!!!THINK ABOUT WHAT BEST!!

lol nothing boy.just vote for Obama

Barack Obama campaign officers working hard. 18 Tweets in 1 hour! Wishing the correct results tomorrow. Good luck Mr Prez!

Report on Romney getting charged for Violating Federal Ethics for concealing what he made from the Auto bailout!

It bears mentioning that Romney's event in Bucks County drawing over 25K is a kind of a big deal in Pennsylvania. #Pennsyltucky

yall females betta go vote obama , lords known how many kids some of yall woulda had if it wont for abortions . !

Business Insider: Here's Where Obama And Romney Really Stand On Crime

It's not about race for me. There were other black men that have ran for president before Obama.

Orlando, Fl. No Romney stickers in a college town? Shocking!! lol

romney or obama hmmmm. lol whatchu guys think???

I'm voting for the man who kept His word, who responded properly to the needs of others during hard times. I'm voting for Barack Obama

Everybody Needa Vote 2Morrow..#Team OBAMA

who's not doin their job? Obama onlyattended what half of his national security briefings. No wonder people died !!

Lets rid MN of, the crook #Klobuchar, the Obama puppet #Walz, the radical name calling #Ellison,the out of touch #McCollum  #Peterson! VOTE

naw its all about obama !!! Lol romney not fit to be president

That's weird since I'm going with my dad to vote for Obama after he gets home from his manager job??

I know it's been said before, but it bears repeating - tomorrow MATTERS. How Romney Would Treat Women

The Magic Kingdom's Hall of Presidents is ready for Romney!

SHE TELLING ME TO VOTE FOR OBAMA CUZ HE BLACK

What will you do if Obama wins election? #tcot #tlot #prepare

RT When #Romney blowout happens, Left will cry cheating, citing B.S. neck-neck polls. The Victory Gap wil

If #Obama loses. im killing myself because that fuck head romney is going to end up putting our counrty in a dept.

Romney commercial with newspaper clippings about a missing girl. Without the sound, really looks like Romney abducted a little girl. #tcot

I liked Ron Paul too just shows how much Obama  Romney are willing to ignore just because it doesn't fit with standard ideas

Pro-life vid of the day: Black Christian explains why he opposes Obama  via #prolife #GOP

I wonder if the 500 people in Ohio, that lost their jobs to China workers, will vote for Romney!

I really do hope Obama stays in the White House. #WhatKindOfNameIsMitt?

obama saved my family from bushs' bullshit so he got my vote. I wouldnt have my house if he wouldn't of became president.

LMAO Romney supporters are dumb as shit.  #WSHH via

People that like Romney and voted for him can go jump off a cliff into water with piranhas and sharks

At this point, if you're still undecided, I have nothing rational to say to you. Vote for Romney or I'll shoot my dog.

Need to  go canvas for the Obama campaign in a few. Puttin in that work for four more years of Progress

Nigga calling romney a true guy and trustworthy? Uhh he lied about jeep going to china in a commercial hahaha

Bill Clinton is playing footsie with Obama to protect whatever is left with Hillary's ambition 2 B President someday. Obama knows it.

Obama doesn't have to 'look' like a president. He IS the President RT Limbaugh says Romney looks more like

RT I hope all my american family is out there voting !! Hopefully for Obama !! OBAMA FORWARD !!!!

This line is long as hell but nothing going to stop my vote Mr Obama !!!!!!!

Number 97 -- President Obama signed the America Invests Act.

Yet Sabato still sees Obama as king in his Crystal Ball!

Well Sarah Palin has endorsed Mitt Romney on Facebook looks like he has the moron vote locked.

Mitt Romney doesn't care about education, that's why as governor of Massachusetts, they rose to top in the nation for education.

Fuck you Mitt wanna be a president Romney you fucking hoe nigga.

I bet none of yall could even tell me when Romney was governor without googling it.

Your intense enthusiasm is affecting the democrats they cannot think of Obama. They cannot boo, revenge as Romney is going 2 win.

Did anyone else see that Obama Rally that Stevie Wonder played at? Because he didn't.

Media purposefully under covering the desperate Sandy situation to support Obama. Much worse than you know. Pass along.

Romney waves to crowd as he gets off plane.

Obama will be in the lead until all the republicans get off work

If Romney some how pulls some BS off tomorrow night. And he will not but if I am seeking asylum  citizenship to Dubai, UAE. Lol! #RealTalk

Let me get this right: Bill Clinton believes that President Obama has made the military less racist, less sexist,

YALL ALREADY KNO I FINNA VOTE FOR OBAMA DOE THAS MY NIGGA

Obama: 500 - Romney : 38 Check out my latest electoral map forecast for the 2012 presidential election  via

People Walk Out on Obama at Virginia Rally  via 30,000 People have been standing in the COLD to hear Mitt

I am so nervous about tomorrow. I sure hope the landslide prognosticators (4 Romney) are correct. Meantime, I just eat more  more chocolate

- F U C K Romney

Photo: nba: President Barack Obama accepts a jersey and basketball from Lakers captains Derek Fisher and

The US Election status simply put:  #USElections #Obama #Romney

Barack Obama will keep this country moving forward,but he needs ur help.Vote for Barack Obama on Tuesday,November 6th  make ur voice heard.

Vote like your life depends on it! Because it does. A Romney/Ryan win will change this country for a long time. Please vote Obama/Biden

Yeah, just like they're deadlocked in OH --except that #Obama has MAINTAINED +5 there all along

State St. post #Obama speech  Pizza on State

Video! On Eve Of Election #JoeBiden Commits Biggest Gaffe Of His Career  #NEWS #Obama #WTF

Tell your mama to vote for Obama lol

THE GENERAL ELECTION IS TOMORROW, NOV. 6th. DON'T JUST VOTE. KNOW WHAT YOU'RE VOTING FOR! THIS ISN'T A POPULARITY CONTEST! MY VOTE = ROMNEY.

Cmon #wku obama chili and obama pizza for lunch??? Wtf???? And yes its the cheapest crap ever.

Chris Classic's View on Why He Supports President Obama

Why can't England have a cool queen/king like Obama or the Italian sex addict

Don't trust Obama. Don't trust Romney. Just pray for this country cause ummm.yeahhhh.

Can I just vote Obama to take over the UK as well or

I'm ready for tomorrow so we as One can Prove ppl in this world that we will have President Obama in the house for another wonderful 4 yeas

OBAMA IS MAN OF FAITH MAN OF COLOR.

if Romney wins the election i will be soooooo depressed. and i dont even live in America :S

I guess FEMA and the Obama Administration didn't know the population of NJ, NY, etc and didn't know to stock water, fuel, food, etc.

Romney Rock, James Bond Socialism: The Week's Best Pop-Culture Writing  - The Atlantic

#LieLikeMitt - Republicans in Congress blocked 4 seperate Jobs Bills, but guess what?  It's Obama's fault we don't have m

LOVE OBAMA (LOVE SOSA REMIX):  via

Pathetic sheep. Obama will hold early lead tomorrow, only until the republicans get off from work.#Romney

Ad Wars: Obama#8217;s #8216;#Republican#8217; Woman, Registered as  #anyone #BarackObama #Democrat #GOP #newtag

Tomorrow is the day Mit Romney becomes president #MitstheTits #Nobama

Chuck Norris, you suck. Vote Obama.

I am not voting for Bitch Romney! Fuck him  everybody else that loves him. If u don't like it then fuck u too. It's my opinion.

Let's play there game. Obama voters start lining up 3-4am to cast your vote. Put Mitt's voters waiting longer.

Nate Silver: Obama Has 86.3 Percent Change of Winning Election:  President Barack Obama continues to hold   #p2

Good Morning! Beautiful ppl :-) #TeamObama OBAMA GOT THIS POW POW :-) :-) :-) YALL GET TO THOSE POLLS TODAY

2016: Obama's America The Movie:  via if u haven't seen this movie, DO IT NOW!

In the NP, my pre-election column: I like #Romney. I always have. But I wouldn't vote for him. The GOP is too nuts. http

Me too. I'm going to an art collective with my little bro  for the results so if Romney wins lots of people can hold me.

R VIOLENCE PROMISED WHEN OBAMA LOSES? IAs Election Day nears, Obama supporters step up riot threats   via

Tomorrow I predict an early lead for Obama, but just wait and see what happens once the republican voters get off work #RomneyRyan2012

obama and ppl like you think Americans r to stupid. That We need big government to fix it for us. I say BULLSHIT !!!

If Romney wins my ass is leaving to Mexico (o,o)/

rather obama win or not ppl still aint qo have it qood BUT shit would be alot more betta cause romney dnt qive 2 fuks abt nobody but his $$$

Mychecks don't go as far asthey use to B4 Obama took office. If U want 2live like Europe  B controlled then O will deliver. NO O! #Mitt2012

HYPOCRITEKATRINANBC's Gregory Gushes Over 'Indelible Images' of Obama During Sandy; Is it an 'October Surprise'?

Obama rally with Bruuuuuce  Jay-Z!  Arena w/ 45 others)

Barbra Boxer on Now With Alex says Romney campaign is living in fantasy land. hehehe #Obama2012

Does anyone else find it odd that Obama has a 17 year old son that he's not mentioned in four years???

THIS IS 'WHY' OBAMA AND THE DEMORATS MUST GO! Bill Clinton slanders the military | Conservative News, Views  Books:

MT Libs warning riots if #Obama loses, Repubs promising jobs if Romney wins. Which vision represents hope? #p2 #Tcot #sgp

My VOTE IS WITH OBAMA, why vote for a LIAR who knows NATHAN bout your struggle!

Reuters:  Two cheers for Obama from Europe's press  #Gop2012 #Tcot #Tlot #TeaParty #election2012

what will your reaction be if Obama wins the election?

Where are we celebrating tomorrow if Obama wins? Lol

unless you give Nevada to Romney for some reason, then yes, it's Ohio

Obama and Romney scheduled to hit Ohio and Iowa on final campaign day.President Barack Obama and Republican chal

only dumb ppl make it about race ppl should watch the debates cuz sht if romney would do better than obama i would vote fa him

I find the idea that Mitt Romney could acc become the President terrifies me..

Paul Ryan To Social Conservatives: 'Religious Freedom' At Risk If Obama Is Reelected: How bad can I scare you!? Ass hat!

Possibility: Obama, Reid, and Boehner all return in January 2013 w less support/fewer members than last election. First

You Lazy Fuckers Better Get Off Your Ass And Vote Tommorow Cause OBAMA Better Win

Romney made millions on Auto Bail out  shipped Delphi

I think GJ will steal from Obama in Virgina, tbh. Romney can pick that state up.

Also these people freaking out over the election are annoying. With Romney or Obama ain't shit really gonna change. The world is fubar.

do not expect me to be in a good mood on wednesday if romney wins.

I'm not going to rest easy until Wednesday  I know for sure Obama has won. Sick to my stomach until then!

sooo Romney is taking away women's rights? #yeahno #fuckyou

BREAKING -- Limbaugh rehashing four years worth of his hate and sabotage of Obama. Full-throttal #SnapWatch!

Word on the street is Romney's in Virginia. I'll take that as my cue to leave the state now #politics

oh yea that's the biggest factor but no president could of saved the economy in 4 years Obama helped it from going into

All u welfare chicks only votin 4 obama so yall can stay on tht govt check n food stamps u lazy mfs.smh

Romney would overturn Roe v. Wade, and Election Day is around the corner.

Don't understand Republican rhetoric of 'Obama's failed economic policy', he's had months of growth in jobs and in GDP

If I was making over 250K a year I would vote for Romney too! But we broke in Louisiana so Im voting 4 da guy who helps da broke people.

I don't really see it as a race issue. Black people voted for white men prior Obama. And plenty of white people voted for

Obama can work with congress u know that #Gop blocked job proposals that they approved till Obama liked it then #gop hated it

you americans better vote for Obama I'm visiting your country and I want it to be a cool president

POLITICO MAFIOSO: MITT ROMNEY DRAWS 28,000 IN PENNSYLVANIA!

If Romney wins, I'm slapping da 1st white person I see!!!

To be honest, pretty much everything is set in stone. It is all in God's hands but you must V O T E! #Obama

Republicans argue Obama has gone from hope to anger. Not true of the man, true of his supporters in how they've responded to you lie  kenya

Barack Obama gets me on my Donald Trump shit #Forward

We have to back our President whether its Obama or Romney. We are still apart of the best nation ever: USA

#MindBlowingQuestions With Election getting closer, NOT who do you WANT to win, but who do you BELIEVE MIGHT WIN Obama or Romney? #Honestly

My nigga Obama bout to come threw with the Dub tomorrow !

Romney staffer with cammo hat did not want her face in the picture.

Not that its going to effect me or has anything to do with a British (nearly) 13 year old, but I'd rather Obama stayed President

be fucking educated! stop letting race decide your vote. whether Obama or Romney have a reason besides race to justify

Im votin for: OBAMA,Question 6, and Question 7. I need a job. No bs.

Well just called the election!! Looks like Romney is going to win!!

I recorded myself rapping as Michelle Obama to get you revved up to vote.Oh,you're pretty revved?Oh,OK then

Vote with your java: Obama and Romney latte foam art

Is NorthFace getting free advertising with Romney wearing their jacket while speaking?

Is there any truth to Obama saying 4 years ago that if he failed he would resign and if so why is he seeking a second term

if it wazint for obama we be in a great deppresion and he ant a ban wagen flip flopen fuck

but romney ain't sending my black ass to no africa ! ppl think im indian , arab or puerto rican swear ill FAKE IT !!

In Iowa, Obama will wrap up 2012 campaign where it all began five years ago - Washington Post:  #all

America, think about this, after all that has happened to our economy, can you really pull the lever for Obama tomorrow?

Still can't believe Obama hasn't called Sandy an act of terror yet. It's been a week! #typical

A telling sign that the country is better off today than four years ago: W. Bush has been in hiding this election. #Election2012 #Romney

Obama thinks u should get revenge for success, strong military, freedom, values. #tcot #1MOREDAY #FireObama #Montco #Bucks

I remember when hated Obama. Now he's tweeting to ole Barack. #loveit

Townhall- Obama: Replacing the Tuxedo with the Bomber Jacket: Liberal media outlets presented President Obama as

What do you mean taped? ahah i just love barack and despise romney.

My train still doesn't run. I dreamt it was, but had to jump down past lions to get to it. I boarded and sat next to Romney. #topicaldreams

#Delphi what would Romney have done. That' right, no bailout, all losers - no problem.

If Redskins win the office is upheld (9-0) if the skins lose the new party wins (8-1) looks like Obama loses along with the skins #Science

Who realllllly thinks Obama can fix things? Who reallllllllly thinks Romney can do any better? You're a fool if you think either or

I can't wait for election talk to be over. Also, if Romney wins, I will strongly consider a move to Canada. #mittens

If anyone above 13 can vote , Obama would be in office , no doubt !

Why a vote for Obama is a vote for my marriage and my civil rights.  Please look closely at this and vote with my

#Gossip #CelebrityNews Obama enlisting A-list to act as surrogates -   #Fun Yooo

MT In ultra-blue Alexandria, VA, someone thought it was a good idea to associate Obama w. #Occupy #OWS

Still cant compare wd Romney #Flipflops

I heard obama is taking the lead cos republicans aint off work yet!

yall voting for Obama right? :P

I know why you not voting for Romney, by why not Obama?

I think I'm the only person on tumblr who actually kinda likes Romney #awkward

If Valerie Jarrett stands by her threat to get even with Americans who oppose Obama our soil would be covered in more

Obama or romney tomorrow we will know

Watching Obama win while waiting for our own results in a small campaign office in Maryland while on a House campaign. #electionspast

OBAMA tells San Francisco He WILL BANKRUPT THE COAL INDUSTRY Energy to SKYROCKET!! :  via

watching debates make me soooooo mad with romney, i have to turn that shit off.

I have a question! Over here please. .. Mitt #Romney's speeches are, consistently, the opposite of inspiring. Ho

Face it Mitt, Obama is meant to be our president for the next 4 years

Account from Ohio man told to build stage only to find out it was for Romney to fire entire company from is brutal:

Mitt Romney's main objection to abortion is he's fully aware that he should have been one

Whatever youre saying now wont bring back my vote. Im not dumb, I put a lot of time into which candidate is worth my vote. Romney won

One of my favorite parts about this election remains to be beautiful endorsement of Romney.

New Stanford/NYU study documents the civilian terror from Obama's drones

As much confidence as i have in the the power of Obama I'm still nervous for tomorrow.

How can Romney Ryan want to eliminate some forms of birth control?! There will be even MORE pregnant women on govt assistance. Dummies.

it's a commercial on 1075 that says black men if you don't vote in the election Romney could win

My father said I'm not voting for Kaka womney Obama all the way Epi dats it

The Foreign Policy Case Against Barack Obama | History News Network

If you're voting against Obama cuz your life sucked the past four years, maybe you should stop sucking instead. It's not his fault.

If you vote for Obama just because he is black, you are an absolute idiot.

Election Day is tomorrow. Obama will obviously grab the early lead.. Until the rest of us get off work or home from school. #getajob #romney

IF BIG FOOT WINS, MIDDLE CLASS LOSES!  VOTE #OBAMA 2012 #FORWARD

Happy Election Eve! Read this before voting! Obama Responds to 10-Year-Old's Heartfelt Letter About Her Dads

so is it racist if I say white men if you don't vote Obama could win ?

If you're voting STRAIGHT DEMOCRAT, Punch President Obama's name first, then proceed to punch straight dem or else your VOTE IS VOIDED..

The story you link to says Obama/Springsteen only drew 18,000

if you don't follow me then Romney will become president and we don't want that so follow me:) heh

Mitt Romney has made only one position clear. He hates the health care reform plan that was based on his own. Nothing else is clear.

I voted for BARACK OBAMA I think that deserves a follow

if you post about mitt romney on Facebook and i don't know you that welli'm unfriending you. #notsorry #forward

I pray President Obama is elected for a 2nd term, if not I'm hitting Mitt Romney in the back of the head w/ a box of ramen noodles #TTLO

I hope all the people who plan to vote for Romney are dumb enough that they accidentally all veto him.

If Romney wins I'll punch porn and bacon in the face. Do you want that? Do you want porn and bacon to get punched?

Romney's Small Business Record Hotly Debated, But Surveys Offer

Let Obama, finish his speech then do ur commercial break #badtiming

Obama might be the lesser of 2 evils but he is also sounding just a tad naf.Get lessons from zuma and build a house in the hamptons nxt term

Obama better win this mother fucking election.

Today's projections show 201 to 191 advantage for w/o Obama swing states; 303 to 235 Obama win w/ swing states in count

Roll of the dice? Bookmaker declares election over, pays out on Obama win:

If you're gonna vote for Obama in 2012, be sure to vote for Obama in 2014 in the midterm elections. That's WAY more important!!

If Obama doesn't get re-elected as president then I will not be happy

TEAM MUTHA FUCKING OBAMA LETS GO!!!!!

Would Kanye then say, Obama hates white people??

make sure all #obama supporters get out and vote for barack on wednesday. Spread the word, #mittontuesday

votes for the first time , Mitt Romney Wins .

This sweet af  V - Vote O - Obama T - This E - Election

President Obama  the First Lady have already voted. Tomorrow, it's your turn. Find your voting location now:  http

Are you honestly  sincerely  suggesting Romney is,??

Conservatism is Calling is THE best video  on the Obama Administration. make it viral b4 2morrow's elect BQI  blog

#Obama, #Romney to make their final case on last day of race | #Elections #US | [VIDEO]

Obama, Romney storm into last day of election campaign: Obama, Romney storm into last day of election campaign

Feel bad for ppl if Romney gets chosen as president

US, #Romney better not win. I'm warning you unpredictable people. He better not win.

Tomorrow, after Obama wins the election, I'm going to forget Mitt Romney faster than Mitt Romney forgets about his own positions.

Volunteering today for team Obama ! Lets Barock the votes

from peru I really hope that Obama will win

I can't wait to go to my designated voting location tomorrow and fill my ballot and probably not vote for either Obama nor Romney. Go vote!!

These Obama supporters are panicking. Lol meanwhile Paul Ryan did His think in Minnesota. #NoHope this is a funny election year.

Going Straight to The Polls  Checking That Nigga MITT ROMNEY!

Just convinced my aunt and uncle to vote Obama! what a fight, you can't imagine. But that makes two votes fo

Nate Silver: Obama Has 86.3 Percent Chance of Winning Election - AlterNet: AlterNetNate Silver: Obama Has  an #P2

Mitt Romney is a wanker. It's a fact.

I simply cannot believe mit romney, it's so easy to say your gonna do stuff.

If romney when Smh Im seriously worried about what he gone do with us niggas.

Physicist Bob Park on the social, intellectual,  economic perils of voting for Mitt Romney. Short read.

Gallup has Romney +1 in their last poll. Gallup has only been off with +/-2% last three presidential elections:

Watching PBS with my daughterif Romney gets in office these things would be rare. # #obama2012

GO OBAMA, SONO CON TE!

morning doll..ooh I like your Obama tee. sparkly! I'm so lucky that got it for me. J'adore it!

well I'll tell you that I'm not voting for Obama

Obama will have the early lead tomorrow, until the Rebublicans get off work.

if you support Romney, your a dumbass with no sense of political and economical knowledge

A man who appears 2lie often 2get into the WH like Romney  should be considered a complete fraud

So I see this nigga in my timeline talkin bout voting for obama and being fucked either way but yu dont kno y #shutthatshitup

There are good reasons from the LEFT not to vote for Obama but let's stay away from ivory tower circle jerks in honor of #RomneyDeathRally

Obama President Thats What Up Fuck Romney

I'm southern IL, and for Romney and so are most of them in Massac co. Love You Ann!

I feel sorry for all Americans if Romney wins

Who voted on Obama based on what he said? And who voted for him cause he is black??

MT Bruce Springsteen and Barack Obama drew half the crowd expected in MADISON, WI day b4 election  | Hmm..

I know this is a strange thing to say but Michelle Obama's teeth make me really uncomfortable lol

Obama and the paradox behind his African American support base | Gary Younge

Haha this girl said if obama wins shes gonna move to a different state lmao like what is that gonna do when hes president of the COUNTRY

Doors to Obama/Springsteen/Hova rally opened at noon. At 12:45 saw Prez on TV speaking live in Wisconsin. Enjoy the wait, folks.

I actually want Romney to win, cause I have the balls to go up to congress and make a fucking fool out of him. I am not afraid of a coward

Conservatives predicting a Romney win probably suffering from a diet high in echo, low in information. #tcot #Dem #Obama2012

Obama drags Springsteen to all events today, no problem. If Romney had taken Kid Rock with him everywhere, media would call him desperate.

he's voting Romney love. Said Obama is the best speaker he's ever heard but hasn't followed through on promises :( love you Barack

Oh no! I read an article and it said that Romney's votes are about 47% and Obama just have 43%..I want Obama to win!

Romney exploits tax loophole via investment in Irish pharmaceutical company

Alright .. Yall Tommorrow is Election Day,Where My Obama fans At? #OBAMAYALL!We need dem DAM FoodStamps VOTE L0l.

Obama will be winning till all of the Romney voters get off work merica

Obama needs a vacation from his ego

All hands on deck. See that open door to success that Romney talks about. Lets walk with him through that door! Build shining US nation.

I'm moving #Forward because I want to live in a world where facts matter. Go Obama!

with Josh Romney and a voter at the rally in Plymouth #mngop

We already know the loser of the election: it's Obama's agenda  #TheDailyCaller

me  ellie were talking about mitt romney how many gay people were in america and i said 'it's nuts' #pardontheunintentionalpun

Especially when Romney does it in his best FATHER-KNOWS-BEST lecture voice - lip-smacking thrown in gratis!

Romney cuts ad for Berg in North Dakota Senate raceThe Hill (blog)The GOP presidential nominee appears in an ad for ht

I have been forced to sell my soul  persuade kids in my form that they should (hypothetically) vote for Mitt Romney. I don't need this!

Please do. Commented on: Obama leads but Romney with shot in electoral race - Road Runner:

Obama is promoting Tweets too, smh. I hate politics. All liars.

Romney is an investor. He invests in struggling businesses to help them regrow and produce profit. Aka he wants jobs here.

Raw Outrage, #Obama, #Hurricane #Sandy Relief Glitches - Looting, Gas Lines, Staten Island - YouTube

Why Obama gets my vote

I'm voting for obama. What of you?

If Obama was really in trouble in PA, wouldn't Ed Rendell be concern-trolling right now?

its obvious that unlike #Obama 4 whom I already cast my vote, u  condone childish behavior. Name calling? Really?

All i want for ma Bur-Day is Obama to win !

Wall Street Journal Pretends Romney's Tax Plan Adds Up - Media Matters for America (blog)

I member Obama won the first time Chuck Kennan called me like yea neph we in there neph lmao

If Mitt Romney is elected tomorrow could we please go to deadlock and have it fixed like The X Factor to just let Obama car

Am I being stupid, but are the yanks seriously considering that mental for rental Romney for president?? #Obama #Romney #USElection

My dad just described Mitt Romney as looking 'kind of sleazy' - I've been saying that for weeks!

I really hope obama wins elections  Dx

How could you say Obama has a ceiling of only 303 but Romney's is 315? Florida could go either way, making Obama's ceiling 332

DEAR AMERICAN CITIZENS, vote Obama or against Romney #elections2012

Obama forgets about open mic, asks Putin for space:  via

Rodeo Announcer Tells Crowd Michelle Obama is 'National Geographic'-Worthy  via

Note to and PA is not and will not be in play. It is solidly in Obama's column, despite your need for ratings #p2

As much as I want Obama to be president again, some of the shit people say about Romney is ignorant and just isn't true, at all.

If Obama or Romney wins Im gonna #startaRiot - It will be Quiet Riot and the song will be 'Metal Health'.

Chicago Media ignores Black Chicagoans' Protest Against #Obama's Liberal Agenda Causing Lost Job Opportunities -

Dude just asked me if I'm voting for #Obama, play boy do trees grow leaves? Do teachers teach? Tighten up

IM VOTING TOMA IM TOO HAPPY TEMA OBAMA BITCH!!!! #THIRSTY TWEET

Yea I hope Obama win but damn I can't make the difference

I truly agree with you.I have these same beliefs in regards to the poise and dedication for Barack Obama.Thank you for saying what I feel.

Yeah, sorry. BAM = oBAMa Saw it in a newspaper once and thought it felt like a cool, strong nickname.

What else is the option?  Our own Obama in making, Mr.RG, is not giving them any reason to cheer about.

Lets get that smile off Romney's face #voteobama

If Romney becomes president I gotta say no to ratchet pussy?

a day away from seeing liberals  explaining obama's victory due to global warming effects go figure

Obama vs. Romney: Girls at our BK site will be holding a mock election today! Stay tuned for pictures and to see who wins!

Barack Obama's lead widens among LGBT voters, reports Harris/Logo TV survey | Mitt

Chuck Todd just called 315 for Romney. Wow. Keep that mitt motion going. How much does the #GOP pay him? Wtf!

Romney's big moment: time for the Etch-a-Sketch candidate to seal the deal | Gary Younge  #worldnews

Fuck I'm Voting for Obama cause that Mitt might as well be Bush! And Bush didn't give a shit about not 1 middle class person!

driving around the lake and seeing Romney/Ryan signs everywhere  #RR

Be safe  JUST mark Obama if you vote for him cuz if u mark him  all democrats that double voting  your ba

if obama doesnt win i will stop having mcd im serious so now americans better be smart who can say no to mcd

Romney making me thirty minutes late to class and he says he cares about our education

You know your in in hudson when you see nothing but romney sighs #richasspeople

#Obama tried to restore ties with #Iran in 2009, report says  now #Israel wants to bomb them

Why Chicago Jews should vote for Barack Obama

I'm so stressed for the President thing in America, 4 MORE YEARS. Go Obama

check out 's excellent inspired word searches. he's doing romney threats against hair weaves now.

according to huffington post .obama: 277 romney: 191. let's hope.

How I wish I could vote for Barack Obama! Damn Italian politicians! Sometimes, I wish I could live in USA

Mitt Rodney was around my job yesterday, and today Bill Clinton is going to be around here! Where's Obama?.! Lol

I'm gonna Romney bash all night so watch out

Mitt 49% O 48% with  oversampled DEMS - Breaking: Gallup to Show Romney, Obama in Dead Heat  via

65 Outrageous Lies by President Obama:  via ~ RT this ppl! He is a liar, and very egotistical!

Oh? Election Day is tomorrow! Obama will obviously grab the early lead .. until the rest of us get off

Nation's Katha Pollitt nabs Mayor Bloomberg for talk re Obama/Sandy/NYC politics while he's weak from giving blood:

Wish I could vote for Obama! Sadly I am a Londoner!! But for all our sakes, I just hope that he gets 4 more years!Krishna

you got to remember its more poor people in The world then rich and poor going wit Obama. Tomy more for rich people

if obama does't win the election tomorrow i am done with the human race

Obama supporter came to door Sun. Asked him why I should vote for O.Answered he has done good job.Need a better answer at m

Check this out  Lists of Mitt Romney presidential campaign endorsements, 2012:

What is there not to like about Mitt Romney? I'm genuinely curious.

i say vote obama and steal romney's magic underpants!

It's looking more and more likely. I predict an Obama win! #election #BarackObama #VICTORY

Interesting the Globe has Paul Wolfowitz as the Ying (pro-Romney)  to Ignatieff's Yang (pro-Obama)

lol what if she gets into an accident tm goin to vote for Romney cuz shes a racist who hates blacks..youd feel like a dick huh?

I was watching him sing on CNN earlier.  Then, he and Obama started doing the 'Dancing In The Dark' dance.   ;)

I Hope Romney Wins ! It's Time For You African Americans To Get Yall Shit Together Yall Don't See White People Complaining Bout Him

This girl just said the reason why she is gonna vote for Obama because he is not a bullshitter. #HAHAHAHAHAHA #factcheck #dumbbitch

Thats what I say too. When I was a teen, teacher's opinions were the LAST I'd listen to. Duh! Kids don't like Obama's

I need some Obama gear for tomorrow!

If your voting democrat please do not press the vote all democrat button it will exclude Obama vote him first then se

just remember obama will catch a slight lead on election day, until everyone gets off work #teamRomney

President Obama has MY VOTE and IOWA loves him! We are praying every1 that can Votes for him. God

To all Americans, do the right thing tomorrow and vote Obama back into office. Mitt Romney stands against freedom and agaist what is just!!

I honestly can't wait until this election is over so I can stop hearing about Romney and he can go back to being irrelevant

definitely true here in Ohio. John Kasich works constantly to bring business and jobs to our state. NOT obama.

OBAMA! leading with 50% this monring against 47% Romney. Woo hoo

Barack Obama's brother Malik Obama has defied all odds to fly a Kenyan and USA flags in his compound,a preserve for govt bldg n embassies

They might as well keep him tho cause Mitt Romney sounds like the antichrist

Final pre-election Daily Kos/SEIU State of the Nation poll: Obama 50-48  It was 50-46 Ro

It's not about Obama its about yo moma

OH Romney Rally; scared white Christians w/no want to understand his platform MT hilarious/terrifying

Daily Beast: Gallup Poll: Mitt and Obama Tied: The president surges after Sandy.  tdb #P2 #US

#CNN got all these commercials dat say vote Romney bt no Barack commercial .. Wtf

Obama legalising Homosexualism  abortion z juz morally wrong. Dis cld be d reason y he might lose dis race!

oh they are going to bad! But some whites are gettin it for votin Obama! Idk bothis world fool

I wonder how much attention Obama would have given Dearborn if it were Muslims losing their homes and power.

Romney supports more domestic offshore oil drilling but Obama supports decreased dependence on fossil fuel. #Clegg1

.pre results 13317-27. Or post-Obama win?

Rudy Giuliani Calls on the fraud Obama to Resign  via

If Mit Romney wins I will cry.

Im working on it-thank you for support of #Obama

The line is deep to see Obama and Jay-Zin Ohio Photo: Long lines form for Obama rally featuring Springsteen, Jay-Z

point I was making exactly - Obama is likely to win, and also highly likely to fail to deliver.

haha, very true! But for now I'm gunna have to be team obama ! Haha

If Romney is elected tomorrow.then the Mayans were right ;O

They just played 4 commercials in a row blasting Barack Obama smh slander

Tired of all the political TV ads?  So are Obama  Romney - that's why they've turned to radio.

i bet Oprah is voting for Romney

v Barack Obama = without reservation the worst President in the entire history of the #USA + we must replace him #Romney

Romney!!!! Why would you vote for the guy who did nothing again dam people

kids tell yo mf parents to VOTE for Obama !!!

If Mitt Romney Loses The Election, Will His Pick of Ryan Over Christie Be A Contributing Factor?  #HSC

non traditonal student in comm class thought nicki manaji was michelle obama as a barbie. #wrong #starstudent

I will be genuinely annoyed if Mitt Romney wins tomorrow I really don't like him.

Dems: If Romney wins we descend into the apocalypse.Repubs: If Obama wins we descend into the apocalypse.Looks like we're screwed, y'all.

My prediction -- Obama will, and should, win on Election Day

U show me one Poll that's 8 days old  Romney isn't leading in that Poll so take an average of the current ones he's trailing

So close, but perhaps too far for Romney: Want to play a little pre-election game to pass the time and  #politics

If obama don't win tomorrow, black people will be highly upset lol

WONO Latest Romney's Claim of Pay Cuts for Doctors Under Medicare, Not True

r u saying if romney wins hes a moron or just that people will call him one ?

Mitt Romney is a idiot and Obama is the devil! Bye America! lol

Vetting Obama 2012: Obama and the Committees of Correspondence for Democracy and Socialism   via

Paul Ryan Mocks President Obama's Styrofoam Columns  via

President #Obama receives #NASA jacket [Image Credit NASA]

I mean who doesnt love michelle obama?

Obama's Ousted Campaign Coordinator Creates 'National Muslim Democratic Council'

Good thing Obama doesn't need to win Tennessee.

Aye yall hoes better hurry up and get yall abortions before Romney get elected.

Isengard:Romney::Mordor:Cheney - variations on a theme - also maybe Rivendell:PObama::Lothlorien:SOSClinton

Decision 2012: Which Candidate Would You Party With, Romney or Obama?

GAFFNEY: The Real Reason Behind Benghazigate; Was Obama Giving Arms To Jihadists?  #romneyryan2012 #obama2012 #tcot #gop

Our Military stands between our US  the terrorists. Obama failed 2use Military 2 protect US in Benghazi; Americans killed. Vote Obama out.

NY Daily News endorses Romney for president: The New York Daily News, which endorsed Barack Obama for pr  #neward

Someone just asked me who Mitt Romney is oh god

If Romney gets elected my career choice will be even worse then it is now #Fuckk #EarlyChildhoodEducation #ComeOnObama

stop lying! Mitt Romney's 5 Point Plan is the Same Plan as McCain in '08 and Bush in '04

That commercial made by Obama on MTV, If I could vote, Obama, you got mine. #Obama #NoRomney

well if Obama's elected why pick it? Hes just gonna take it from you an give it to the people that

Never seen a worse candidate than Romney, real conservatives hate him. Hes the poster child for neocons and big buisnesses

well, they're blaming all those things on obama, which means if he goes they'll all instantly be fixed right?

I hope ppl in the city understand what this election is about and not be naive to think there also a huge chance for Obama to lose

Let's make OBAMA president for another 4 years y'all!!  #TeamOBAMA

Voter suppression is a clear sign that the Romney campaign was 18 months ago and is still today a losing proposition.

**Sandy Victims Cry for Help as Obama Hits Campaign Trail**  via #SandyGate

11 Toss Up States, 146 Toss Up Electoral Votes in RCP Average, Obama with Only 10 Point Lead  #tcot

Remember to voteand vote #Obama my pocket book can't afford Rmoney.

What do you think of the branding of Barack Obama and Mitt Romney? Here's The Fix:

I feel like if romney wins im going to need to buy a gunwhich is totally acceptable.

#renameboringstuff Spam filter = electronic restraining order for Obama campaign emails

Just heard a young mom on the radio. Her husband lost his job, they almost lost their home, they have 2 kids, and she's voting Romney. WTF?!

Looks like Canada overwhelmingly wants Obama to win tomorrow, make sure you vote tomorrow American friends

The polls are wrong.  Obama will not get the turnout he did in 2008.  Romney will win the election.  Dick Morris and Karl Rove are right.

Wordsteam calls election for Obama!  Guess we can all go home now

More NY victims feel abandoned.  But Obama stopping in NJ one day is called a photo opt.

If Romney win niggas gone riot

you two better vote or momma beat will be angry. #Obama

I'm not gay and don't have a vagina.  But I don't think either of those things makes you less than a person.  If you agree, vote Obama.

I'm black and I made an informed decision for my choice as Prez. But let's be real, some folks only chose Romney b/c he is white.

Barack #Obama hates Staten Island! Why hasn't Kanye West spoken out this time like he did for 'Katrina'. #DoubleStandard

If Romney loses and you MSMers goad idiot GOP pols into making a big stand at the Iowa Straw Poll I WILL GRIND YOU INTO

Rs will love this. Independent in VA who backed McCain explains why Chris Christie tipped him to Obama:

stop supporting him. Obama stop lying to this country or at least fire clinton because he has taught you nothing

Virginia has seen a lot of strong polling for Obama - he's usually up three to four points. And he seems to be winning Ohio. #vote2012.

#WhyImNotVotingForObama is trending and I see Pro-Romney, Black folks even though Mormons see Black folks as cursed pe

Obama: America's half-blood prince

Three things learned about political media from endless Obama/Romney election coverage  #NABJ

Well good news is that with Romney as president we'll see an increase in the prostitution rings cuz you know broke niggas get lonely.

I think Obama is, you know, mostly OK, with serious reservations. And I hope like hell that he wins.

Romney  isent winning its not an option we will have a war every two years if he wins

Really want Barack Obama to win the American Election.

I have a feelin my tweets will be nothin but about obama today

that is unless you are voting for Obama; in that case the polls open Wednesday. Ill see ya there #fart

Looking at this huge line to see Romney is literally making me wanna vomit #justsayin

When Romney wins #LBRC has to fast for 40 more days

Romney should stick to the Just For Men adverts #RomneyYouPlonker

Congrats to President Obama  for successfully running out the clock on Benghazi before the election.

Romney Landslide to Follow Christian Surge???  via

Springsteen: Obama's 1st debate really freaked me out  Rush: Yea his whole 1st term has really FREAKED us all out!

#AVoteForObama is a vote for crony capitalism.  Obama decides who succeeds and how much of the fruit of your labor you get to keep.

Not that bad I would expect. There is a fairly universal dislike of Romney in sensible people.

Romney is so much of a prick it hurts

The majority of Blacks voting for Obama cause he black, and whites voting for Romney cause he ain't black. Let's be real bout this.

Barack Obama Doesn't Understand the United States

Obama will lie until the day he dies about anything because it is Hood to do so. Anything goes in the hood.

If Romney wins | Move to Canada? It's Not That Easy :

Vote for America!! Vote Romney-Ryan!!

Obama will be ahead in the polls tmrw. At least until the Republicans get off work

tomorrow is the big day we find out who are president is goin to be im ready for obama to take it for another 4yrs

in a sane world, the only person that would be voting for Mitt Romney tomorrow, would be the homophobe himself

Gallup poll Nov 1-4: Romney 49% Obama 48%.

think we'll get some dems too. Sitting next to one at the Romney rally in swing state VA. she's stoked to b here

Its produced by Harvey Weinstein, one of Obama's biggest and most vocal supporters

This election now comes down to just 3 states. CO, VA and OH. Obama just needs 1. Romney needs all 3.

Why are you voting for Obama or why do you want him in office  ? Have you ever thought about that ?

don't even live in america but if Obama doesn't win i might cry

Go Romney/Ryan!!! Get this man out of the white house he's already messing with our pay and benefits he so isnt for the military !!

#Isn't it sad that the only way that Obama can garnish a semi decent audience is to have rock stars and hollywood stars there

Read President Obama's response to 10-year old's letter about her gay dads, marriage equality and bullying

Obama is for Obama! Romney is for America! Obama for socialism  dependence! Romney is for freedom! Obama's FORWARD is BACKWARD for America!

i hope obama wins for elections tomorrow

Someone telling me obama is probably gonna win ruined my week #beyondpissed

Obama's transparency promises stall   via

two blocks from here they have 20 signs, their house was destroyed by storm but they put up Romney (20)

You're not team Obama if you can't vote, hoes.

If romney lying ass win this election then that's just prove that america is done and I'm moving to england!

Is He really??  Obama to spend Election Day playing bball. Bc it's not like he's the president or anything.

MITT ROMNEY ?? sounds like a porn star for president? Let me touch you with my MITT ? #usaelection

Bernie U R 1 of the smartest people I've had the honor to listen to. When Mitch Mcconwl publicly stated the right only 2B 2 keep Obama 2 1

And I also hope that people understand that #Romney isn't ready. Man contradicts himself way too  much to be trusted.

It's in your damn hands people if Obama wins I'll make brownies for everyone I just don't want an homophobic president

If Romney win everthing going be high even mcdoubles lol

Obama's Reelection Hopes Built on Three Improbable Things: Could President Obama win reelection tomorrow? Sure,  h

Every black rapper supports Obama..i gurantee none of them even know whats going on lmao just like me, stop promoting it

Oh I'm full on in the landslide camp and here's why: NY near Albany - Romney signs all over, Obama - ZERO. Full

[News] Obama's Election Day playbook: Basketball - USA TODAY: Obama's Election Day playbook: BasketballUSA TODAY

#Romney Skips Presidential #Youth Debate: (young people want a world not torn down  sold for parts)

Vote Obama! He cares about all citizens  not just rich (Romney). If u r a women vote for Obama otherwise u should be ashamed of urself.

Any concealment on the part of Romney affects his 9 life path badly.  Obama's numbers show inevitability, however, turnout factors. CLOSE.

When you hear that Romney is a Mormon does it remind anyone else of Jilted John ??

They tryna create secret ways for obama to lose . . . smfh

Disturbing Signs #Romney Would Steer Us to Into a Capitalist Dictatorship  #independent #tcot #gop2012 #p2 #tlot

Obama needs to get that W tomorrow!!! #TeamObama

Romney knowing about business because of his time at Bain Capital is like me knowing how to fight because I watched The

Romney has John Elway's support in #CO  Bart Starr's support in #WI. They know that Obama is Americ

Both President Obama and I leaving Madison and #NASPA4e at the same time. His plane is just a bit bigger.

Obviously, I want Obama to win this election.

Obama already blames and hates the American people, simple for existing.

I'm anxious to see in 4 years if everybody is so amp about voting when Obama can't be elected again

O HLive in canton Ohio. All Romney

Tried to explain the differences between Romney and Obama to my mother. Oh dear. Tried was the operative word.

I think Paul Krugman would be a great addition to the Obama administration. just have give him a congress as well. #ctl

Vote Obama I'm just getting the word to every one VOTE !! Obama !!

If Mitt #Romney wins the presidency tomorrow would the last person to leave the USA please turn out the lights.

Obama coming to Chicago today or tomorrow?

I'm actually freaking out about the election .. pray to God Obama wins .

If you are american and not voting for obama then shame on you. SHAME ON YOU

I hope you voted Obama as Romney is a cunt!

I'm a little down on bunnies this year. They ate way too many of my flowers. I suspect they are Romney supporters.

I'm not American but if I was I'd vote #Obama2012 cos #Romney just looks like a cunt!

Romney did say he would sign Life at Conception legislation. This would be a huge intrusion of gov't into health decisions.

Meet me in a land of hope and dreams: Springsteen and Obama in Madison  #ObamaMadison

How could anyone vote to keep Obama in the white house when he has failed on every promise he made in 2008?

Very well said Couldn't agree more. Nice guy, Romney. Too bad about his party

Obama neh jitt jaanamy dad just said it so it must be true

All Romney supporters keep the faith, turn out and vote tomorrow!

Happy Monday! Did some volunteer Obama phone calls today.Tonight its Mrs.Obama  Bruce Springsteen w/ President Obama rally!

This girl in my class didn't know who out of Obama and Romney is a democrat. Cooommee on now.

Democracy Corps Obama +4:  -- Consistent w/ polling avgs-538 etc-if Dem turnout strong/cell phone undercounts considered

obama is a Dbag Romney looks like a bully. there is NO win for America

Obama banks on Bill Clinton to clinch close states

So because Romney believes in a religion you're not familiar with he's a terrorist?

(1/2) i think should go on TV and talk about Obama how bad it  will b if he gets 4 more years and there wi

When is someone going to mention Obama's job creator , G.E.opening plant's in CHINA?????

It's not Obama. It's the FDA. Obama smoked mad bud in his day.

Wen Obama loses those stupid people in Chicago wil riot watch They'll burn down their own fuckin neighbrhoods that's how stupid they r. -dad

You must be listening to the lame stream media. BC they're NOT. Wake up Kirsten.. don't waste your vote! Vote for Romney.

If tweets were votes, Obama would have enough to win Ontario, British Columbia, Manitoba and Alberta. But not Texas.

I want Obama to win because I'd like to see the Supreme Court's white men feel increasingly cornered and uncomfortable.

Omg! ADMIRAL JAMES LYONS has just given his assesment of how POORLY OBAMA handled #BENGHAZI, labeling it COVER-UP   CRIMINAL!

If Romney wins, people will bitch and complain If Obama wins, people will bitch and complain. Either way, people wi

my two cousins are bloody imbeciles. They've Vote Romney on their Facebooked. Argh.

If your music library contains lots of Meatloaf, Ted Nugent, and Kid Rock, Romney probably already had your vote locked up.

A vote for Barack Obama is a vote against all of us, women  men. Stop lying about Mitt Romney  stop lying to women.

Mitt Romney doesn't care about New Jersey!

Man Hands Down I Know OBAMA Gone Win He Got Dis Forget ROMNEY ! #NBS

what would people do if it was a Romney doll instead of a Obama doll OUTRAGE I TELL YOU

Obama may not have been born with a silver spoon in his mouth, but he did have a Communist or two in his ear! #RomneyRyan2012

Lets retire Joey Biden on Tuesday!  A vote for Romney is worth keeping Biden far away from the White House!

How important is this obama vote ?lmao

This was false advertisement I'm frazzled now Obama will hear about this

lol I wouldn't be mad. In fact I'm not mad at anyone voting for Obama I just think it's the wrong decision.

I saw a lot more support for Romney in both Nevada and Colorado :S #imneverthispolitical

'Cause, America, Obama is an awesome human being. That's who you want at the head of your country.

Romney wont respond but will swear he did!

I'd say it's looking good for Obama, judging from swing state polling over the past week. Breathe deep, and pour wine.

Who's voting for Barack Obama x (0) or Mitt Romney (0) #VOTE

N I wonder how many of you lazy niggas is just going to vote for Obama tomorrow n just walk out smh

POLL: Glee, Modern Family Getting Voters To Support Gay Marriage, Even Romney Supporters: The Hollywo  #gay #news

President Obama has tweeted twice about climate change this election. Governor Romney, zero.

CNN poll showing Idiots Likely to Vote; 99%-1% in favor of Obama.

Obama wants to start building America! Manufacturing jobs and clean energy.  He got us out of a war and now he

Why the hell are Romney posts showing up in our feed?  I'm not following that assclown, he gives me douchechills.  If he wins #WEREALLDOOMED

Who do you think has better taste in food ? Obama or Romney ? Judge for yourself. A Guide for the Truly Undecided Voter

I would just hate it if Mitt Romney wins !

eiiii Na Fight! Romney Steal Ya Businez Idea?? Loool , Morrow U go Vote or Still Stalled

I repost my own shit..all i want 4 my b-day is #Obama 2 win

No sane person would vote Obama.  Romney 2012-2020

Well if Romney ends up winning the election, america will make history for the first mentally disabled president.

Romney numbers on energy subsidies are complete BS:

Lines went pretty smooth at Nationwide Arena. and I are watching a video presentation getting people stoked for Obama.

2 outta 3 of my favorite famous guys are telling me to vote for Obama:-/ my heart is breaking#vote #RomneyRyan2012

and in the US today, voting will go towards Mitt Romney because TV Comic Homer Simpson has changed his vote #wtf #stupidityAtItsFinest

tomorrow is election day and Obama bby is going to be president for another term. yes ok

If Obama wasn't running against Mitt Romney. I wouldn't be voting for him

The more I learn about my country under Barack Obama, the more I don't want him anywhere near my country. #obama #usa

In all fairness David Cameron is no where near as creepy as Mitt Romney.  At least David doesn't have 20 sons that look like younger hims.

I hope that obama wins so badly

Has anyone else ever noticed how many MORE people are there whenever Romney is speaking as oppose to when Obama is?

Americanwriter.US Bayesian Truth Serum and the Obama Re-Election - Forbes: Bayesian Truth S

Obama clearly ahead in endorsements from independents, moderates  even Gov. #Christie  #Bloomberg #Republicans. Let's move #Forward #Vamos

Mitt Romney use to rape kidshe still doesI have no evidence to back this uphe do!!!! #OBAMA

I think America's pretty cool tho .. omfg but what if Romney becomes your president lol t

It's really scary to think that our country could still be run by Obamahowever Romney is going to win right

If anyone else has seen the film 'the campaign', Mit Romney is basically Will Ferrill's character hope Obama wins 2marra!

Don't see how Obama can lose this election!   #Obama2012

Obama has got to be the skinniest Simoan I've ever seen! Lol #JustSayin

Obama will get an early lead tomorrow until all the people who work get off of work #bluecollars

I think its a little presumptuous that Michelle Obama keeps coming on my Pandora and thanking me for voting for her husband tomorrow

ROMNEY NABS 28 NEWSPAPER ENDORSEMENTS FROM OBAMA'S SIDE -  #AZ #NC #FL #OH #MI #VA #CO #NV #IA #NH #PA #MN #WI #OR

The Tea Party needs to go! ~ Obama says today in Wisconsin. #tcot #conservatives

I uploaded a video  Mitt's Gotta Fast Car- Vote Obama

Obama, Romney focus on swing states in late campaigning: Obama and Romney made their final urgent pleas to voter

Thank You Mr Trump..Cant Wait to VOTE for Mr. Romney tomorrow!

My cartoon - Iain Duncan Smith laments 'appalling demonisation' of Mitt Romney

Romney's odds move way up if he wins VA and NH

New Hampshire - 2012 President - Obama 49%, Romney 49% (ARG 11/2-11/4)

If Obama wins, I'm leaving the country. If Romney wins, I'm leaving the country. This isn't a

My professor said the same thing while wearing earrings with Obama's face on them

Company President Emails Workers About Consequences If They Vote For Obama  via #fail #GOP #TCOT

UAW Charges #Romney With Profiteering From Auto Bailout

Shit I Shoulda Voted For Romney.. Y'all Niggas Working My Nerves Lol

Obama's keep calm shirts are way better than any of mitt romneys shit.

why are people surprised that im not voting for Obama? is it because im black?

If Mitt Romney wins tomorrow, he better get me that good job he promised.

wahhh :( we need the Romney voters. Poopy

Photo: barackobama: Before President Obama took office, the economy was losing 800,000 jobs a month. Now,

I swear if Romney wins this election, I can already kiss college goodbye because Romney's dumb ass is about to cut my only way of paying.

If Romney is Elected he will create 7mil new jobs! In China, Mexico #outsourcingAMERICA

WRAPUP 2-Obama, Romney focus on swing states in late campaigning: WASHINGTON, Nov 5 (Reuters) - President Barack

This article is so true. What's also true is that Obama is BARELY better. He spent a fortune on his campaign in

It seems like a good time to watch Mitt Romney and the Infinite Sadness.

If Romney ends up being elected i will literally start crying.

that's a relief we're already stretched thin we've been tailing Romney for months now

Oh, the same CNN that had polls showing that Scott Walker would lose his recall bid?  Ah well, that's believable.  #Romney

27th in Math among OECD 18 year olds' share of DEBT:$218,676. CORRECT MISTAKE KIDS Vote #Romney #OBAMA2012 #YOUTH

LET'S MAKE THIS GO VIRAL! OBAMA'S HORRIBLE RECORD CHRONICLED! When Obama wrote a book and said he was  via

Aah yes forgot Romney. Good call. Perfectly topical, the man's a clown

Romney is losing all on his own with lies an flip floping.  No one else to blame but his lies and misquotes.  He has had enough chances,Done

Loved the COAL=JOBS ON THE CAR!! I SAY FIRE OBAMA TOMORROW, let's get this country back!

If Obama wins the election I'm leaving the US.If Romney wins I'm leaving the US. This isn't a political tweet, I just really want to travel.

RT if you only voted for Obama in 2008 cause he was BLACK.

Bone tired of election stuff, but it's hard to look away. Like watching a train wreck. Obama's strategy is an ab. decrepit joke. #tcot

LOOK, IF YOU DON'T (OR DIDN'T) VOTE FOR BARACK OBAMA, WELL THEN FUCK YOU.

Obama Responds to 10-Year-Old's Heartfelt Letter About Her Dads   . Another reason to love #OBAMA

We will not forget and we will follow up to make sure you get all the help required until rebuilding says obama  #jou3991

O yea and vote for OBAMA bc yall asses ain't rich hell especially if yall done ate noodles 0.o white and black!

Vote Obama only if you want to go #forward over a cliff!

make sure you vote.for OBAMA!

Always fascinating celeb VIPs who support politicians! Bruce the BOSS for Obama, Kid Rock for Romney! #No contest

TAL WAS DRESSED AS MITT ROMNEY??????????? ROMNEY'S A BUTT

Anyone else notice the lefts new talking point they are pushing so hard is that if Romney wins its because of fraud  voter suppression

Bill Clinton had so much oral sex or what ever it was that he said he didn't have i think be has blown a gasket.He is as bad as Obama.Liar

Former pacific fleet commander Admiral James Lyons says Obama actions in lybia are criminal and are a cover up of historic proportions.

i really hope obama wins! he's just so cool

For the record 4 MORE YEARS FOR PRESIDENT OBAMA, VOTE TOMMORROW 11.6.12

you all should be ashamed at the way push Obama  alienate Republicans while calling yourselves unbiased journalists. It's embarrassing

Hold a spot for me in line Ohio !!!!! Team Obama !!!!

Obama has 32 months of straight job growth. No more be said. FORWARD!!!

The Real JOBS president. MItt Romney. He will provide an environment to create real JOBS. #HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA!

It doesn't matter if Obama or Romney winswe are still gonna complain

Obama slamming Romney on the campaign trail..actually describing himself perfectly.

I just got another offer from AARP.I just love putting Obama's name on it and sending it back in that prepaid envelope.Joined #AMAC instead.

Obama wraps up today with speeches in Ohio at 4:10 pm ET and Iowa at 10:50 pm ET.

Bill Clinton: what's w the cookie jar comment? Romney worked as governor for 8 years and declined the gov's salary,

Google Moshe Shak and the Bible Codes, vry very interesting about the election, a must read, blessing Romney from the God of the universe

My Grandpa Said Oh Shut The Fuck Up To The Mitt Romney Commercial  My Grandma Said Bitch Onama Don't Even Know You ! CTFU

Just in case you know someone who is still considering Obama:

If I here anyone mention voting for Romney now that I cant vote they better pray I dont hall off and smack the taste out of they mouth

That's y the white people n republicans call black people lazy now.! Everybody want Obama to win.! But don't wanna do wut it takes for him 2

I voted for Barack Obama b/c he cares abt my 9 yr old nephew's access to healthcare even though his working mom can't afford it. #Forward

You should really read this.  i just sent my mom an email asking her not to vote for romney

If Romney wins we in for a hell over the next 4 years lol strap in and strap up ladies and gents

Wow, dey going da wall street road Romney's chances lookin good frm dah angle

Obama picked Jigga to campaign with him because he's the most influential Hip Hop artist

vote for anyone but mitt romney. please.

I've been a vegetarian for 39 days. I think my first burger back should be eaten after I hear that #Obama is the president for 4 more years.

I feel like my bull Romney 47% of y'all can get this

Obama has ruined the us economy! Not that I care but yeah #TeamRomney

Fox banner right now: FMR CLINTON ADVISER DEFENDS PREDICTION OF 'ABSOLUTE LANDSLIDE' WIN FOR ROMNEY#FoxNews

If you're voting for who's best for youobviously it'll be Obama. Based on the simple fact that you're a student.

He knows what it's like to be unemployed. He hasn't worked in years. VOTE ROMNEY 2012

obi-wankenblowme: Romney supporters speak up at Ohio rally [video]This is horrifying.

I'm horrified of Mitt Romney, but I don't want that to take away from the fact that I like Barack Obama and I hope he succeeds! Go vote!

This dude said Romney gonna win in a landslide #Whut?!

obama don't insist to call me  told you I'm busy today hahaha just follow me ;P

can u believe that by next week mitt romney might be our president im crying thats so embarrassing i am moving asap

Go out and vote our future Depends on it ## team Obama##

If I lived in America I would vote for #Obama

Is there anything that Mitt Romney supports  ? LOL I seriously can't watch news anymore.

if obama lose niggas gone be shooting

The U.S. Economy By The Numbers: 70 Facts That Barack Obama Does Not Want You To See  via

Rasmussen Reports--8 States Will Decide! Daily Presidential Tracking Poll: Romney 49%, Obama 48%

See, how is it that Romney supporters think those who CAUSED the mess are the ones to get them OUT of the mess?

. gets out the #Romney vote in Grand Junction, CO. Packed house!

Why any woman (any person really) would vote for Mitt Romney is beyond me. You'll lose the right to control what happens in your own uterus.

It better be a Obama Election Party I don't fool with Romney!

Attendees Walk Out On Obama At Virginia Rally  #romneyryan2012 #obama2012 #teaparty #tcot #tiot #gop #ocra #sgp #VFW

I can't believe Mitt Romney's policies! Like extremely hard access to birth control and abortion! #Obama2012

Romney says marriage is between 1 man  1 woman. That's better than his grandpa who believed that it's between 1 man  5 women. #mormonjoke

So they're predicting Obama will pull ahead early tomorrow, however, they expect Romney to win it all when all the republi

Romney wouldn't allow same sex marriages, but Obama would.  #Clegg2

College students who voted for Romney don't know that if he becomes president, he'll be cuttin' college scholarshipGrant funds by 42%

I hope obama doesn't get re-elected so we can have him

4th Grader To Obama: Mr. President, Why Do People Hate You?  Don't reward GOP campaign to demonize this man. #VoteObama

(via Twitchy) Beyonce shows off massive Obama earrings, fashionistas drool

you wanna tell me Bush/Katrina-Obama/Sandy got same/fair coverage? Look at the Rice vs Clinton as a point to prove u wrong.

if obama doesn't get re-elected then re-evaluate okay just re-evaluate what happened

A lot of older white ppl know Romney policies trash but they'll rather suffer than prosper wit a nigga in office

Dick Morris, former Bill Clinton advisor, says he's 90% sure Romney wins and 60% sure it's in a landslide victory #RomeyRyan2012

#Presstitutes ignored Obama's bad econ, #Benghazi, FFur, credit rating downgrade, high poverty leves, etc. they will always cover 4 him.

I love his Obama impression

Rory is dumb lol of course he's gonna vote for Romney lol

The world is in big trouble if that muppet Mitt Romney wins the race for the White House #AmericanHitler

he's half white you know. Clinton got people OFF unemployment. Obama has allowed people on to disability at a record number

I do bless you President Obama, I bless you, in the name of the Holy One of Israel, Yahoshua Ha Mashiac!

Mexicans even starting to move back cause Obama is terrible

Yep. Thats right. I follow Mitt Romney on insta.

Proof obama covered up Benghazi.

TWO gr8 letters! / Obama Responds to 10-Year-Old's Heartfelt Letter About Her Dads

Election Special Find #Mitt #Romney on social networks like Facebook and Twitter. Click link for Speyder results

Expect 8 more years of war with Mitt Romney; Expect move towards Peace with Obama - Hispanic Politic

Some ppl making jokes about this election but it's not funny anymore! This shxt serious! If Romney win half of is gone b fucked up! smh

Beat obama, haha, what a stupid sign. As said, man what is he, a final boss in a game?

They dnt want ppl to vote for Obama. They letting ppl vote early  so they can NOT Count their vote.

Mitt Romney thinks that I shouldn't go to college bc my people can't afford it! How will I ever make a difference in

A Cuban-American gay guy gives his abuelita the what-for 'cause she voted for Romney:

Why anyone would vote for Mitt Romney is beyond me. Mixing religion with politics only leads to a giant shit storm of shit. Stupid hick

Heard today Obama will likely take an early lead tmrw in the pollshowever, once the republicans get off work, the gap will close fast

Thanks but not needed. I already voted early for Romney.

My final prediction; popular vote romney 50 Obama 48. Electoral college? As Ohio goes so does america.

Long line waiting to get in to Michelle Obama rally.  Doors open at 3:00.  Ricky Martin performing

I think Justin just convinced me too vote for Romney. Haha

If you believe the only reason to vote is for revenge vote Obama!

Turkey: America's new key ally in the Middle East? - Relations between the US and Turkey have soared during Obama's

If you're voting for or supporting Romney tomorrow.. Just tell me so I can stop being your friend. I'm sorry, I just hate idiots. #obama2012

If Obama loses, American's have lost it #TeamObama

Boy Romney be talking out his ass..lol

I hope y'all still not  just voting for Obama cuz he black.

The endorses Governor Mitt Romney for the election. Looking forward to voting for your choice tomorrow?

damn its Romney Ryan signs posted all around my cribthese white folks on it boa

He waited  then reached for Mitt Romney's hand-catching the candidate's eye.  Colorado Springs, CO 11.3.12

more niggas from the NBA donate to Obama tho

I see .. So you Obama or Romney? Or is that to personal :3

Dear America, meet your #Romney supporters, including Meat Loaf - #Ohio Romney Rally - Interviews with Supporters:

The Democrats have already been saying that if Romney wins its a fraud.

Hmm.. even Youtube supports obama

Was hyped up early this morning when I heard Obama speaking on the radio They followed that with Jeezy My president is Black!! #Turnup

make the right choice. barackemrack obama 2012.

What y'all going do if Obama loses?

i hope all mii twitter follower voted #Obama

Tomorrow we begin a new tomorrow ~ M. Romney

Bill Clinton calls slurs our military by calling them racist, sexist, and homophobes. Vote Romney, enough said!

Team Romney BabY im HYpEd to vote !

you're giving them too much credit how Romney was even in contention is beyond me.Even if I was white trash racist I'd vote Obama

Obama promises to unite the country; cut deficit in half. Instead, he cuts country in half and doubles deficit. How is this

Fuck Romney yeah I said it FUCK ROMNEY

Unfollowing everybody that follows Mitt Romney#True #Preach

NC has always been a iffy state. I won't be surprised it Romney win won majority if the votes there.

#Forward. I survived the Reagan years. It was bad for my mom and me. Clinton gave me prosperity. OBAMA has given me hope its not all SSDD.

Obama's Prop Joke: All Presidents are Simply Props #Prop #Obama #Nobama #Election #vote  via

Dear GOP: stop praying and start governing!  #teaparty #politics #religion #obama #ryan #romney #election #god #uspoli

Get your terminology right: Mitt Romney is a Mormon; Ann Romney is a Mormaid.

My lovely gay followers. If you even dream about getting married then vote for Romney views being gay as a disease.

Haha nigga say Romney the American Fidel.

#Obama top 50 accomplishments #26. Improved Food Safety System: In 2011, signed FDA Food Safety Modernization Act, w

Will #Obama's early voting strategy work? Political commentator Amy Holmes talks #election2012 on #LarryKingNow:

Springsteen 'freaked' by Obama's first debate - USA TODAY: The Associated PressSpringsteen 'freaked' by Obama's

Probably part of Romney's 5-point plan. #RepublicansAgainstRomney

#Benghazi  #Sandy forgotten storms and.media coverup for Obama by  others

Maybe they forgot? CBS Releases Previously Withheld Obama Interview on Benghazi:  via

fuck all yall hoes who voted for Mitt Romney

If Obama gets elected tomorrow then the Mayans were right..

No, wat I mean is no self respecting woman, black or white, should ever vote romney/paul

OBAMA LANDS COVETED PEE WEE HERMAN THEATER MASTURBATION ENDORSEMENT from Paul Rubenfeld

Not an American, but I'm celebrating if Obama wins the elections tomorrow - TeamObama

I'm Barrack Obama, and I approve this message

Unfathomable how any Patriotic person could vote 4 Romney/GOP with how BLATANTLY they're trying t

No candidate has ever lost an election as bad as Mitt Romney will tomorrow you'll remember I said this!

Hi Gov. Wilder. I'm a Repub. in Blacksburg and would vote for you for Gov again if you ran.  I hope you vote for Romney.

great come back bro! loll  so im taking it ur voting for romney?

Whoever voting for romney please unfollow me (:

SO hes doing what you did to Obama? Wowat least now you realize what a fool you looked like

This is the daily reminder that Mitt Romney thinks PEOPLE ARE NOT ENTITLED TO FOOD!

If I had to run against #Obama, I might want to suggest he was foreign, communist, fascist, Muslim, pseudo terrorist. You know, a fiction.

Romney will never be able to relate to the working class.

A Romney/Ryan supporter just tore a gas hose apart because he forgot to remove itkuncklehead

Didn't Obama say he'd cut thru all the red tape?He just continues to fail. His family isn't affected, if the truth be known, he doesn't care

I find this one absolutely hilarious. Obama promised the world before he was elected and he hasn't done anything positive.

In honor of Mitt Romney we have placed a code on our web site for 10% off! Just type in REALCHANGE this is only good thru election.

Last time I checked he wasn't running.and Obama is about as bad as Bush hence why its been 4 years and no balanced budget

Romney to campaign in Ohio, Pennsylvania on election day in a final attempt to win these two critical swing states. #election2012

Lots of great shots in this photo essay contrasting Obama's 2008 and 2012 campaigns.

Romney never talks about what he can do. Only what Obama hasn't. And he never discusses what Obama has done.

Not only has President Obama NOT fucked anything up, he has been SUCCESSFUL in situations NOBODY envies facing. We can

Obama leading by 1.3 percentage points across 12 national polls. Close election, get out and vote! #GObama! #Obama2012

.I'm anxious to get the Romney administration to work !

If Romney wins, it will only be bcuz GOP Govs  operatives did everything in their power to suppress/deny Dems right to vote

Pity Obama, if it was Africa, his worry wd be to either get 90% or 70% of the vote  whether to charge Romney with rape

if Obama doesn't win the election then America is mad and domming us all

Ft. Hood was terrorism, benghazi was terrorism. Obama balks at that word. Vote no-bama.

Massachusetts in 2003, Mitt Romney was for abortion, gay marriage and social security for all! In 2012, Romney was AGAINST! It is a LIAR!!!

Romney rally has officially ruined my day

Wearing my Obama t-shirt in case it becomes irrelevant tomorrow. #kishi

Obama has 3 positive comments to every 1 negative  (3:1), Romney has a (1:1) ratio on Twitter #NewhouseSM4 #SMPolitics

I wish ignorant females would stop voting for Romney because their parents do. #lookatthefacts #besmart

So, if I'm reading that correctly. Obama's numbers are down BIG?

If Obama doesn't get elected, it's fine. We'll take him.

One day left before the election, and the forecast still hasn't given Romney a 100 percent chance of winning West Virginia.

Cine: Getting down at the obama rally!   #obama #rally #twostep #letsstaytogether #dancing #grooving

Just saw a house with Romney posters all on it and there were like 8 Spanish people working in the yard..I find that funny 4 some reason lol

If Romney wins it's gonna look like he doing something,cuz Obama already put things into place that's helping the economy

i wish i was american just so i could vote for obama

Great example of why you (trump) and Romney are a-holes. One mill. Is not an insignificant amount of money.

So Dick, why isn't anyone questioning how many Dem voters are voting for Romney?  I heard up to 13 to15%.

#Ohio #WPAFB #VOTERS Is Obama the Commander in Chief you want after seeing this?

Hahaha there gonna be a riot if Romney win lol ignorant ass people lol

If you're voting for Romney I'd like to know how you're gonna pay for college?

I honestly dnt give no fucc bout Obama or Romney..im jus voting for whoeva come wit da best benifits #FuccPolitics

Proper tipple. Not only from Chicago, but the brew you see pretty much everywhere there. (And Chicago=Obama.)

if you were American would you vote for Obama or mitt?

My son, nephew, and two cousins who are college students understands what this election means for themthey voted for President Obama!

Obama ran his campaign has if the last 4 years never happened

Wahh, wish I could've gone to the Romney/Ryan rally!

Y'all gettin outta Hand wit dis Obama shit..iaint seent dat nigga in nobody hood !!

Obama need to start hanging out monthly stimulus packages when he win

America needs some RR!!!!Romney Ryan!!!

. has 21 million followers and only has 1 million clearly I should vote for Obama because his twee

If obama doesnt win where are me and my fellow mixed people gunna go?

In line to see one of the baddest sisters on the planet, Michelle Obama!  #flotus #Obama2012  #fb

obama too tho! Hes made broken promises.. oh well thats what bein a politicians all about, tellin ppl bs what they wana hear lol

#obama wants to change this glass ceiling for women - vote #obama2012

What if Obama was a Republican? Would you still vote for him?

Check out the actual vegas odds.   Obama wins big.   #Landslide

not even from america and i want obama to win the election

Jigga and Obama are like 5 and 6. Lord enrich my coast with important and influential people (amen)

If Romney DOES win, its my confirmation to the world ending on 12/21/12 , that is all. #NotTrippin.

We will then prosecute Obama for Benghazi  Holder for Fast  Furiious  the list can go on 4 treason

Obama's in Columbus Im in a training room What is life?!

Tomorrow, America, you need to vote for what YOU stand for. I would vote for Romney, purely on his principles

I'm waiting for Romney to reveal he is actually on loan from Westworld. #googleitanyoneunderabazillion

Sitting behind Obama look for me on TV :)

Nate Silver can't quite be wrong. He's not giving 100% odds of Obama winning. Even a 98% chance leaves room for a surprise.

Anybody need a ride to vote let me no lol Im taken u to make SURE Obama get in there

I miss him. Reagan Warned Us About Obama:  via

is anyone actually voting for Romney? Anyone at all?

When I voted I voted for Obama.. But all them other questions I just put anything lol

I voted for love of country - that's why I voted for Obama 2 weeks ago during early voting. Obama will keep this country moving #FORWARD

Intrade: 67% chance Barack Obama will be re-elected President in 2012

Shit wasn't even that bad the past four years, might as well stick to what you know. VOTE OBAMA! he won't have you trickin

If Obama doesnt pull off a clear victory tomorrow there will be BIG trouble.

So my teacher really said if romney wins shes cancelling class for the rest of the week lol Smh

The latest polls say Romney is leading in Florida by a slight margin. Sigh. I wish I could still vote there #Obamaftw #state-shame

POLITICAL TWEET: Which Romney boy is which Pride  Prejudice sister? I think Tagg's the Jane, but can I live with

Decisions are made by those who show up, USA vote Obama

Me: I'm going to write in hitler when I vote.  and it will auto correct to mitt romney.

Who wanna put money on the presidency ? I got 50$ on Obama

I am an award winning poet, mom of 2, grandma of 2, disabled by over work and illness. Romney-Ryan think I should just die. #Obama2012

An article claiming the media is against Romney, while they are defending him

i get this weird feeling romney is gonna win. #butimsleepdoe

Every Single Vote Counts !!! Go and VOTE !!!!#Obama

Barack Obama  tweeted at 2:23 PM on Mon, Nov 05, 2012:Boss hug:

Alyssa celebrating her birthday in true CR style; campaigning for Romney!

Edit, cough, vote, cough. i need more hard drives and new lungs #fallfunk #OBAMA

Romney hollow eyes have settled upon me. Goodbye #romneydeathrally, I go now to join the void in the Beast.

If you're not well off right now, there's really no point in voting for Romney.

Watch Obama rally with Jay-Z and Springsteen here at 3:30 ET

IF Romney does win, we HAVE to get Democrats in the House and Senate. That would be the only way to prevent any destruction.

No more FASFA, no more grants.  So if Mitt Romney wins no more scholarships?

If Romney wins the election. I don't even know what I'd do.

Obama Will Win Election! But We Can not Rest Until Everyone Who Wants To Vote For Him Can  Does! VOTE OBAMA!

U want romney as president but u can't even buy a bag of noodles smh get cho life

ROMNEY WINS IOWA..  LOL LOL

They are waiting for President Obama to take away the corporate jet tax deduction and put them all out of business for good.

I'll bet you a million dollars obama wins the election. Shut up and put your money where your mouth is.

why did people wait till now, it's gonna take a while, suck it up. Obama sued Ohio over early voting to deny the extend time.

No doubt, but how much damage can Obama do until 1-20-13 when Romney takes over? Could be problematic at the least

Sarah Palin Endorses Mitt Romney One Day Before Election  What a way to ensure your own irrelevance.

when Romney is elected, I see the dollar getting a boost. I am staying SHORT my EUR/USD, GBP/USD and EUR/AUD

Obama is despeare for a win so he can cover up all his lies and deception.

Ewuo R Anytime I hear OBAMA speaking, I just automatically feel like GEJ is not qualified 2 be a LOCAL government Chairman

#election2012 Romney says stop hate, attacks and lies.Facts show he is only one lying ,Hate spewing. Corp Execs Even told him stop  the lies

Does a sick kid getting 3 prayers get ignored because Romney will be getting thousands?

polls are tied in Mich w/ Romney one point ahead.  the count is now 46 papers switching to Romney.

WISCONSIN STATE JOURNAL ENDORSES ROMNEY  #AZ #NC #FL #OH #MI #VA #CO #NV #IA #NH #PA #MN #WI #OR

Two reporters about to do liveshots on one of two Romney presses bus in Virginia. #onemoreday

A lot of people have Obama winning 303 to 235 Hmmm I'm about to do mines!  has the updated polls, it's really close!

saw a lady with a piece of paper TAPED to her back windshield stating she supports Romney, smh just do your part and vote #obama2012

Beware return of slave ideology of 80s #Communitarianism of #AmitaiEtzioni as basis for an #Obama 2 austerity regim

Let Your Voice Be Heard , Cause They Damn Sure Gona Hear Mine ! Ima Push Obama's Button 76 Times To Make Sure Ma Vote Went Through !

Whether you believe Barack Obama stands for change that's much deeper than his policies#ResponsibleVoting

Yes b/c Obama sure cares. A 20 yr record high of 14.3% unemployment in blk community.

Fantastic: Obama  Clinton at Saturday night rally in Virginia

i found out how to be a good citizen in obama's eyes. Don't get a job and do drugs. He actually pays you for it!

If I was American i would vote Obama because he seems like a cool guy. #goturbackson

'you'll lose Bitch. because, I'm the President..' Romney vs Obama. RealTalk.  via

Media starting to change now that they can see Romney has a better chance? I won't forget their coverage regardless.

Wats going on in the world today are yawl voting or being sum #Romney fans by not voting

#ElectionNightSurprises Biden will admit he voted for Romney.

I can't imagine how much of an economic disaster America will face if Romney takes office.

#CO poll worker hassles voter wearing Mass Institute of Tech sweatshirt because they thought MIT was electioneering for Romney. #dumbass

Actually I might do this. I'm sure Romney supporters 'slandering' will be in full effect tnrw

If Obama doesnt win tomorrow Im gonna cry and then Im moving to Canada

Obama is not going to campaign tomorrow to have an all day basketball game.  All day? this is nuts #tcot

Key  Peele: Obama's Anger Translator - The Last Four Years

Bush dropped the ball on Katrina letting the country down. President Obama stopped his campaign and took care of the country.Vote

eat it Romney. China already has a good work force. You helped it remember? You didn't mean US did you?

Mitt Romney would probably abandon the poet laureate in favor of a high school football team or whatever he likes, I don't know.

YA'LL AMERICAN FOOLS VOTE OBAMA

if obama lose , ion coming to school wednesday .

I'm about as good at math as Romney is at debating.

Politics: Unexpectedly massive Romney rally in Pennsylvania | CainTV  via

#CNN is reporting Chris Christie  Obama at Sandy but really Sandy is a mess.

President Obama has been reelected for a second term based off of my meaningless twitlection. Final score Obama 9 Romney 6.

Are you at all concerned that this bet will affect election turnout in favor of Obama?

I find it more noteworthy that Obama was in NY. Romney was still in Ohio begging for votes

Come on.no favoritism here. That perpetuates the belief about Hollywood being a shoe-in for Obama.

I really hope Obama win cause these republicans are tryna do everything so he wont smh !.

Get out and vote tomorrow This is a historic election Obama is the real deal

Seriously there is no point in me arguing with these people about Obama because they don't understand

Extra! Last chance to protect our Mid-east Embassies  Ambassadors vote Romney for our reliable Commander  Chief.

CNN's Erick Erickson: Obama Election Win? Who Cares? The Rapture is Coming!

C'mon people! Wake up! Obama's crew is a cabal of red-diaper babies who hate America as she is. Time to send them packing! #Election2012

I know what I'm talking about lol And you have no clue haha You just thing it's cool to say Obama lol

some people in my community are voting for Obama. I approve.

Mitt Romney Style (Gangnam Style Parody):  viayour so retarded !

I kinda see why the #GOPs blame the media to be pro left sometimes. Its ever so subtle. #Obama #Romney #Election

To those of you voting libertarianmight as well vote for Obama.

We need record #turnout to offset GOP cheating; move #Forward: 4 Ways Jon Husted Is Trying To Steal Election For Romney

i live in ohio and i gotta think this thing is close.if i had to guess id even say its gonna be big romney.just interesting!!

Fuck Obama!!! #NP - Terrorist Threats  Nas - If I Ruled The World

all of our candidates are terrible and i can't vote anyway, so go obama!

sorry my life isnt based off of twitter c:.  im ignorant cause you're makinng up some false shit about obama? fuckk yoo couch

When you ask a naija girl a question.. They'll be steady pulling #romney's on you C

im dead , niknik tombou sum she think she saw mitt romney when she was getting off the bus .

my last word on this topic I care about the moral issues way more than financial and dont agree with Romney

I hope Obama win because if not it will be hell

Omg these ppl was jus bouta fight in the caf because this black girl was tlkn abt Obama TRAGIC .

Everybody need to go vote! We need Obama back in office for one more! #FUCKROMNEY

Election day/nite is tomoro.!!!! Obama 4more years.!!

thankyou so much,praying hard for a win tomorrow romney/ryan 2012

obama sounds hoarse like me

Dont kno hw a comon thief lik Femi Fani-Kayode can call Obama an antichrist, Fani=corruption,has he  heard Obama  corruption in 1 sentence?

Romney: that makes Romney a duck egg I guess.

Obama did stuff Bush couldn't do :

MITT ROMNEYS REAL NAME IS WILLARD

To all my Pro-Obama friends, I'm sure the feeling is mutual hehe.

Jobs: The Truth Reagan Bush Obama Report in Graphs  #Catholics4Ohio #OhioU_Prays #OhPrayerCaucus

Liberals Ridicule Romney for Hurricane Sandy Charity yet they say NOTHING about American Kids Eating Rats for Dinner

I am so tired of ppl staying that hanging Obama mannequin was done in FL!!!!! It was not!!! Not all media is good media!

Stepping out of the baptismal waters, Romney proclaims to us his true name: Rom'shoggoth the unbecomer #romneydeathrally

screw romney and obama. Vote Disick. #swaggie 3

just saw the obama t-shirt on your website it's amazing, definitely buying it!

Prediction: Romney wins Florida by 1.5 points

Romney announces Election Day campaign stops in OH and PA  Will Obama follow suit, and where?

Can someone aim a firework towards Romney please.

35K people turned out to Romney speech in PA last night, a state Barry is supposed to own

That's the thing, Obama isn't even that bad, hes not Gordon Brown. I don't know how even 1 woman would vote for him and Ryan

If you're only voting for Obama because Mitt Romney doesn't support homosexuality and he does, I couldn't consider you more stupid.

Sir no sir lol  If Romney wins I won't have a choice but to pursue a rap career..

If Obama wins tomorrow, Im bumpin head of the state by baracka flocka flame all damn day lol

Did Claire McCaskill just throw Obama under the bus?  #MOSEN

Garland-based Prophet: Obama Wins Reelection: Pastor Joseph William Mwenya runs the Global Fellowship Church ou

#blacks4Romney Lastly, Romney can't overturn Roe v Wade. Only the Supreme Court can do that. The media needs to stop lying.

Mitt Romney's Entirely Untrue, Objectively False Statements  via

If Obama becomes president I'm leaving the country. If Romney, I'm still leaving. This isn't a political status, I jus

If by some act of Satan Romney wins tomorrow I'm going to have a Saw marathon and imagine its him in every death contraption

lol not at all. But I'm still voting for Romney.

#lulz just got told I wasn't professional and I was wrong for saying my thoughts and belifes about obama and romney. #Censorship

Texted you my prediction. Obama to win with between 290 and 295.

Vote for #Obama #4moreyears It takes time to change what George Bush messed up. #RT to spread the word

If any of ya'll vote for Romney, ya'll stupid as fuck.

Think about it.Dems oversampled by +11  Romney winning Ind by +22, popular totals shld be represented in swing sts

This is why MSNBC is irrelevant: Chris Matthews Accuses Romney Of Starting Revenge Theme, Calls It Racist  #Election2012

Damn Obama and Romney tied in Ohio that mean something

Just saw an Obama ad on Fox News. Which proves that what Roger Ailes cares most about is $$$$$$$$$. He'll take the money from anyone. #tcot

Cine: President Obama after he wins ! #2terrrmz #dougie  #2terrrmz #dougie

More than 17,000 auto jobs created since Obama auto rescue in 2009.  Romney opposed:

and Obama is playing basketball. Sums up the character of the two candidates along with their work ethics.

why are people in the UK fussing about the Romney and Obama stuff? none of them are gonna be our president so you shouldn't care

Barack Obama All The Next 4 Years #ObamaBiden2012 #Obama #FuckRomney

If Barack Obama doesn't win the election tomorrow, i will genuinely cry

#CNN is showing Chris Christie  Obama at Sandy but really Sandy is a disaster.

schuyler that is the most ignorant thing i've heard you say. More like Romney. He's raising middle class taxes #dumbnigga

my drinking game consists of me downing enough tequila until I'm no longer nervous, and then repeat once obama wins.

#USA election: whether #Obama or #Romney wins the war party will still be in power says

said he wouldn't bail out auto industry, yet Obama did bail them out and saved the industry. Romney is a republican with oversea

If you want Romney for president i recommend you stop being my friend #SorryNotSorry

Watch Obama in Ohio with Rapper Jay-Z for final rally - dripping-adorableness: charminwonderland: watch live

Obama is just the best president ever.

If Romney becomes president I'ma try my hardest to become a Canadian citizen

Obama will have an early lead until republicans get off work. Yeah because all republicans have jobs -__- joke

Voter Guide: Obama and Romney on the issues, plus videos from their respective VB amphitheater rallies. #hrvote

Vietnam veterans, the hawks who wanted that war did not fight in that war. Mitt Romney is one of them #NC #VA #FL #MI #PA

If our oil reserves had been developed here, we would have no need to rely on imports and a President Romney will set that in motion.

Can't believe it is almost time to vote- again. My first time being able to vote was in 2008 #Obama. And this 2nd time  it's #Obama2012

Ima vote for Romney like the middle class white man I am.

my mama said she gone turn up tomorrow when Obama wins.

all international students, get your passports ready in case Romney wins. #backtotheplantation

Three Ways Obama and Romney Are the Same on Foreign Policy: The views of President Barack Obama and Mitt Romney

Went out to McArthur High yesterday for the #Obama appearance, and the #Romney supporters were TRYING it!! W

this is a weird question for you Obama or Romney???

Romney has USD 200 thousand million in his bank account. Right. He really needs to be the next President?

Well, you all Americans can move to my house if Mitt Romney wins. I don't think my mom would mind.

tomorrow, Obama will take an early lead until Republicans get off work and go vote.

If Mitt Romney Win,Some People Gunna Have Immigration At There Door,Lol (;

So let's work tomorrow, the day after and the day after that. #Springsteen #Obama

gone CRAZY viral today! Obama responds to 10 year old's letter about her gay dads (via

You have it backwards. If Obama wins, the middle class loses. He has done everything to suppress the middle class.

Daily Kos: Bad news for Republicans: Romney's relying on teleprompters now  via

Oh I simply love your tweets!!  Gonna vote Romney all the way!!  #TeamRomneyRyan2012

If #Obama wins, his victory will be short-lived.  We are coming after him demanding answers about #Benghazi, among other t

be sure you tell of dirty political trick to come from Obama claiming victory early so Romney voters don't vote! #liarinchief

#Autofollow Just one day left in their stubbornly close race, President Barack Obama and challenger  #FF

mitt romney can suck a big African looking like beeep!

Lol, probably, I mean Obama's. Obama.

Obama should rid lace fronts in 2013  These hoes ego would be shot !

Romney team sees Ohio numbers moving their way  via #OH #FL #VA #PA #WI #NV #MI #MN #CO

Are you sitting, America? Hannity says Romney looks presidential while Obama grows more unhinged and desperate daily.

Supporting Romney 'cause it's . Obama's too mainstream.

I am black and Romney all the way!

Election tomorrow =victory for Obeezy A.k.a Obama

#Obama vs. #Romney . . . RETWEET for Obama Keep scrolling for Romney .

Lol at these little kids pretending like they know about Obama Care. More than 400 kids at school go for Mitt Romney. #SaysAlot

RT if u would vote for Obama

CA is already going to Obama so I don't care just I find your language and insults disturbing but U R paid 4 looks not IQ

If romney gets elected i'll be that crazy mutha fucker to shoot up the white house

Peggy Noonan's ability to read Obama's expressions + news of Romney yard-signs she's heard through friends  data

Having a blast at work. Have the best customers in the world. No joke . Love living in las Vegas .   Voted Friday for our pres. Go Obama

Lost my absentee ballot in the mail.  County clerk has yet to email me.  If Obama loses I solemnly declare it my own fault.

Come on Mr TrumpShark Tank is a great show and Cuban is a star, and his other Sharks are great, too. Go Romney.

economy  social issues. So romney is the better choice by a landslide. Then once fixed we can get the rest fixed.

If Obama wasn't black, Romney wouldn't stand a chance

Obama's even spoken in support of ending the gun bans in Chicago and DC.

MUST READ:   Sheldon Adelson  A vote for Romney after years as a Democrat

(Live Stream) Jay-Z Live at President Barack Obama Campaign Rally in Ohio (3:30 ET)

MSNBC would never say a negative word about Obama. They work tirelessly to keep his halo shiny for the ignorant.

he did. touting voting as best revenge rather than booing romney.

Magic Johnson Supports President #Obama:   via

How much of Obama's vote in 08 was a referendum on Republicans? Answer is the same margin that is going to landslide Obama 11/06

Dont worry Obama,ull win this battle:) #TeamObama

seriously though, please don't let Romney become President.

If I'm Romney, I'm more concerned about swing-state polls than newspaper endorsements.

because of the irony that Romney is implying that he actually has had to work in his life?

Electing Obama is like backing up and hitting the same iceberg again. Electing Romney would be like hitting a new iceberg

Maybe this means Obama is black Irish.

Here is a few minutes of video from the Romney rally I attended in Englewood CO on Sat Nov 5. I was fortunate to

President Obama For: Wind  Solar Clean Energy  Climate Change Control / Pollution Stopped!

Willie Nelson Supports Obama While Country Colleagues Rally for Romney: Filed under: Country NewsJason Kemp

Romney needs to just win already. Can't wait till this election is over.

Willie Nelson Supports Obama While Country Colleagues Rally for Romney

President Obama speaking to a crowd of 18,000 in Madison: The middle class needs a champion in Washington h

lol all the romney lovers at pv are sore losers. SUCKS

Wow Cynthia Nixon Says 'Sex And The City' Women Wouldn't 'Ever Vote For Romney' - Huffington Post  (a link in my bio)

What people don't get is that its going to take more than 4 yrs to get out of the deep debt we are in. Blame Bush not Obama. #justsaying

under Obama care, his work has notified will be taking MORE out of paycheck, 2 pay 4 other ppl

This old white just said she voting for Mitt cuz he white then she said naw Obama her man Romney full off shit

Here's a review of my opponent, Mitt Romney.

Recognize this guy from the Reds Playoff Series? He was kicked out of the Obama Event at UC last night.

Of course, it is no secret that Romney is not courting the Arab and Muslim vote.Romney: The Anti-Palestinian Candidate

Can we just give Obama New York and California and keep the rest of the country for ourselves?

But imma really miss them foods stamps tho! #GoVote #Obama

NJ Gov. Chris #Christie praises Obama for #Sandy recovery effort but says Romney still gets his #election2012 vote  ^pt

Please Lord don't let Romney win

Did I tell yall about earlier in class how this white boy told the class if you ain't voting for Obama don't vote

Butttt of course Romney won for this school

I'm an #IVF baby, a federal #Personhood amendment would outlaw #abortion, IVF treatments  #BirthControl pills. #Romney supports this. #FYI

Asking why you're voting for Romney..it's a serious question,I want I know what's going on in your head. I've yet to find a real answer

Also, the dude who makes anti-Obama signs now honks in front of our house with the Obama sign. I don't feel safe here.

I wonder how Black America would take an Obama defeat.

i would forget my topic paper for the debate in my lockerrr-_- #immigration #democrat #Obama

dunno about my dad, but the rest of my family are voting Obama

Obama has to win tomorrow. He really honestly truly has to win. The alternative is heart breaking  horrifying.

if romney wins tomorrow the whole world will form a rebellion against him it'll be like the hunger games or something

The CNN National Poll has Romney and Obama tied at 49% each. #anxious #election2012

And tho many refuse to say that we are in fact improving as a nation Obama is the main reason

Did you already vote? It's public info. Obama's new app tells you how many people with your name have already voted. h

Obama has just decided Bama must give some of their players to Auburn to make things fair. You know the wealthy pay a l

I think Obama will take an early lead tomorrow, until all the republicans get off of work to vote

You know you're in the ghetto when you see people campaigning for Obama.

90% of the ppl who tweeted the Obama lead till work is over dont have jobs..shut up #fuckpolitics

Where's Oprah? There won't be an enthusiastic female Oprah drone pro Obama voting block this year.

Romney VS Obama, freedom VS free stuff. Private sector prosperity VS government stimulus. Culture of autonomy VS culture of entitlements.GOP

Obama cheers for the Hawks in The Mighty Ducks #Romney

This map has an Obama win.  Looks promising that MSNBC thinks Romney will win

If Obama wins I'm throwing a party if that white nigga wins yo smh I'm goin back to jamaica!! Bye bye riches hello slav

Solid support for Romney among US voters in Israel  via

Owned again, this truely is OBAMA'S AMERICA

Obama should be the fucking President alright, I'm not even american what even but yes that Romney dude is an asshole

I have voted for Obama in WA and gay marriage and a pot legalise where are the Doritos?

If Mitt Romney wins I'm moving to China

if romney wins half us gonna half to drop out . that nigga tryna cut financial aid and people's parents don't have m's in

Mitt romney want the middle class to pay for college by borrowing money from our parents aka college will be for rich nggas lol

fun fact, he could win the election if only around 20% of the american population vote for him. fuck Romney

I don't get how people can choose Romney over Obama. At all. It doesn't make sense.

Says he's weak on terrorists, bad ideas 4 the economy, no plan 4 next term, divides the country..Mitt is confusing Obama w himself.

If you can you should go watch Obama speak tomorrow

Baldwin makes case for Obama, herself at rally

Israeli-Americans did NOT vote Romney by 85%.The so-called exit poll claiming they did was unscientific /skewed.Just bullshit.

PoliticusUSA: Rush Limbaugh Claims Everything but Polling and Voting Points to a Romney Landslide: Rush Limbaugh

Deillone so fuckin irritating tom bout he gone write Obama a letter saying since he voting for him he need a extra 100 on his bridge card

Could Mitt Romney Mormon Video Doom Him in Election's Final Hours?  via

So wanna go with me snatchinh Romney Signs out of people yard ?

Jay Cutler said he's voting for Romney.  LOLOLOLOL. I don't know which of those two suck more.  They deserve each other.

Leadership: Obama to Play Basketball on Election Day while #Sandy victims suffer - Katie Pavlich -  #RomneyRyan2012

President Barack Obama holds 48% vs 46% lead over Mitt Romney in national poll of likely voters - Reut

My prediction: Obama will start off with an early lead, then Romney will comeback when the republicans get off work #RomneyRyan2012

Obama: 'It's Always Good to Ignore Donald Trump' - The truth sure hurts, WHO KNOWS ANYTHING ABOUT #BarackObama NO ONE!!

You should educate yourself on the positive change Obama has brought to the US before sounding silly. :]

Romney is a DOG a MUTT not a MITT He wants to make AMERICA the TROPHY of his celebrated victory over his $ laundering sell out hatchet ways

This dude #romney thinks he can actually win? LOL!

RTPoll from one of Colorado's best pollsters has Obama up 4 in the state

What are 3 reasons why you are voting for Romney? #curious

If Mitt Romney is elected, he gon try to make us join his Mormon cult and ain't nobody got time fo that.

#Obama's going to do it, #rednecks better get their homebrew at the ready.

Romney retakes lead in Zogby poll- now leads Obama by 2 points, 48% to 46%. Romney leads today in Zogby, Rasmussen and Gallup

My last rt was true and all,, but obama is going to fucking win,, hands down!!

AMERICA: don't vote for Mitt Romney. Have you read his intended policies/financing? HE IS INSANE

I wonder if #Obama's family in Kenya will offer him a place to live when he is forced to vacate the White House?

wins what the popular vote? who cares. obama wins according to that graphic 280, praying it is wrong

if you honestly think Romney won't work to overturn RvW, AcA and put a no homo amendment in the constitution you're fucking daft

Well it's American election now who to vote for mitt or Obama difficult but Obama has an o what looks like a ball do Obama it is sorry mitt

BITCH stop lyin if Mitt Romney pull up in a hummer on 6s wit sum beat ur ass is #STUFFED

@highlight

New York's Republican Mayor Bloomberg endorses President Obama for re-election.

@highlight

Reports--8 States Will Decide! Daily Presidential Tracking Poll: Romney 49%, Obama 48%

@highlight

Obama and Clinton at Saturday night rally in Virginia